CHAPTER I.
He started up, each limb convulsed
With agonizing fear,
He only heard the storm of night
'T was music to his ear.
Lord William
.
Away
we went! Guert's aim was the islands, which
carried him nearer home, while it offered a place of retreat,
in the event of the danger's becoming more serious. The
fierce rapidity with which we now moved prevented all
conversation
,
or even much reflection. The reports of the
rending ice, however, became more and more frequent, first
coming from above, and then from below. More than once
it seemed as if the immense mass of weight that had
evidently
collected somewhere near the town of Albany, was
about to pour down upon us in a floodwhen the river
would have been swept for miles, by a resistless torrent.
Nevertheless, Guert held on his way; firstly, because he
knew it would be impossible to get on either of the main
shores, anywhere near the point where we happened to be;
and secondly, because, having often seen similar dammings
of the waters, he fancied we were still safe. That the
distant reader may understand the precise character of the
danger we ran, it may be well to give him some notion of
the localities.
The banks of the Hudson are generally high and
precipitous
,
and in some places they are mountainous. No
flats worthy of being mentioned, occur, until Albany is
approached
;
nor are those which lie south of that town, of
any great extent, compared with the size of the stream. In
this particular the Mohawk is a very different river, having
extensive flats that, I have been told, resemble those of the
Rhine, in miniature. As for the Hudson, it is generally
esteemed in the colony as a very pleasing river; and I
remember
to have heard intelligent people from home, admit,
that even the majestic Thames itself, is scarcely more worthy
to be visited, or that it better rewards the trouble and
curiosity
of the enlightened traveller.
[1]
[1]
This remark of Mr. Cornelius Littlepage's, may induce a smile
in the reader. But, few persons of fifty can be found, who cannot
recall the time, when it was a rare thing to imagine
anything
American
,
as good as its English counterpart. The American who could
write a booka real, live bookforty years since, was a sort of
prodigy
.
It was the same with him who could paint any picture beyond
a common portrait. The very fruits and natural productions of the
country were esteemed, doubtingly; and he was a bold man who
dared to extol even canvass-back ducks, in the year 1800! At the
present day, the feeling is fast undergoing an organic change. It is now
the fashion to
extol
everything American, and from submitting to a
degree that was almost abject, to the feeling of colonial dependency,
the country is filled, to-day, with the most profound provincial
self-admiration
.
It is to be hoped that the next change will bring us to
something like the truth.
Editor
.
While there are flats on the shores of the Hudson, and
of some extent, in the vicinity of Albany, the general
formation
of the adjacent country is preserved,being high, bold,
and in some quarters, more particularly to the northward
and eastward, mountainous. Among these hills the stream
meanders for sixty or eighty miles north of the town,
receiving
tributaries as it comes rushing down towards the
sea. The character of the river changes entirely, a short
distance above Albany; the tides flowing to that point,
rendering it navigable, and easy of ascent in summer, all
the way from the sea. Of the tributaries, the principal is
the Mohawk, which runs a long distance towards the west
they tell me, for I have never visited these remote parts of
the colonyamong fertile plains, that are bounded north and
south by precipitous highlands. Now, in the spring, when
the vast quantities of snow, that frequently lie four feet deep
in the forests, and among the mountains and valleys of the
interior, are suddenly melted by the south winds and rains,
freshets necessarily succeed, which have been known to do
great injury. The flats of the Mohawk, they tell me, are
annually overflown, and a moderate freshet is deemed a
blessing
;
but, occasionally, a union of the causes I have
mentioned
,
1 *
produces a species of deluge that has a very opposite
character. Thus it is, that houses are swept away; and
bridges from the smaller mountain streams, have been known
to come floating past the wharves of Albany, holding their
way towards the ocean. At such times the tides produce
no counter-current; for it is a usual thing, in the early
months of the spring, to have the stream pour downwards
for weeks, the whole length of the river, and to find the
water fresh even as low as New York.
Such was the general nature of the calamity we had
been so unexpectedly made to encounter. The winter had
been severe, and the snows unusually deep; and, as we
drove furiously onward, I remembered to have heard my
grandfather predict extraordinary freshets in the spring,
from the character of the winter, as we had found it, even
previously to my quitting home. The great thaw, and the
heavy rains of the late storm, had produced the usual effect;
and the waters thus let loose, among the distant, as well as
the nearer hills, were now pouring down upon us in their
collected might. In such cases, the first effect is, to loosen
the ice from the shores; and, local causes forcing it to give
way at particular points, a breaking up of its surface occurs,
and dams are formed that set the stream back in floods upon
all the adjacent low land, such as the flats in the vicinity of
Albany.
We did not then know it, but, at the very moment Guert
was thus urging his blacks to supernatural effortsactually
running them as if on a race-coursethere was a long
reach of the Hudson, opposite to, for a short distance below,
and for a considerable distance above the town, which was
quite clear of stationary ice. Vast cakes continued to come
down, it is true, passing on to increase the dam that had
formed below, near and on the Overslaugh, where it was
buttressed by the islands, and rested on the bottom; but the
whole of that firm field, on which we had first driven forth
that morning, had disappeared! This we did not know at
the time, or it might have changed the direction of Guert's
movements; but I learned it afterwards, when placed in a
situation to inquire into the causes of what had occurred.
Herman Mordaunt's bells, and the rumbling sound of his
runners, were heard close behind us, as our own sleigh flew
along the river at a rate that I firmly believe could not have
been much less than that of twenty miles in the hour. As
we were whirled northward, the reports made by the rending
of the ice increased in frequency and force. They really
became appalling! Still, the girls continued silent,
maintaining
their self-command in a most admirable manner;
though I doubt not that they felt, in the fullest extent, the
true character of the awful circumstances in which we were
placed. Such was the state of things, as Guert's blacks
began sensibly to relax in their speed, for want of wind.
They still galloped on, but it was no longer with the
swiftness
of the wind; and their master became sensible of the
folly of hoping to reach the town ere the catastrophe should
arrive. He reined in his panting horses, therefore, and was
just falling into a trot, as a violent report was heard directly
in our front. At the next instant the ice rose, positively,
beneath our horses' hoofs, to the height of several feet, taking
the form of the roof of a house. It was too late to retreat,
and Guert shouting out JackMoses, applied the whip,
and the spirited animals actually went over the mound,
leaping a crack three feet in width, and reaching the level
ice beyond. All this was done, as it might be, in the
twinkling
of an eye. While the sleigh flew over this ridge, it
was with difficulty I held the girls in their seats; though
Guert stood nobly erect, like the pine that is too firmly
rooted to yield to the tempest. No sooner was the danger
passed, however, than he pulled up, and came to a dead halt.
We heard the bells of Herman Mordaunt's sleigh, on the
other side of the barrier, but could see nothing. The
broken cakes, pressed upon by millions of tons weight
above, had risen fully ten feet, into an inclination that was
nearly perpendicular; rendering crossing it next to
impossible
,
even to one afoot. Then came Herman Mordaunt's
voice, filled with paternal agony, and human grief, to
increase
the awe of that dreadful moment!
Shore!shore! he shouted, or rather yelledIn
the name of a righteous Providence, to the shore, Guert!
The bells passed off towards the western bank, and the
rumbling of the runners accompanied their sound. That
was a breathless moment to us four. We heard the rending
and grinding of the ice, on all sides of us; saw the broken
barriers behind and in front; heard the jingling of Herman
Mordaunt's bells, as it became more and more distant, and
finally ceased; and felt as if we were cut off from the rest
of our species. I do not think either of us felt any
apprehension
of breaking through; for use had so accustomed us
to the field of the river, while the more appalling grounds
of alarm were so evident, that no one thought of such a
source of danger. Nor was there much, in truth, to
apprehend
from that cause. The thaw had not lasted long enough
materially to diminish either the thickness or the tenacity
of the common river ice; though it was found unequal to
resisting the enormous pressure that bore upon it from above.
It is probable that a cake of an acre's size would have
upheld
,
not only ourselves, but our sleigh and horses, and
carried us, like a raft, down the stream; had there been
such a cake, free from stationary impediments. Even the
girls now comprehended the danger, which was in a manner
suspended over us,  as the impending wreath of snow
menances the fall of the
avalanche
. But, it was no moment
for indecision or inaction.
Cut off, as we were, by an impassable barrier of ice, from
the route taken by Herman Mordaunt, it was necessary to
come to some resolution on our own course. We had the
choice of endeavouring to pass to the western shore, on the
upper side of the barrier, or of proceeding towards the
nearest
of several low islands which lay in the opposite
direction
.
Guert determined on the last, walking his horses to
the point of land, there being no apparent necessity for haste,
while the animals greatly needed breath. As we went along,
he explained to us that the fissure below cut us off from the
only point where landing on the western shore could be
practicable. At the same time, he put in practice a pious
fraud, which had an excellent effect on the feelings and
conduct of both the girls, throughout the remainder of the
trying scenes of that fearful night; more especially on those
of Anneke. He dwelt on the good fortune of Herman
Mordaunt
,
in being on the right side of the barrier that
separated
the sleighs, in a way to induce those who did not
penetrate his motive, to fancy the rest of the party was in a
place of security, as the consequence of this accident.
Thus did Anneke believe her father safe, and thus was she
relieved from much agonizing doubt.
As soon as the sleigh came near the point of the island,
Guert gave me the reins, and went ahead to examine
whether it were possible to land. He was absent fifteen
minutes; returning to us only after he had made a thorough
search into the condition of the island, as well as of that of
the ice in its eastern channel. These were fifteen fearful
minutes; the rending of the masses above, and the grinding
of cake on cake, sounding like the roar of the ocean in a
tempest. Notwithstanding all the awful accessories of this
dreadful night, I could not but admire Guert's coolness of
manner, and his admirable conduct. He was more than
resolute; for he was cool, collected, and retained the use of
all his faculties in perfection. As plausible as it might seem,
to one less observant and clear-headed, to attempt escaping
to the western shore, Guert had decided right in moving
towards
the island. The grinding of the ice, in another quarter,
had apprised him that the water was forcing its way through,
near the main land; and that escape would be nearly
hopeless
,
on that side of the river. When he rejoined us, he
called me to the heads of the horses, for a conference; first
solemnly assuring our precious companions that there were
no grounds for immediate apprehension. Mary Wallace
anxiously asked him to repeat this to
her
, on the faith due
from man to woman; and he did it; when I was permitted
to join him without further opposition.
Corny, said Guert, in a low tone, Providence has
punished me for my wicked wish of seeing Mary Wallace in
the claws of lions; for all the savage beasts of the Old
World, could hardly make our case more desperate than it
now is. We must be cool, however, and preserve the girls,
or die like men.
Our fates are, and must be, the same. Do you devote
yourself to Mary, and leave Anneke to me. But, why this
language; surely, our case is by no means so desperate.
It might not be so difficult for two active, vigorous young
men to get ashore; but it would be different with females.
The ice is in motion all around us; and the cakes are piling
and grinding on each other in a most fearful manner. Were
it light enough to see, we should do much better; but, as it
is, I dare not trust Mary Wallace any distance from this
island, at present. We may be compelled to pass the night
here, and must make provision accordingly. You hear the
ice grinding on the shore; a sign that everything is going
down stream.God send that the waters break through, ere
long; though they may sweep all before them, when they
do come. I fear me, Corny, that Herman Mordaunt and
his party are lost!
Merciful Providence!  can it be as bad as that!  I
rather hope they have reached the land.
That
is impossible, on the course they took. Even a
man would be bewildered and swept away, in the torrent
that is driving down under the west shore. It is that vent
to the water, which saves us. But, no more words.You
now understand the extent of the danger, and will know
what you are about. We must get our precious charge on
the island, if possible, without further delay. Half an hour
nay, half a minute may bring down the torrent.
Guert took the direction of everything. Even while we
had been talking, the ice had moved materially; and we
found ourselves fifty feet further from the island than we
had been. By causing the horses to advance, this distance
was soon recovered; but it was found impossible to lead or
drive them over the broken cakes with which the shore of
the island now began to be lined. After one or two spirited
and determined efforts, Guert gave the matter up, and asked
me to help the ladies from the sleigh. Never did women
behave better, than did these delicate and lovely girls, on
an occasion so awfully trying. Without remonstrances,
tears, exclamations or questions, both did as desired; and I
cannot express the feeling of security I felt, when I had
helped each over the broken and grinding border of white
ice, that separated us from the shore. The night was far
from cold; but the ground was now frozen sufficiently to
prevent any unpleasant consequences from walking on what
would otherwise have been a slimy, muddy alluvion; for
the island was so very low, as often to be under water, when
the river was particularly high. This, indeed, formed our
danger, after we had reached it.
When I returned to Guert, I found him already drifted
down some little distance; and this time we moved the
sleigh so much above the point, as to be in less danger of
getting out of sight of our precious wards. To my surprise,
Guert was busy in stripping
the harness from the horses;
and Jack already stood only in his blinkers. Moses was
soon reduced to the same state. I was wondering what was
to be done next, when Guert drew each bridle from its
animal
,
and gave a smart crack of his whip. The liberated
horses started back with affright  snorted, reared, and,
turning away, they went down the river, free as air, and
almost as swift; the incessant and loud snapping of heir
master's whip, in no degree tending to diminish their speed.
I asked the meaning of this.
It would be cruel not to let the poor beasts make use of
the strength and sagacity nature has given them to save
their lives, answered Guert, straining his eyes after Moses,
the horse that was behind, so long as his dark form could be
distinguished, and leaning forward to listen to the blows of
their hoofs, while the noises around us permitted them to be
heard. To us, they would only be an encumbrance, since
they never could be forced over the cracks and caked ice in
harness; nor would it be at all safe to follow them, if they
could. The sleigh is light, and we are strong enough to
shove it to land, when there is an opportunity; or, it may
be left on the island.
Nothing could have served more effectually to convince
me of the manner in which Guert regarded our situation,
than to see him turn loose beasts which I knew he so highly
prized. I mentioned this; and he answered me with a
melancholy seriousness, that made the impression so much
the stronger
It is possible they may get ashore, for nature has given
a horse a keen instinct. They can swim, too, where you
and I would drown. At all events, they are not fettered
with harness, but have every chance it is in my power to
give them. Should they land, any farmer would put them
in his stable, and I should soon hear where they were to be
found; it, indeed, I am living in the morning to make the
inquiry.
`What is next to be done, Guert? I asked,
understanding
at once both his feelings and his manner of reasoning.
We must now run the sleigh on the island; after which
it will be time to look about us, and to examine if it be
possible
to get the ladies on the main land.
Accordingly, Guert and I applied ourselves to the task,
and had no great difficulty in dragging the sleigh over the
cakes, grinding and in motion as they were. We pulled it
as far as the tree beneath which Anneke and Mary stood;
when the ladies got into it and took their seats, enveloped in
the skins. The night was not cold for the season, and our
companions were thickly clad, having tippets and muffs;
still, the wolves' skins of Guert contributed to render them
more comfortable. All apprehension of immediate danger
now ceased, for a short time; nor do I think either of the
females fancied they could run any more risk, beyond that
of exposure to the night air, so long as they remained on
terra firma
. Such was not the case, however, as a very
simple explanation will render apparent to the reader.
All the islands in this part of the Hudson are low, being
rich, alluvial meadows, bordered by trees and bushes; most
of the first being willows, sycamores, or nuts. The fertility
of the soil had given to these trees rapid growths, and they
were generally of some stature; though not one among
them had that great size which ought to mark the body and
branches of a venerable tenant of the forest. This fact, of
itself, proved that no one tree of them all was
very
old; a
circumstance that was certainly owing to the ravages of the
annual freshets. I say annual; for though the freshet which
now encompassed us, was far more serious than usual, each
year brought something of the sort; and the islands were
constantly increasing or diminishing under their action. To
prevent the last, a thicket of trees was left at the head of
each island, to form a sort of barricade against the inroads
of the ice in the spring. So low was the face of the land,
or meadow, however, that a rise of a very few feet in the
river would be certain to bring it entirely under water. All
this will be made more apparent by our own proceedings,
after we had placed the ladies in the sleigh; and more
especially
,
by the passing remarks of Guert while employed in
his subsequent efforts.
No sooner did Guert Ten Eyck believe the ladies to be
temporarily safe, than he proposed to me that we should take
a closer look at the state of the river, in order to ascertain
the most feasible means of getting on the main land. This
was said aloud, and in a cheerful way, as if he no longer
felt any apprehension, and, evidently to me, to encourage
our companions. Anneke desired us to go, declaring that
now she knew herself to be on dry land, all her own fears
had vanished. We went accordingly, taking our first
direction
towards the head of the island.
A very few minutes sufficed to reach the limits of our
narrow domain; and, as we approached them, Guert pointed
out to me the mound of ice that was piling up behind it,
as a most fearful symptom.
There
is our danger, he said, with emphasis, and we
must not trust to these trees. This freshet goes beyond
any I ever saw on the river; and not a spring passes that
we have not more or less of them. Do you not see, Corny,
what saves us now?
We are on an island, and cannot be in much danger
from the river while we stay here.
Not so, my dear friend, not at all so. But, come with
me and look for yourself.
I followed Guert, and did look for myself. We sprang
upon the cakes of ice, which were piled quite thirty feet in
height, on the head of the island, extending right and left,
as far as our eyes could see, by that misty light. It was by
no means difficult moving about on this massive pile, the
movement in the cakes being slow, and frequently
interrupted
;
but there was no concealing the true character of
the danger. Had not the island, and the adjacent main
interposed
their obstacles, the ice would have continued to move
bodily down the stream, cake shoving over cake, until the
whole found vent in the wider space below, and floated off
towards the ocean. Not only was our island there,
however
,
but other islands lay near us, straitening the different
channels or passages in such a way, as to compel the
formation
of an icy dam; and, on the strength of this dam rested
all our security. Were it to be ruptured anywhere near us,
we should inevitably be swept off in a body. Guert thought,
however, as has been said already, that the waters had
found narrow issues under the main land, both east and
west of us; and should this prove to be true, there was a
hope that the great calamity might be averted. In other
Vol. II.  2
words, if these floodgates sufficed, we
might
escape;
otherwise
the catastrophe was certain.
I cannot excuse it to myself to remain here, without
endeavouring to see what is the state of things nearer to the
shore, said Guert, after we had viewed the fast
accumulating
mass of broken ice above us, as well as the light
permitted
,
and we had talked over together the chances of
safety, and the character of the danger. Do you return
to the ladies, Corny, and endeavour to keep up their spirits,
while I cross this channel on our right, to the next island,
and see what offers in that direction.
I do not like the idea of your running all the risk alone;
besides, something may occur to require the strength of two,
instead of that of one, to overcome it.
You can go with me as far as the next island, if you
will, where we shall be able to ascertain at once whether it
be ice or water that separates us from the eastern shore. If
the first, you can return as fast as possible for the ladies,
while I look for a place to cross. I do not like the
appearance
of this dam, to be honest with you; and have great
fears for those who are now in the sleigh.
We were in the very act of moving away, when a loud,
cracking noise, that arose within a few yards, alarmed
us both; and running to the spot whence it proceeded, we
saw that a large willow had snapped in two, like a pipe-stem,
and that the whole barrier of ice was marching, slowly, but
grandly, over the stump, crushing the fallen trunk and
branches beneath its weight, as the slow-moving wheel of
the loaded cart crushes the twig. Guert grasped my arm,
and his fingers nearly entered the flesh, under his iron
pressure.
We must quit this spot he said firmly, and at once.
Let us go back to the sleigh.
I did not know Guert's intentions, but I saw it was time
to act with decision. We moved swiftly down to the spot
where we had left the sleigh; and the reader will judge of
our horror, when we found it gone! The whole of the low
point of the island where we had left it, was already covered
with cakes of ice that were in motion, and which had
doubtless
swept off the sleigh during the few minutes that we had
been absent! Looking around us, however, we saw an
object on the river, a little distance below, that I fancied was
the sleigh, and was about to rush after it, when a voice,
filled with alarm, took us in another direction. Mary
Wallace
came out from behind a tree, to which she had fled for
safety, and seizing Guert's arm, implored him not to quit
her again.
Whither has Anneke gone? I demanded, in an agony
I cannot describeI see nothing of Anneke!
She would not quit the sleigh, answered Mary Wallace,
almost panting for breathI imploredentreated her to
follow mesaid you
must
soon return; but she refused to
quit the sleigh. Anneke is in the sleigh, if that can now
be found.
I heard no more; but springing on the still moving cakes
of ice, went leaping from cake to cake, until my sight showed
me that, sure enough, the sleigh was on the bed of the river,
over which it was in slow motion; forced downwards before
the new coating of ice that was fast covering the original
surface. At first I could see no one in the sleigh; but, on
reaching it, I found Anneke buried in the skins. She was
on her knees: the precious creature was asking succour
from God!
I had a wild but sweet consolation in thus finding myself,
as it might be, cut off from all the rest of my kind, in the
midst of that scene of gloom and desolation, alone with
Anneke Mordaunt. The moment I could make her
conscious
of my presence, she inquired after Mary Wallace,
and was much relieved on learning that she was with Guert,
and would not be left by him, for a single instant, again that
night. Indeed, I saw their figures dimly, as they moved
swiftly across the channel that divided the two islands, and
disappear in that direction, among the bushes that lined the
place to which they had gone.
Let us follow, I said eagerly. The crossing is yet
easy, and we, too, may escape to the shore.
Go you! said Anneke, over whom a momentary
physical
torpor appeared to have passed. Go you, Corny,
she said; a man may easily save himself; and you are
an only childthe sole hope of your parents.
Dearest, beloved Anneke!why this indifferencethis
apathy on your own behalf? Are
you
not an only child,
the sole hope of a widowed father?do you forget
him?
No, no, no! exclaimed the dear girl, hurriedly. Help
me out of the sleigh, Corny: there, I will go with you
anywhere
any
howto the end of the world, to save my
father from such anguish!
From that moment the temporary imbecility of Anneke
vanished, and I found her, for the remainder of the time we
remained in jeopardy, quick to apprehend, and ready to
second all my efforts. It was this passing submission to an
imaginary doom, on the one hand, and the headlong effect
of sudden fright on the other, which had separated the two
girls, and which had been the means of dividing the whole
party as described.
I scarcely know how to describe what followed. So
intense
was my apprehension on behalf of Anneke, that I can
safely say, I did not think of my own fate, in the slightest
degree, as disconnected from hers. The self-devoted reliance
with which the dear girl seemed to place all her dependence
on me, would, of itself, have produced this effect, had she
not possessed my whole heart, as I was now so fully aware.
Moments like those, make one alive to all the affections, and
strip off every covering that habit or the dissembling of our
manners is so apt to throw over the feelings. I believe I
both spoke and acted towards Anneke, as one would cling
to, or address the being dearest to him in the world, for the
next few minutes; but, I can suppose the reader will
naturally
prefer learning what we did, under such circumstances,
rather than what we said, or how we felt.
I repeat, it is not easy for me to describe what followed.
I know we first rather ran, than walked, across the channel
on which I had last seen the dim forms of Guert and Mary,
and even crossed the island to its eastern side, in the hope
of being able to reach the shore in that quarter. The
attempt
was useless, for we found the water running down
over the ice like a race-way. Nothing could be seen of our
late companions; and my loud and repeated calls to them
were unanswered.
Our case is hopeless, Cornelius, said Anneke; speaking
with a forced calmness when she found retreat impossible in
that direction, Let us return to the sleigh, and submit to
the will of God!
Beloved Anneke!Think of your father, and summon
your whole strength. The bed of the river is yet firm; we
will cross it, and try the opposite shore.
Cross it we did, my delicate companion being as much
sustained by my supporting arm, as by her own resolution;
but we found the same obstacle to retreat interposing there
also. The island above had turned the waters aside, until
they found an outlet under each bankshooting along their
willowy shores, with the velocity of arrows. By this time,
owing to our hurried movement, I found Anneke so far
exhausted
,
that it was absolutely necessary to pause a minute
to take breath. This pause was also necessary, in order to
look about us, and to decide understandingly as to the
course it was necessary now to pursue. This pause, brief
as it was, moreover, contributed largely to the apparent
horrors of our situation.
The grating, or grinding of the ice above us, cake upon
cake, now sounded like the rushing of heavy winds, or the
incessant roaring of a surf upon the sea-shore. The piles
were becoming visible, by their height and their proximity,
as the ragged barriers set slowly but steadily down upon us;
and the whole river seemed to me to be in motion downwards.
At this awful instant, when I began to think it was the will
of Providence that Anneke and I were to perish together, a
strange sound interrupted the fearful natural accessories of
that frightful scene. I certainly heard the bells of a sleigh;
at first they seemed distant and brokenthen, nearer and
incessant, attended by the rumbling of runners on the ice.
I took off my cap and pressed my head, for I feared my
brain was unsettled. There it came, however, more and
more distinctly, until the trampling of horses' hoofs mingled
in the noise.
Can there be others as unhappy as ourselves! exclaimed
Anneke, forgetting her own fears in generous sympathy.
See, Littlepage!  see,
dear
Cornelius  yonder surely
comes another sleigh!
Come it did, like the tempest, or the whirlwind; passing
within fifty feet of us. I knew it at a glance. It was the
sleigh of Herman Mordaunt, empty; with the horses,
maddened
2 *
by terror, running wherever their fears impelled. As
the sleigh passed, it was thrown on one side; then it was
once more whirled up again; and it went out of sight, with
the rumbling sound of the runners mingling with the jingling
of bells and the tramp of hoofs.
At this instant a loud, distant cry from a human voice,
was certainly heard. It seemed, to me, as if some one
called my name; and Anneke said, she so understood it,
too. The call, if call it was, came from the south, and
from under the western shore. At the next moment, awful
reports proceeded from the barrier above; and, passing an
arm around the slender waist of my lovely companion, to
support her, I began a rapid movement in the direction of
that call. While attempting to reach the western shore, I
had observed a high mound of broken ice, that was floating
down; or rather, was pressed down on the smooth surface
of the frozen river, in advance of the smaller cakes that
came by in the current. It was increasing, in size, by
accessions
from these floating cakes, and threatened to form a
new dam, at some narrow pass below, as soon as of sufficient
size. It occurred to me we should be temporarily safe,
could we reach that mound, for it rose so high as to be above
danger from the water. Thither, then, I ran, almost
carrying
Anneke on my arm; our speed increased by the
terrific
sounds from the dam above us.
We reached the mound, and found the cakes so piled, as
to be able to ascend them; though not without an effort.
After getting up a layer or two, the broken mass became so
irregular and ragged, as to render it necessary for me to
mount first, and then to drag Anneke up after me. This I
did, until exhausted; and we both seated ourselves on the
edge of a cake, in order to recover our breath. While
there, it struck me, that new sounds arose from the river;
and, bending forward to examine, I saw that the water had
forced its way through the dam above, and was coming
down upon us in a torrent.
CHAPTER II.
My heart leaps up when I behold
A rainbow in the sky:
So was it when my life began;
So is it now I am a man;
So be it when I shall grow old,
Or let me die!
The child is father of the man;
And I could wish my days to be
Bound each to each by natural piety.
Wordsworth
.
Five
minutes longer on the ice of the main channel, and
we should have been swept away. Even as we still sat
looking at the frightful force of the swift current, as well as
the dim light of that clouded night would permit, I saw Guert
Ten Eyck's sleigh whirl past us; and, only a minute later,
Herman Mordaunt's followed; the poor, exhausted beasts
struggling in the harness for freedom, that they might swim
for their lives. Anneke heard the snorting of those wretched
horses; but her unpractised eyes did not detect them,
immersed
,
as they were, in the current; nor had she
recognised
the sleigh that whirled past us, as her father's. A
little later, a fearful shriek came from one of the fettered
beasts; such a heart-piercing cry as it is known the horse
often gives. I said nothing on the subject, knowing that
love for her father was one of the great incentives which had
aroused my companion to exertion; and being unwilling to
excite fears that were now latent.
Two or three minutes of rest were all that circumstances
permitted. I could see that everything visible on the river,
was in motion downwards; the piles of ice on which we
were placed, as well as the cakes that glanced by us, in
their quicker descent. Our own motion was slow, on
account
of the mass which doubtless pressed on the shoals of
the west side of the river; as well as on account of the
friction
against the lateral fields of ice, and occasionally against
the shore. Still, we were in motion; and I felt the
necessity
,
on every account, of getting as soon as possible on the
western verge of our floating island, in order to profit by any
favourable occurrence that might offer.
Dear Anneke!  How admirably did she behave that
fearful night! From the moment she regained her entire
consciousness, after I found her praying in the bottom of the
sleigh, down to that instant, she had been as little of an
encumbrance
to my own efforts, as was at all possible.
Reasonable
,
resolute, compliant, and totally without any ill-timed
exhibition of womanly apprehension, she had done all she
was desired to do unhesitatingly, and with intelligence.
In ascending that pile of ice, by no means an easy task
under any circumstances, we had acted in perfect concert;
every effort of mine being aided by one of her own, directed
by my advice and greater experience.
God has not deserted us, dearest Anneke, I said, now
that my companion's strength appeared to have returned,
and we may yet hope to escape. I can anticipate the joy
we shall bring to your father's heart, when he again takes
you to his arms, safe and uninjured.
Dear,
dear
father!What agony he must now be
suffering
on my account.  Come, Corny, let us go to him at
once, if it be possible.
As this was said, the precious girl arose, and adjusted her
tippet in a way that should cause her no encumbrance; like
one ready to set about the execution of a serious task with
all her energies. The muff had been dropped on the river;
for neither of us had any sensibility to cold. The night,
however, was quite mild, for the season; and we probably
should not have suffered, had our exertions been less violent.
Anneke declared herself ready to proceed, and I commenced
the difficult and delicate task of aiding her across an island
composed of icy fragments, in order to reach its western
margin. We were quite thirty feet in the air; and a fall
into any of the numerous caverns, among which we had to
proceed, might have been fatal; certainly would have
crippled
the sufferer. Then the surface of the ice was so smooth
as to render walking on it an exceedingly delicate operation;
more especially as the cakes lay at all manner of
inclinations
to the plane of the horizon. Fortunately, I wore
buckskin
moccasins over my boots; and their rough leather
aided me greatly in maintaining my footing. Anneke, too,
had socks of cloth; without which, I do not think, she could
have possibly moved. By these aids, however, and by
proceeding
with the utmost caution, we had actually succeeded
in attaining our object, when the floating mass shot into an
eddy, and, turning slowly round, under this new influence,
placed us on the outer side of the island again! Not a
murmur escaped Anneke, at this disappointment; but, with
a sweetness of temper that spoke volumes in favour of her
natural disposition, and a resignation that told her training,
she professed a readiness to renew her efforts. To this I
would not consent, however; for I saw that the eddy was
still whirling us about; and I thought it best to escape from
its influence altogether, before we threw away our strength
fruitlessly. Instead of re-crossing the pile, therefore, I told
my fair companion that we would descend to a cake that
lay level on the water, and which projected from the
mass to such a distance, as to be close to the shore, should we
again get near it. This descent was made, after some
trouble, though I was compelled to receive Anneke entirely
into my arms, in order to effect it. Effect it I did; placing
the sweet girl safely at my side, on the outermost and lowest
of all the cakes in our confused pile.
In some respects this change was for the better; while
it did not improve our situation in others. It placed both
Anneke and myself behind a shelter, as respected the wind;
which, though neither very strong nor very cold, had
enough of March about it to render the change acceptable.
It took my companion, too, from a position where motion
was difficult, and often dangerous; leaving her on a level,
even spot, where she could walk with ease and security, and
keep the blood in motion by exercise. Then it put us both
in the best possible situation to profit by any contact with
that shore, along and near which our island was now slowly
moving.
There could no longer be any doubt of the state of the
river in general. It had broken up; spring had come, like
a thief in the night; and the ice below having given way,
while the mass above had acquired too much power to be
resisted, everything was set in motion; and, like the death
of the strong man, the disruption of fields in themselves so
thick and adhesive, had produced an agony surpassing the
usual struggle of the seasons. Nevertheless, the downward
motion had begun in earnest, and the centre of the river
was running like a sluice, carrying away, in its current,
those masses which had just before formed so menacing an
obstacle above.
Luckily, our own pile was a little aside from the great
downward rush. I have since thought, that it touched the
bottom, which caused it to turn, as well as retarded its
movement. Be this as it might, we still remained in a little
bay, slowly turning in a circle; and glad was I to see our
low cake coming round again, in sight of the western shore.
The moment now demanded decision; and I prepared
Anneke
to meet it. A large, low, level cake had driven up on
the shore, and extended out so far as to promise that our
own cake would touch it, in our evolutions. I knew that
the ice, in general, had not broken in consequence of any
weakness of its own, but purely under the weight of the
enormous
pressure from above, and the mighty force of the
current
;
and that we ran little, or no risk, in trusting our
persons
on the uttermost limits of any considerable fragment.
A station was taken, accordingly, near a projection of the
cake we were on; when we waited for the expected contact.
At such moments, the slightest disappointment carries with
it the force of the greatest circumstances. Several times
did it appear, to us, that our island was on the point of
touching the fastened cake, and as often did it incline aside;
at no time coming nearer than within six or eight feet. This
distance it would have been easy enough, for
me
to leap
across, but, to Anneke, it was a barrier as impassable as
the illimitable void. The sweet girl saw this; and, she
acted like herself, under the circumstances. She took my
hand, pressed it, and said earnestly, and with patient
sweetness
You see how it is, Corny; I am not permitted to escape;
but you can easily reach the shore. Go, then, and leave
me in the hands of Providence. Go; I never can forget
what you have already done; but it is useless to perish
together
!
I have never doubted that Anneke was perfectly sincere
in her wish that I should, at least, save my own life. The
feeling with which she spoke; the despair that was coming
over her; and the movement of our island, which, at that
moment, gave signs of shooting away from the shore,
altogether
,
roused me to a sudden, and certainly, to a very bold
attempt. I tremble, even at this distance of time, as I write
the particulars. A small cake of ice was floating in between
us and that which lay firmly fastened to the shore. Its
size was such as to allow it to pass between the two; though
not without coming nearly, if not absolutely, in contact with
one, if not with both. I observed all this; and, saying one
word of encouragement to Anneke, I passed an arm around
her waistwaited the proper momentand sprang forward.
It was necessary to make a short leap, with my precious
burthen on my arm, in order to gain this floating bridge;
but it was done, and successfully. Scarcely permitting
Anneke's
foot to touch this frail support, which was already
sinking under our joint weight, I crossed it at two or three
steps, and threw all my power into a last and desperate
effort. I succeeded here, also; and fell, upon the firmer
cake, with a heart filled with gratitude to God. The touch
told me that we were safe; and, in the next instant, we
reached the solid ground. Under such circumstances, one
usually looks back to examine the danger he has just gone
through. I did so; and saw that the floating cake of ice
had already passed down, and was out of reach; while the
mass that had been the means of saving us, was slowly
following
,
under some new impulse, received from the furious
currents of the river. But we were saved; and most
devoutly
did I thank my God, who had mercifully aided our
escape from perils so imminent.
I was compelled to wait for Anneke, who fell upon her
knees, and remained there quite a minute, before I could aid
her in ascending the steep acclivity which formed the
western
bank of the Hudson, at this particular point. We
reached the top, however, after a little delay, and pausing
once or twice to take breath; when we first became really
sensible of the true character of the scene from which we
had been delivered. Dim as was the light, there was enough
to enable us to overlook a considerable reach of the river,
from that elevated stand. The Hudson resembled chaos
rushing headlong between the banks. As for the cakes of
icesome darting past singly, and others piled as high as
housesof course, the stream was filled with such; but, a
large, dark object was seen coming through that very
channel
,
over which Anneke and I had stood, less than an
hour before, sailing down the current with fearful rapidity.
It was a house; of no great size, it is true, but large enough
to present a singular object on the river. A bridge, of some
size, followed; and a sloop, that had been borne away from
the wharves of Albany, soon appeared in the strange
assemblage
,
that was thus suddenly collected on this great artery
of the colony.
But the hour was late; Anneke was yet to care for; it
was necessary to seek a shelter. Still supporting my lovely
companion, who now began to express her uneasiness on
account of her father, and her other friends, I held the way
inland; knowing that there was a high road parallel to the
river, and at no great distance from it. We reached the
highway, in the course of ten minutes, and turned our faces
northward, as the direction which led towards Albany. We
had not advanced far before I heard the voices of men, who
were coming towards us; and glad was I to recognise that
of Dirck Follock among the number. I called aloud, and
was answered by a shout of exultation, which, as I
afterwards
discovered, spontaneously broke out of his mouth,
when he recognised the form of Anneke. Dirck was
powerfully
agitated when we joined him; I had never, previously,
seen anything like such a burst of feeling from him; and it
was some time before I could address him.
Of course, your whole party is safe? I asked, a little
doubtingly; for I had actually given up all who had been in
Herman Mordaunt's sleigh for lost.
Yes, thank God! all but the sleigh and horses. But
where are Guert Ten Eyck and Miss Wallace?
Gone ashore on the other side of the river; we parted,
and they took that direction, while we came hither. I said
this to quiet Anneke's fears; but I had misgivings about
their having got off the river at all. But let me know the
manner of your own escape.
Dirck then gave us a history of what had passed; the whole
party turning back to accompany us, as soon as I told them
that their erranda search for the horseswas useless.
The substance of what we heard was as follows:In the
first effort to reach the western shore, Herman Mordaunt
had been met by the very obstacle which Guert had foreseen,
and he turned south, hoping to find some spot at which to
land, by going farther from the dam that had formed above.
After repeated efforts, and having nearly lost his sleigh and
the whole party, a point was reached at which Herman
Mordaunt determined to get his female companion on shore,
at every hazard. This was to be done only by crossing
floating cakes of ice, in a current that was already running
at the rate of four or five miles in the hour. Dirck was left
in charge of the horses while the experiment was made; but
seeing the adventurers in great danger, he flew to their
assistance
when
the whole party were immersed, though not
in deep water. Left to themselves, and alarmed with the
floundering in the river and the grinding of the cakes,
Herman
Mordaunt's bays went off in the confusion. Mrs.
Bogart was assisted to the land, and was helped to reach
the nearest dwelling  a comfortable farm-house, about a
quarter of a mile beyond the point where we had met the
party. There Mrs. Bogart had been placed in a warm bed,
and the gentlemen were supplied with such dry clothes as
the rustic wardrobe of these simple people could furnish.
The change made, Dirck was on his way to ascertain what
had become of the sleigh and horses, as has been mentioned.
On inquiry, I found that the spot where Anneke and
myself had landed was quite three miles below the island on
which Guert and I had drawn the sleigh. Nearly the whole
of this distance had we floated with the pile of broken ice, in
the short time we were on it; a proof of the furious rate at
which the current was setting downward. No one had
heard anything of Guert and Mary; but I encouraged my
companion to believe that they were necessarily safe on the
other shore. I certainly deemed this to be very questionable,
but there was no use in anticipating evil.
On reaching the farm-house, Herman Mordaunt's delight
and gratitude may more easily be imagined than described.
He folded Anneke to his heart, and she wept like an infant
on his bosom. Nor was I forgotten in this touching scene,
but came in for a full share of notice.
I want no details, noble young man I am professing
to write the truth, and must be excused for relating such
Vol. II.  3
things as these, but  I want no details, noble young
man, said Herman Mordaunt, squeezing my hand, to feel
certain that, under God, I owe my child's life, for the second
time, to you. I wish to Heaven!but, no matterit is now
too latesome other way may and
must
offer. I scarce
know what I say, Littlepage; but what I
mean
is, to express
faintly, some small portion of the gratitude I feel, and to let
you know how sensibly and deeply your services are felt
and appreciated.
The reader may think it odd, that this incoherent, but
pregnant speech, made little impression on me at the time,
beyond the grateful conviction of having really rendered the
greatest of all services to Anneke and her father; though I
had better occasion to remember it afterwards.
It is unnecessary to dwell more particularly on the
occurrences
at the farm-house. The worthy people did what they
could to make us comfortable, and we were all warm in bed,
in the course of the next half-hour.
On the following morning a wagon was harnessed, and
we left these simple countrymen and womenwho refused
everything like compensation, as a matter of courseand
proceeded homeward. I have heard it said that we
Americans
are mercenary: it may be so, but not a man, probably,
exists in the colonies, who would accept money for such
assistance
.
We were two hours in reaching Albany, on
wheels; and entered the place about ten, in a very different
style from that in which we had quitted it the day before.
As we drove along, the highway frequently led us to points
that commanded views of the river, and we had so many
opportunities of noting the effects of the freshet. Of ice,
very little remained. Here and there a cake or a pile was
seen still adhering to the shore, and occasionally fragments
floated downwards; but, as a rule, the torrent had swept all
before it. I particularly took notice of the island on which
we had sought refuge. It was entirely under water, but its
outlines were to be traced by the bushes which lined its low
banks. Most of the trees on its upper end were cut down,
and all that grew on it would unquestionably have gone, had
not the dam given way as early as it did. A great number
of trees had been broken down on all the islands; and large
tops and heavy trunks were still floating in the current, that
were lately tenants of the forest, and had been violently
torn from their places.
We found all the lower part of Albany, too, under water.
Boats were actually moving through the streets; a
considerable
portion of its inhabitants having no other means of
communicating with their neighbours. A sloop of some size
lay up on one of the lowest spots; and, as the water was
already subsiding, it was said she would remain there until
removed by the shipwrights. Nobody was drowned in the
place; for it is not usual for the people of these colonies to
remain in their beds, at such times, to await the appearance
of the enemy in at their windows. We often read of such
accidents destroying hundreds in the Old World; but, in the
New, human life is of too much account to be unnecessarily
thrown away, and so we make some efforts to preserve it.
As we drove into the street in which Herman Mordaunt
lived, we heard a shout, and turning our heads, we saw
Guert Ten Eyck waving his cap to us, with joy delineated
in every feature of his handsome face. At the next moment
he was at our side.
Mr. Herman Mordaunt, he cried, shaking that
gentleman
most cordially by the hand, I look upon you as one
raised from the dead; you and my excellent neighbour,
Mrs. Bogart, and Mr. Follock, here! How you got off the
river is a mystery to me, for I well know that the water
commonly breaks through first under the west shore. Corny
and Miss AnnekeGod bless you both! Mary Wallace is
in terror lest ill news come from some of you; but I will run
ahead and let her know the glad tidings. It is but five
minutes since I left her, starting at every sound, lest it prove
the foot of some ill-omened messenger.
Guert stopped to say no more. In a minute he was inside
of Herman Mordaunt's housein another Anneke and Mary
Wallace were locked in each other's arms. After
exchanging
salutes, Mrs. Bogart was conveyed to her own residence,
and there was a termination to that memorable expedition.
Guert had less to communicate, in the way of dangers
and marvels, than I had anticipated. It seemed, that when
he and Miss Wallace reached the inner margin of the last
island, a large cake of ice had entered the strait, and got
jammed; or rather, that it went through, forced by the
tremendous pressure above; though not without losing large
masses, as it came in contact with the shores, and grinding
much of its material into powder, by the attrition. Guert's
presence of mind and decision did him excellent service here.
Without delaying an instant, the moment it was in his power,
he led Mary on that cake, and crossed the narrow branch
of the river, which alone separated him from the main land,
on it, dry-shot. The water was beginning to find its way
over this cake, as it usually did on all those that lay low,
and which even stopped in their progress; but this did not
offer any serious obstacles to persons who were so prompt.
Safe themselves, our friends remained to see if we could not
be induced to join them; and the call we heard, was from
Guert, who had actually re-crossed to the island, in the hope
of meeting us, and directing us to a place of safety. Guert
never said anything to me on the subject, himself; but I
subsequently gathered from Mary Wallace's accounts, that
the young man did not rejoin her without a good deal of
hazard and difficulty, and after a long and fruitless search
for his companions. Finding it useless to remain any longer
on the river-side, Guert and his companion held their way
towards Albany. About midnight they reached the ferry,
opposite to the town; having walked quite six miles, filled
with uneasiness on account of those who had been left
behind
.
Guert was a man of decision, and he wisely
determined
it would be better to proceed, than to attempt waking
up the inmates of any of the houses he passed. The river
was now substantially free from ice, though running with
great velocity. But, Guert was an expert oarsman; and,
finding a skiff, he persuaded Mary Wallace to enter it;
actually
succeeding, by means of the eddies, in landing her
within ten feet of the very spot where the hand-sled had
deposited
him and myself, only a few days before. From this
point, there was no difficulty in walking home; and Miss
Wallace actually slept in her own bed, that eventful night;
if, indeed, she
could
sleep.
Such was the termination of this adventure; one that I
have rightly termed memorable. In the end, Jack and
Moses came in safe and sound; having probably swum
ashore. They were found in the public road, only a short
distance from the town, and were brought in to their master
the same day. Every one who took any interest in horses,
and what Dutchman does not?knew Jack and Moses;
and there was no difficulty in ascertaining to whom they
belonged. What is singular, however, both sleighs were
recovered; though at long intervals of time, and under
very different circumstances. That of Guert, wolves' skins
and all, actually went down the whole length of the river on
the ice; passing out to sea through the Narrows. It must
have gone by New York in the night, or doubtless it would
have been picked up; while the difficulty of reaching it, was
its protector on the descent,
above
the town. Once outside
of the Narrows, it was thrown by the tide and winds upon
the shore of Staten Island; where it was hauled to land,
housed, and, being properly advertised in our New York
paper, Guert actually got tidings of it in time to receive it,
skins and all, by one of the first sloops that ascended the
Hudson that year; which was within a fortnight after the
river had opened. The year 1758 was one of great activity,
on account of the movements of the army, and no time was
then unnecessarily lost.
The history of Herman Mordaunt's sleigh was very
different
.
The poor bays must have drowned soon after we
saw them floating past us in the torrent. Of course, life
had no sooner left them, than they sank to the bottom of the
river, carrying with them the sleigh to which they were
still attached. In a few days the animals rose to the
surface
as
is usual with all swollen bodiesbringing up the
sleigh again. In this condition, the wreck was overtaken
by a downward bound sloop, the men of which saved the
sleigh, harness, skins, foot-stoves, and such other articles as
would not float away.
Our adventure made a good deal of noise in the circle of
Albany; and I have reason to think that my own conduct
was approved by those who heard of it. Bulstrode paid me
an especial visit of thanks, the very day of my return,
when the following conversation took place between us:
You seem fated, my dear Corny, the Major observed,
after he had paid the usual compliments, to be always
serving me in the most material way, and I scarcely know
how to express all I feel on the occasion. First, the lion,
and now this affair of the riverbut, that Guert will drown,
3 *
or make away with the whole family before the summer is
over, unless Mr. Mordaunt puts a stop to
his
interference.
This accident was one that might have overtaken the
oldest and most prudent man in Albany. The river seemed
as solid as the street when we went on it; and another hour,
even as it was, would have brought us all home, in entire
safety.
Ay, but that hour came near bringing death and
desolation
into the most charming family in the colony; and you
have been the means of averting the heaviest part of the
blow. I wish to Heaven, Littlepage, that you would
consent
to come into the army! Join us as a volunteer, the
moment we move, and I will write to Sir Harry to obtain a
pair of colours for you. As soon as he hears that we are
indebted to your coolness and courage for the life of Miss
Mordaunt, he will move heaven and earth, to manifest his
gratitude. The instant this good parent made up his mind
to accept Miss Mordaunt as a daughter, he began to consider
her as a child of his own.
And AnnekeMiss Mordaunt, herself, Mr. Bulstrode
does she regard Sir Henry as a father?
Why, that must be coming by slow degrees, as a matter
of course, you know. Women are slower than us men to
admit such totally novel impressions; and I dare say Anneke
fancies one father enough for her, just at this moment:
though she sends very pleasant messages to Sir Harry, I
can assure you, when in the humour! But, what makes
you so grave, my good Corny?
Mr. Bulstrode, I conceive it no more than fair, to be as
honest as yourself in this matter. You have told me that
you are a suitor for Miss Mordaunt's hand; I will now own
to you that I am your rival.
My companion heard this declaration with a quiet smile,
and the most perfect good-nature.
So you actually wish to become the husband of Anneke
Mordaunt, yourself, my dear Corny, do you? he said, so
coolly, that I was at a loss to know of what sort of materials
the man could be made.
I do, Major Bulstrodeit is the first and last wish of
my heart.
Since you seem disposed to reciprocate my confidence,
you will not take offence if I ask you a question or two!
Certainly not, sir; your own frankness shall be a rule
for my government.
Have you ever let Miss Mordaunt know that such are
your wishes?
I have, sir; and that in the plainest terms  such as
cannot well be misunderstood.
What! last night?On that infernal ice!While she
thought her life was in your hands!
Nothing was said on the subject, last night, for we had
other thoughts to occupy our minds.
It would have been a most ungenerous thing to take
advantage
of a lady's fears
Major Bulstrode!I cannot submit
Hush, my dear Corny, interrupted the other, holding
out a hand in a most quiet and friendly manner; there
must be no misunderstanding between you and me. Men
are never greater simpletons, than when they let the secret
consciousness of their love of life push them into swaggering
about their honour; when their honour has, in fact, nothing
to do with the matter in hand. I shall not quarrel with you;
and must beg you, in advance, to receive my apologies for
any little indecorum into which I may be betrayed by
surprise
;
as for great pieces of indecorum, I shall endeavour
to avoid
them
.
Enough has been said, Mr. Bulstrode; I am no wrangler,
to quarrel with a shadow; and, I trust, not in the least,
that most contemptible of all human beings, a social bully,
to be on all occasions menacing the sword or the pistol.
Such men usually
do
nothing, when matters come to a
crisis. Even when they fight, they fight bunglingly, and
innocently.
You are right, Littlepage, and I honour your sentiments.
I have remarked that the most expert swordsman with his
tongue, and the deadest shot at a shingle, are commonly as
innocent as lambs of the shedding of blood on the ground.
They can sometimes screw themselves up to
meet
an
adversary
,
but it exceeds their powers to use their weapons
properly
,
when it comes to serious work. The swaggerer is
ever a coward at heart, however well he may wear a mask
for a time. But enough of this.We understand each other,
and are to remain friends, under all circumstances. May I
question further?
Ask
what you please, BulstrodeI shall answer, or not,
at my own discretion.
Then, permit me to inquire, if Major Littlepage has
authorized you to offer proper settlements?
I am authorized to offer nothing.Nor is it usual for
the husband to make settlements on his wife, in these
colonies
,
further than what the law does for her, in favour of
her own. The father, sometimes, has a care for the third
generation. I should expect Herman Mordaunt to settle
his
estate on his daughter, and her rightful heirs, let her marry
whom she may.
Ay, that is a very American notion; and one on which
Herman Mordaunt, who remembers his extraction, will
be little likely to act. Well, Corny, we are rivals, as it
would seem; but that is no reason we should not remain
friends. We understand each otherthough, perhaps, I
ought to tell you all.
I should be glad to know
all
, Mr. Bulstrode; and can
meet my fate, I hope, like a man. Whatever it may cost
me, if Anneke prefer another, her happiness will be dearer
to me than my own.
Yes, my dear fellow, we all say and think so at
one-and-twenty
;
which is about your age, I believe. At
two
and-twenty, we begin to see that our own happiness has an
equal claim on us; and, at
three
-and-twenty, we even give
it the preference. However, I will be just, if I am selfish.
I have no reason to believe Anne Mordaunt does prefer me;
though my
perhaps
is not altogether without a meaning,
either.
In which case, I may possibly be permitted to know to
what it refers?
It refers to the father; and, I can tell you, my fine
fellow
,
that fathers are of some account, in the arrangement
of marriages between parties of any standing. Had not Sir
Harry authorized my own proposals, where should I have
been? Not a farthing of settlement could I have offered,
while he remained Sir Harry; notwithstanding I had the
prodigious advantage of the entail. I can tell you what it
is, Corny; the existing power is always an important power;
since we all think more of the present time, than of the
future. That is the reason so few of us get to Heaven. As
for Herman Mordaunt, I deem it no more than fair to tell
you, he is on my side, heart and hand. He likes my offers
of settlement; he likes my family; he likes my rank, civil
and military; and I am not altogether without the hope, that
he likes
me
.
I made no direct answer, and the conversation soon
changed. Bulstrode's declaration, however, caused me to
remember both the speech and manner of Herman
Mordaunt
,
when he thanked me for saving his daughter's life.
I now began to reflect on it; and reflected on it much during
the next few months. In the end, the reader will learn the
effect it had on my happiness.
CHAPTER III.
Good Sir, why do you start; and seem to fear
Things that do sound so fair? I' the name of truth,
Are ye fantastical, or that indeed
Which outwardly ye show?
Banquo
.
As
I have said already, the adventure on the river made
a good deal of noise, in that simple community; and it had
the effect to render Guert and myself a sort of heroes, in a
small way; bringing me much more into notice, than would
otherwise have been the case. I thought that Guert, in
particular
,
would be likely to reap its benefit; for, various
elderly persons, who were in the habit of frowning,
whenever
his name was mentioned, I was given to understand,
could now smile; and two or three of the most severe among
the Albany moralists, were heard to say that, after all,
there was some good about that Guert Ten Eyck. The
reader will not require to be told, that a high-school
moralist
,
in a place as retired and insulated as Albany, must
necessarily be a being that became subject to a very severe
code. Morality, as I understand the matter, has a good
deal of convention about it. There is town-morality and
country-morality, all over the world, as they tell me. But,
in America, our morals were, and long have been, separated
into three great and very distinct classes; viz.New
England
,
or puritan-morals; middle colonies, or liberal morals;
and southern colonies, or latitudinarian morals. I shall not
pretend to point out all the shades of difference in these
several
schools; though that in which I had myself been taught,
was necessarily the most in conformity with my own tastes.
There were minor shades to be found in the same school;
Guert and myself belonging to different classes. His morals
were of the Dutch class; while mine more properly
belonged
to the English. The great characteristic of the
Dutch school, was the tendency to excess that prevailed,
when indulgencies were sought. With them, it did not rain
often; but, when it did rain, it was pretty certain to pour.
Old Col. Follock was a case in point, on this score; nor
was his son Dirck, young and diffident as he was, altogether
an exception to the rule. There was not a more respectable
man in the colony, in the main, than Col. Van Valkenburgh.
He was well connected; had a handsome unencumbered
estate; and money at interest;was a principal prop, in the
church of his neighbourhood; was esteemed as a good
husband
;
a good father; a true friend; a kind neighbour; an
excellent, and loyal subject, and a thoroughly honest man.
Nevertheless, Col. Van Valkenburgh had his weak times
and seasons. He
would
have a frolic; and the Dominie
was obliged to wink at this propensity. Mr. Worden often
nicknamed him Col. Frolic. His frolics might be divided
into two classes; viz. the moderate and immoderate. Of
the first, he had two or three turns a year; and these were
the occasions on which he commonly visited Satanstoe,
or had my father with him at Rockrockarock, as his
own place, in Rockland, was called. On these visits,
whether to or from, there was a large consumption of tobacco,
beer, cider, wine, rum, lemons, sugar, and the other
ingredients
of punch, toddy and flip; but no outrageously durable
excesses. There was much laughing, a great deal of good
feeling, many stories, and regular repetitions of old
adventures
,
in the way of traditional narrations; but nothing that
could be called decided excesses. It is true, that my
grandfather
,
and my father, and the Rev. Mr. Worden, and Col.
Follock, were much in the habit of retiring to their beds a
little confused in their brains; the consequence of so much
tobacco-smoke, as Mr. Worden always maintained; but
everything was decent, and in order. The parson, for
instance
,
invariably pulled up on a Friday; and did not take
his place in the circle until Monday evening, again; which
gave him fully twenty-four hours, to cool off in, before he
ascended the pulpit. I will say this, for Mr. Worden, that
he was very systematic and methodical in the observance of
all his duties; and I have known him, when he happened
to be late at dinner, on discovering that my father had
omitted to say grace, insist on everybody's laying down
their knives and forks, while he asked a blessing; even
though it were after the fish was actually eaten. No, no;
Mr. Worden was a particular person, about all such things;
and it was generally admitted, that he had been the means
of causing grace to be introduced into several families, in
Westchester; in which it had never been the practice to
have it, before his examples and precepts were known to
them.
I had not been acquainted with Guert Ten Eyck a
fortnight
,
before I saw he had a tendency to the same sort of
excesses as those to which Col. Van Valkenburgh was
addicted
.
There was an old French Huguenot living near
Satanstoeor rather, the son of one, who still spoke his
father's language  and who used to call Col. Follock's
frolics his
grands couchers
, and his
petit couchers
;
[2]
[2]
In plain English, the great go-to-bed, and the little
go-to-bed
.
There may be a portion of our readers who are not aware that
the word levee, meaning a morning reception by a great man, is
derived from the French lever, which means to rise, or to get
up. The kings of France were in the habit of receiving homage at
their morning toilets; a strange custom, that doubtless had its origin
in the
empressement
of the courtier to inquire how his master had
slept; which receptions were divided into two classes, the
grand
lever
, and the
petit lever
the great getting-up or the little
getting-up. The first was an occasion of more state than the last.
Even down to the time of Charles X., the court papers seldom went a
week without announcing that the king had signed the contract of
marriagea customary compliment in France, among friends of this
or that personageat the grand lever, or at the petit lever; the
first, I believe, but am not certain, being the greater honour of the
two.
Editor
.
inasmuch as he usually got to bed at the last, without
assistance
;
while at the first, it was indispensable that some aid
should be proffered. It was these grands couchers at
which my father never assisted. On these occasions, the
colonel invariably held his orgies over in Rockland, in the
society of men of purely Dutch extraction; there being
something exclusive in the enjoyment. I have heard it said
that these last frolics sometimes lasted a week, on really
important
occasions; during the whole of which time the
colonel and all near him were as happy as lords. These
grands couchers
, however, occurred but rarelycoming
round, as it might be, like leap-years, just to regulate the
calendar, and adjust the time.
As for my new friend, Guert, he made no manifestation
towards a
grand coucher
during the time I remained at
Albanythis his attachment to Mary Wallace forbadebut,
I discovered by means of hints and allusions, that he
had
been engaged in one or two such affairs, and that there was
still a longing for them in his bones. It was owing to her
consciousness of the existence of such weaknesses, and her
own strong aversion to anything of the sort, that, I am
persuaded
,
Mary Wallace was alone induced to hesitate about
accepting Guert's weekly offer of his hand. The tenderness
she evidently felt for him, now shone too obviously in her
eyes, to leave any doubt in my mind of Guert's final success;
for what woman ever refused long to surrender, when the
image of the besieger had taken its place in the citadel of
her heart! Even Anneke received Guert with much favour,
after his excellent behaviour on the river; and I fancied that
everything was going on most flatteringly for my friend,
while it seemed to me that I made no advances in my own
suit. Such, at least, were my notions on the subject, at the
very moment when my new friend, as it appeared, was
nearly driven to desperation.
It was near the end of April, or about a month after our
perilous adventure on the ice, that Guert came to seek me,
one fine spring morning, with something very like despair
depicted in his fine, manly face. During the whole of that
month, it ought to be premised, I had not dared to speak of
love to Anneke. My attentions and visits were incessant
and pointed, but my tongue had been silent. The diffidence of
real admiration had held me tongue-tied; and I foolishly
fancied
there would be something like presuming on the services
I had so lately rendered, in urging my suit so soon after the
occurrence of the events I have described. I had even the
romance to think it might be taking an undue advantage
of Bulstrode, to wish to press my claims at a moment when
the common object of our suit might be supposed to feel the
influence of a lively gratitude. These were the notions and
sentiments of a very young man, it must be confessed; but
I do not know that I ought to feel ashamed of them. At
all events, they existed; and they had produced the effect I
have mentioned, leaving me to fall, each day, more
desperately
in love, while I made no sensible advances in
preferring
my suit. Guert was very much in the same situation,
with this difference, however; he made it a point to offer
himself, distinctly, each Monday morning, invariably
receiving
for an answer no; if the lady were to be pressed for
a definite reply; but leaving some glimmering of hope,
should time be given for her to make up her mind. The
visit of Guert's, to which I have just alluded, was after one
of the customary offers, and usual replies; the offer direct,
and the no, tempered by the doubting and thoughtful
brow, the affectionate smile, and the tearful eye.
Corny, said my friend, throwing down his hat with a
most rueful aspect; for, winter having departed, and spring
come, we had all laid aside our fur-capsCorny, I have
just been refused again! That word, `no,' has got to be so
common with Mary Wallace, that I am afraid her tongue will
never know how to utter a `yes!' Do you know, Corny, I
have a great mind to consult Mother Doortje!
Mother who?  You do not mean Mr. Mayor's cook,
surely!
No;
Mother
Doortje. She is said to be the best
fortune-teller
that has ever lived in Albany. But, perhaps, you do
not believe in fortune-tellers; some people I know do not?
I cannot say that I have much belief, or unbelief, on
the subject, never having seen anything of that sort.
Have they, then, no fortune-teller, no person who has
the dark art, in New York?
Vol. II.  4
I have heard of such people, but have never had an
opportunity of seeing or hearing for myself. If you
do
go
to see this Mother Dorrichy, or whatever you call her, I
should like amazingly to be of the party.
[3]
[3]
Doortjepronounced Doort-yaymeans Dorothea. Mr.
Littlepage
uses a sort of corruption of the pronunciation. I well
remember
a fortune-teller of that name, in Albany; though it could not have
been the Doortje of 1758.
Editor
.
Guert was delighted to hear this, and he caught cagerly
at the offer. If I would stand his friend he would go at
once; but he confessed he did not like to trust himself all
alone in the old woman's company.
I am, perhaps, the only man of my time of life, in
Albany, who has not, sooner or later, consulted Mother
Doortje; he added. I do not know how it is, but,
somehow
,
I have never liked to tempt fortune by going to
question
her! One never can tell what such a being may say;
and should it be evil, why it might make a man very
miserable
.
I am sure I want no more trouble, as it is, than to
find Mary Wallace so undetermined about having me!
Then you do not mean to go, after all! I am not only
ready, but anxious to accompany you.
You mistake me, Corny. Go I will, now, though she
tell me that which will cause me to cut my throatbut, we
must not go as we are; we must disguise ourselves, in order
that she may not know us. Everybody goes disguised; and
then they have an opportunity of learning if she is in a good
vein, or not, by seeing if she can tell anything about their
business, or habits, in the first place. If she fail in that, I
should not care a straw for any of the rest. So, go to work,
Corny, and dress yourself for the occasionborrow some
clothes of the people in the house, here, and come round to
me, as soon as you please; I shall be ready, for I often go
disguised to frolicsyes, unlucky devil that I am, and come
back disguised, too!
Everything was done, as desired. By means of a servant
in the tavern, I was soon equipped in a way that satisfied
me was very successful; inasmuch as I passed Dirck, in
quitting the house, and my old, confidential friend did not
recognise me. Guert was in as good luck, as I actually
asked himself for himself, when he opened the door for my
admission. The laugh, and the handsome face, however,
soon let me into the secret, and we sallied forth in high
spirits; almost forgetting our misgivings concerning the
future, in the fun of passing our acquaintances in the street,
without being known.
Guert was much more artistically and knowingly
disguised
,
than I was myself. We both had put on the clothes
of labourers; Guert wearing a smock-frock that he
happened
to own for his fishing occupations in summer  but I
had my usual linen in view, and wore all the ordinary minor
articles of my daily attire. My friend pointed out some of
these defects, as we went along, and an attempt was made
to remedy them. Mr. Worden coming in view, I determined
to stop him, and speak to him in a disguised voice, in order
to ascertain if it were possible to deceive him.
Your sarvant, Tominie, I said, making an awkward
bow, as soon as we got near enough to the parson to
address
him; be you ter Tominie, that marries folk on a
pinch?
Ay, or on a handful, liking the last best.Why, Corny,
thou rogue, what does all this mean?
It was necessary to let Mr. Worden into the secret; and
he no sooner learned the business we were on, than he
expressed
a wish to be of the party. As there was no
declining
,
we now went to the inn, and gave him time to assume
a suitable disguise. As the divine was a rigid observer of
the costume of his profession, and was most strictly a man
of his
cloth
, it was a very easy matter for him to make such
a change in his exterior, as completely to render him
incognito
.
When all was ready, we went finally forth, on our
errand.
I go with you, Corny, on this foolish business, said the
Rev. Mr. Worden, as soon as we were fairly on our way,
to comply with a promise made your excellent mother, not
to let you stray into any questionable company, without
keeping a fatherly eye over you. Now, I regard a
fortune-teller's
,
as a doubtful sort of society; therefore, I feel it to
be a duty, to make one of this party.
I do not know whether the Rev. Mr. Worden succeeded
in deceiving himself; but, I very well know, he did not
succeed
in deceiving me. The fact was, he loved a frolic; and
nothing made him happier, than to have an opportunity of
joining in just such an adventure as that we were on.
Judging from the position of her house, and the appearance
of things in and around it, the business of Mother Doortje
was not of the most lucrative sort. Dirt and poverty were
two things not easily encountered, in Albany; and, I do not
say, that we found very positive evidence of either, here;
but there was less neatness than was usual in that
ultra-tidy
community; and, as for any great display of
abundance
,
it was certainly not to be met with.
We were admitted by a young woman, who gave us to
understand that Mother Doortje had a couple of customers,
already; but she invited us to sit down in an outer room,
promising that our turn should be the next. We did so,
accordingly
,
listening, through a door that was a little ajar,
with no small degree of curiosity, to what was passing
within. I accidentally took a seat in a place that enabled
me to see the legs of one of the fortune-teller's customers;
and, I thought, immediately, that the striped stockings were
familiar to me; when the nasal, and very peculiar
intonation
of Jason, put the matter out of all doubt. He spoke in
an earnest manner; which rendered him a little incautious;
while the woman's tones were low and mumbled.
Notwithstanding
,
we all overheard the following discourse
Well, now, Mother Dorrichay, said Jason, in a very
confiding sort of way, I 've paid you well, for this here
business, and I want to know if there is any chance, for a
poor man, in this colony, who doesn't want for friends, or,
for that matter, merit?
That 's
yourself
, mumbled the female voice  in the
way one announces a discoveryyes, I see, by the cards,
that your question applies to yourself. You are a
young
man, that wants not for friends; and you have
merit!
You
have friends that you deserve; the cards tells me
that!
Well, I 'll not deny the truth of what you assert; and, I
must say, Dirck, it
is
a little strange, this woman, who
never saw me before, should know me so well  my very
natur', as it might be. But, do you think, I shall do well
to follow up the affair I am now on, or that I had best give
it up?
Give up nothing, answered the oracle, in a very
oracular
manner, shuffling the cards as she spoke; no, give
up nothing, but keep all you can. That is the way to
thrive, in this world.
By the Hokey, Dirck, she gives good advice, and I think
I shall follow it! But how about the land, and the
mill-seat
or,
rather, how about the particular things I 'm
thinking
about?
You are thinking of purchasing  yes, the cards say
purchasing; or is it `disposing'
Why, as I 've got none to sell, it can't very well be
disposing, Mother.
Yes, I 'm rightthis Jack of Clubs settles the matter
you are thinking of buying some landAh! there 's water
running down-hill; and here I see a pondWhy, you are
thinking of buying a mill-seat.
By the Hokey!Who would have thought this, Dirck!
Not a
mill;
no, there is
no
mill built; but a mill-
seat
.
Six, king, three and an ace; yes, I see how it isand you
wish to get this mill-seat at much less than its real value.
Much
less; not less, but
much
less.
Well, this is wonderful! I 'll never gainsay
fortin-tellin'
ag'in! exclaimed Jason. Dirck, you are to say
nothin' of this, or
think
nothin' of thisas it 's all in
confidence
,
you know. Now, jist put in a last word, about the
end of life, Mother, and I 'll be satisfied. What you have
told me about my fortin and earnin's must be true, I think, for
my whole heart is in them; but I should like to know, after
enjoying so much wealth and happiness as you 've foretold,
what sort of an end I am to make of it?
An excellent endfull of grace, and hope, and christian
faith. I see here, something that looks like a clergyman's
gownwhite sleevesbook under the arm
That can't be
me
, Mother, as I 'm no lover of forms,
but belong to the platform.
Oh! I see how it is, now; you dislike Church of
England
people, and could throw dirt at them. Yes, yeshere
you
area presbyterian deacon, and one that can lead in a
private meeting, on an occasion.
Come, Dirck, I 'm satisfiedlet us go; we have kept
Mother Doorichaise long enough, and I heard some visiters
come in, just now. Thank you, motherthank you, with
4 *
all my heart; I think there
must
be some truth in this
fortin-tellin'
after all!
Jason now arose, and walked out of the house, without
even deigning to look at usand consequently without our
being recognised. But Dirck lingered a minute, not yet
satisfied with what had been already told him.
Do you really think I shall never be married, Mother?
he asked, in a tone that sufficiently betrayed the importance
he attached to the answer. I wish to know that
particularly
,
before I go away!
Young man, answered the fortune-teller in an oracular
manner; what has been said, has been said! I cannot
make
fortunes, but only reveal them. You have heard that
Dutch blood is in your veins; but you live in an English
colony.
Your
king is
her
king; while
she
is your
queen
and you are not her master. If you can find a woman of
English blood that has a Dutch heart, and has no English
suitors, go forward, and you will succeed; but, if you do
not, remain as you are until time shall end. These are my
words, and these are my thoughts; I can say no more.
I heard Dirck sigh  poor fellow! he was thinking of
Anneke  and he passed through the outer room without
once raising his eyes from the floor. He left Mother Doortje,
as much depressed in spirits, as Jason had left her elated;
the one looking forward to the future with a selfish and
niggardly hope, while the other regarded it with a feeling as
forlorn as the destruction of all his youthful fancies could
render any view of his after-life. The reader may feel
disposed
to smile at the idea of Dirck Van Valkenburgh's
possessing youthful fanciesregarding the young man in
the quiet, unassuming manner in which he has hitherto been
portrayed by me; but it would be doing great injustice to
his heart and feelings, to figure him to the mind, as a being
without deep sensibilities. I have always supposed that this
interview with Mother Doortje had a lasting influence on the
fortunes of poor Dirck; nor am I at all certain its effects
did not long linger in the temperament of some others that
might be named.
As our turns had now come, we were summoned to the
presence of this female soothsayer. It is unnecessary to
describe
the apartment in which we found Mother Doortje.
It had nothing unusual in it, with the exception of a raven,
that was hopping about the floor, and which appeared to be
on the most familiar terms with its mistress. Doortje,
herself
,
was a woman of quite sixty, wrinkled, lean, and
haglike
;
and, I thought, some care had been taken, in her dress,
to increase the effect of this, certainly her natural
appearance
.
Her cap was entirely of black muslin; though her
dress itself, was grey. The eye of this woman was of the
colour of her gown; and it was penetrating, restless, and
deep-seated. Altogether, she looked the character well.
On our entrance, after saluting the fortune-teller, each of
us laid a French crown on the table at which she was
seated. This coin had become quite current among us,
since the French troops had penetrated into our colony; and
it was even said they purchased supplies with it, from
certain
of our own people. As we had paid the highest price
ever given, for these glimpses into futurity, we thought
ourselves
entitled to have the pages of the sealed book freely
opened to us.
Do you wish to see me together; or shall I
communicate
with one at a time? demanded Doortje, in her husky,
sepulchral voice; which, it struck me, obtained its peculiar
tones partly from nature, and partly from art.
It was settled that she should commence with Mr.
Worden
;
but, that all might remain in the room the whole time.
While we were talking over this point, Doortje's eyes were
by no means fixed; but, I remarked, that they wandered
from person to person; like those of one who was gathering
information. Many persons do not believe, at all, in the
art of the fortune-teller; but insist that there is nothing more
in it than trick and management; pretending that this very
woman kept the blacks of the town in pay, to bring her
information; and that she never told anything of the past,
which was true, that had not been previously communicated to
herself. I shall not pretend to affirm that the art goes as far as
many imagine; but, it strikes me, that it is very presuming, to
deny that there is some truth in these matters. I do not
wish to appear credulous; though, at the same time, I hold
it to be wrong to deny our testimony to facts that we are
convinced are true.
[4]
[4]
It is quite evident, that Mr. Cornelius Littlepage was, to a
degree
at least, a believer in the fortune-teller's art. This was,
however
,
no more than was common, a century since. Quite within my
recollection, the Albanians had a celebrated dealer in the black art, who
was regularly consulted, on the subject of all lost spoons, and the
pilfering of servants, by the good housewives of the town, as recently
as my school-boy days. The Dutch, like the Germans, appear to have
been prone to this species of superstition; from which, even the
English
of education were far from being free, a century since.
Mademoiselle
Normand existed in the present century, even, in the sceptical
capital of France. But, the somnambulist is taking the place of the
ancient soothsayer, in our own times.
Editor
.
Doortje commenced by shuffling an exceedingly dirty
pack of cards; which had probably been used five hundred
times, on similar duty. She next caused Mr. Worden to
cut these cards; when a close and musing examination
succeeded
.
All this time, not a syllable was said; though we
were startled by a low whistle, from the woman; which
brought the raven upon her shoulder.
Well, Mother, cried Mr. Worden, with a little
impatience
,
at what he fancied mummery, I am dying to hear
what
has
happened, that I may put the more faith in what
is
to happen. Tell me something of the crop of wheat, I
put into the ground, last autumn; how many bushels I
sowed, and on how many acres; whether on new land, or
on old?
Ay, ay, you have sowed!  and you have sowed!
answered the woman, on a high key, for her; but your
seed fell among tares, and on the flinty ground; and you 'll
never reap a soul among 'em all! Broadcast may you sow
but narrow will be your harvest.
The Rev. Mr. Worden gave a loud hemplaced his arms
akimboand seemed determined to brazen it out; though, I
could easily perceive, that he felt excessively awkward.
How is it, with my cattle? and shall I send much
mutton
to market, this season?
A wolf, in sheep's clothing! muttered Doortje. No
noyou like hot suppers, and ducks, and lectures to cooks,
more than gathering in the harvest of the Lord!
Come, this is folly, woman! exclaimed the parson,
angrily. Give me some common sense, for my good
French crown. What do you see, in that knave of
diamonds
,
that you study its face so closely?
A loping Dominie!a loping Dominie! screamed the
hag, several times, rather than exclaiming aloud. See!
he runs, for life; but Beelzebub will overtake him!
There was a sudden, and dead pause; for the Rev. Mr.
Worden had caught up his hat, and darted from the room;
quitting the house, as if already busily engaged in the race
alluded to. Guert shook his head, and looked serious; but,
perceiving that the woman was already tranquil, and was
actually shuffling the cards anew, in his behalf, he advanced
to learn his fate. I saw the eyes of Doortje fastened keenly
on him, as he took his stand near the table, and the corners
of her mouth curled in a significant smile. What that
meant, exactly, I have never been able to ascertain.
I suppose, you wish to know something of the past, like
all the rest of them, mumbled the woman, so that you
may have faith in what you hear about the future?
Why, Mother, answered Guert, passing his hand
through his own fine head of natural curls, and speaking a
little hastily, I do not know that it is any great matter
about the past. What is done, is done; and there is an end
of it. A young man may not wish to hear of such things,
at the moment, perhaps, when he is earnestly bent on doing
better. We are all young, once in our lives, and we can
grow old only after having been so.
YesyesI see how it is! muttered Doortje. So
soturkeysturkeys; ducksducksquaackquaack
quaackgobble, gobble, gobble Here, the old hag set
up such an imitation of ducks, geese, turkeys, game-cocks,
and other birds, that one who was in an outer room, might
well have imagined he heard the cries of a regular
poultry-yard
.
I was startled, myself, for the imitation was very
admirablebut Guert was obliged to wipe the perspiration
from his face.
That will dothat will do, Mother! the young man
exclaimed. I see, you know all about it; and there is no
use in attempting disguises with you. Now, tell me, if I
am ever to be a married man, or not. My errand here, is
to learn that fact; and I may as well own it, at once.
The world has many women in it  and fair faces are
plenty, in Albany, once more mumbled the woman, ex
amining her cards, with great attention. A youth, like
you, might marry twice, even.
No,
that
is impossible; if I do not marry a particular
lady, I shall never marry at all.
YesyesI see how it is!You are in love, young
man.
D'ye hear that, Corny! Isn't it wonderful, how these
creatures can tell? I admit the truth of what you say; but,
describe to me the lady that I love.
Guert had forgotten, altogether, that the use of the word
lady
, completely betrayed the fact of his disguise; since no
man, truly of his dress and air, would think of applying
such a word to his sweetheart.
[5]
[5]
This might have been true, in 1758; but is not true for 1845.
Editor
.
I could not prevent these
little betrayals of himself, however; for, by this time, my
companion was too much excited, to hear reason.
The lady that you love, answered the fortune-teller,
deliberately, and with the manner of one that proceeded with
great confidence, is
very
handsome, in the first place.
True as the sun in the heavens, Mother!
Then, she is virtuous, and amiable, and wise, and witty,
and good.
The Gospel is not more certain! Corny, this surpasses
belief!
Then, she is
young
. Yes, she is young, and fair, and
good; three things that make her much sought after.
Why is she so long reflecting on my offers, Mother;
tell me that, I beg of you; or, will she ever consent to have
me?
I seeI see  it is all here, on the cards. The lady
cannot make up her mind.
Listen to that, now, Corny; and do not tell me there is
nothing in this art.
Why
does she not make up her mind?
For Heaven's sake, let me know
that?
A man may tire
of offering to marry an angel, and getting no answer. I wish
to know the reason of her doubts.
A woman's mind is not easily read. Some are in haste,
while some are not. I am of opinion you wish to get an
answer before the lady is ready to give it. Men must learn
to wait.
She really seems to know all about it, Corny! Much
as I have heard of this woman, she exceeds it all! Good
Mother, can you tell me how I can gain the consent of the
woman I love?
That is only to be had by asking. Ask once, ask twice,
ask thrice.
By St. Nicholas! I have asked, already, twenty times!
If asking would do it, she would have been my wife a month
since. What do you think, Cornyno, I 'll not do itit is
not manly to get the secrets of a woman's heart, by means
like theseI 'll not ask her!
The crown is paid, and the truth must be said. The
lady you love, loves you, and she does not love you; she
will have you, and she won't have you; she thinks
yes
, and
she says
no
.
Guert now trembled all over, like an aspen-leaf.
I do not believe there is any harm, Corny, in asking
whether I gained or lost by the affair of the river? I
will
ask her that much, of a certainty. Tell me, Mother, am I
better or worse, for a certain thing that happened about a
month agoabout the time that the ice went, and that we
had a great freshet?
Guert Ten Eyck, why do you try me thus? demanded
the fortune-teller, solemnly. I knew your father, and I
knew your mother; I knew your ancestors in Holland, and
their children in America. Generations on generations have
I known your people, and you are the first that I have seen
so ill-clad! Do you suppose, boy, that old Doortje's eyes
are getting dim, and that she cannot tell her own nation?
I saw you on the riverha! ha! 't was a pleasant sight
Jack and and Moses, too; how they snorted, and how they
gallopedl Crackcrackthat 's the icethere comes the
water!See, that bridge may hit you on the head! Do
you
take care of this bird, and do
you
take care of
that
and
all will come round with the seasons. Answer me one thing,
Guert Ten Eyck, and answer me truly. Know you ever a
young man who goes quickly into the bush?
I do, Mother; this young man, my friend, intends to go
in a few days, or as soon as the weather is settled.
Good! go you with him  absence makes a young
woman know her own mind, when asking will gain nothing.
Go you with him, I say; and if you hear muskets fired,
go near them;
fear
will sometimes make a young woman
speak. You have your answer, and I will tell no more.
Come hither, young owner of many half-joes, and touch that
card.
I did as ordered; when the woman began to mumble to
herself, and to run over the pack as rapidly as she could.
Kings, aces, and knaves were examined, one after another,
until she had got the Queen of Hearts in her hand, which
she held up to me in triumph.
That is
your
lady. She is a queen of too many hearts!
The Hudson did that for you, that it has done for many a
poor man before you. Yes, yes; the river did you good;
but water will drown, as well as make tears. Do
you
beware
of Knights Barrownights!
[6]
[6]
In the colony of New York, there lived but one titled man, for a
considerable period. It was the celebrated Sir William Johnson,
Bart., of Johnson Hall, Johnstown, Albany, now Fulton County.
The son of Sir William Johnson was knighted during his father's
life-time, and was Sir John while Sir William was living. At the
death of his father, he was Sir John Johnson, Kt. & Bart.; and it
was usual for the common class of people to style him a Knight, or
Barrow
night
.
Editor
.
Here Mother Doortje came to a dead stand in her
communications
,
and not another syllable of any sort could
either of us get from her; though, between us, as many as
twenty questions were asked. Signs were made for us to
depart; and when the woman found our reluctance, she laid
a crown for each of us, on the table, with a dignified air,
and went into a corner, seated herself, and began to rock
her body, like one impatient of our presence. After so
unequivocal
a sign that she considered her work as done, we
could not well do less than return; leaving the money
behind
us, as a matter of course.
CHAPTER IV.
Virtue, how frail it is!
Friendship, too rare!
Love, how it sells poor bliss
For proud despair!
But we, though soon they fall,
Survive their joy, and all
Which ours we call.
Shelley
.
Guert Ten Eyck
was profoundly impressed with what
he had heard, in his visit to the fortune-teller. It affected
his spirits, and, as will be seen, it influenced all his
subsequent
conduct. As for myself, I will not say that I totally
disregarded what had passed; though the effect was greatly
less on me, than it was on my friend. The Rev. Mr.
Worden
,
however, treated the matter with great disdain. He
declared that he had never before been so insulted in his life.
The old hag, no doubt, had seen us all before, and
recognised
him. Profiting by a knowledge of this sortthat was
very easily obtained in a place of the size of Albanyshe
had taken the occasion to make the most of the low gossip
that had been circulated at his expense. Loping Dominie,
indeed, he added; as if any man would not run to save
his life! You saw how it was with the river, Corny, when
it once began to break up, and know that my escape was
marvellous. I deserve as much credit for that retreat, boy,
as Xenophon did for his retreat with the Ten Thousand. It
is true, I had not thirty-four thousand, six hundred and fifty
stadia to retreat over; but acts are to be estimated more by
quality, than by quantity. The best things are always of
an impromptu character; and, generally, they are on a small
scale. Then, as for all you tell me about Guert; why, the
hussy knew him
must
have known him, in a town like
Albany, where the fellow has a character that identifies him
with all sorts of fun and roguery. Jack, and Moses, too!
Do you think the inspiration of even an evil spirit, or of
forty thousand devils, would lead a fortune-teller to name
Vol. II.  5
any horse Moses? Jack might do, perhaps; but
Moses
would never enter the head of even an imp! Remember,
lad, Moses was the great law-giver of the Jews; and such a
creature would be as apt to suppose a horse was named
Confucius, as to suppose he was named Moses!
I suppose the inspiration, as you call it, sir, would lead
a clever fortune-teller to give things as they are; and to
call the horses by their real names, let them be what they
might.
Ay, such inspiration as this miserable, old, wrinkled,
impudent she-devil enjoys! Don't tell me, Corny; there is
no such thing as fortune-telling; at least, nothing that can
be depended on in all casesand this is one of downright
imposition. `Loping Dominie,' forsooth!
Such were the Rev. Mr. Worden's sentiments on the
subject
of Mother Doortje's revelations. He exacted a pledge
from us all, to say nothing about the matter; nor were we
much disposed to be communicative on the subject. As for
Guert, Dirck, Jason, and myself, we did not hesitate to
converse
on the circumstances of our visits, among ourselves,
however; and each and all of us viewed the matter
somewhat
differently from our Mentor. I ascertained that Jason
had been highly gratified with what had been predicted on
his own behalf; for what was wealth in his eyes had been
foretold as his future lot; and a man rarely quarrels with
good fortune, whether in prospective, or in possession. Dirck,
though barely twenty, began to talk of living a single life
from this time; and no laughter of mine could induce the
poor lad to change his views, or to entertain livelier hopes.
Guert was deeply impressed, as has been said; and feeling
no restraint in the matter of his own case, he took occasion
to speak of his visit to the woman, one morning that Herman
Mordaunt, the two ladies, Bulstrode, and myself, were sitting
together, chatting, in the freedom of what had now become
a very constant intercourse.
Are such things as fortune-tellers known in England,
Mr. Bulstrode? Guert abruptly commenced, fastening his
eyes on Mary Wallace, as he asked the question; for on
her were his thoughts running at the time.
All sorts of silly things are to be found in Old England,
Mr. Ten Eyck, as well as some that are wise. I believe
London has one or two soothsayers; and I think I have
heard elderly people say that the fashion of consulting them
has somewhat increased, since the court has been so German.
Yes, Guert innocently replied; I find it easy to
believe
that; for, it is a common saying, among our people,
that the German and Low Dutch fortune-tellers are the best
known. They have had, or pretend to have had, witches
in New England; but no one, hereabouts, puts any faith in
the pretence. It is like all the bragging of these boastful
Yankees!
I observed that Mary Wallace's colour deepened; and
that, in biting off a thread, she profited, by the occasion, to
avert her face in such a manner, that Bulstrode, in
particular
,
could not see it.
The meaning of all this, put in Major Bulstrode
is, that our friend Guert has been to pay a visit to Mother
Doortje's; a woman of some note, who lives on the hill,
and who has a reputation, in that way, among these good
Albanians! Several of our mess have been to see the old
woman.
It is, Mr. Bulstrode, Guert answered, in his manly
way, and with a gravity which proved how much he was in
earnest. I have been to see Mother Doortje, for the first
time in my life; and Corny Littlepage, here, was my
companion
.
Long as I have known the woman by reputation,
I have never had any curiosity to pay her a visit, until this
spring. We have been, however; and, I must say, I have
been greatly surprised at the extent of the knowledge of this
very extraordinary person.
Did she tell you to look into the sweetmeat-pot, for the
lost spoon, Mr. Ten Eyck, Anneke inquired, with an
archness
of eye and voice, that sent the blood to my own face,
in confusion. They say, that fortune-tellers send all
prudent
,
yet careless housewives, to the sweetmeat-pots, to look
for the lost spoons! Many have been found, I hear, by this
wonderful prescience.
Well, Miss Anneke, I see, you have no faith, answered
Guert, fidgeting; and people who have no faith, never
believe. Notwithstanding,
I
put so much confidence in
what Doortje has told me, that I intend to follow her advice,
let matters turn out as they may.
Here Mary Wallace raised her thoughtful, full, blue eyes
to the face of the young man; and they expressed an intense
interest, rather than any light curiosity, that even her
woman's
instinct and woman's sensitiveness could not so far
prevail, as to enable her to conceal. Still, Mary Wallace
did not speak, leaving the others present to maintain the
discourse.
Of course, you mean to tell us all about it, Ten Eyck,
cried the Major; there is nothing more likely to succeed,
with an audience, than a good history of witchcraft, or
something
so very marvellous, as to do violence to common sense,
before we give it our faith.
Excuse me, Mr. Bulstrode; these are things I cannot
well mention; though, Corny Littlepage will testify, that
they are very wonderful. At any rate, I shall go into the
bush, this spring; and Littlepage and Follock, being
excellent
companions, I propose to join their company. It will
be late, before the army will be ready to move; and, by that
time, all three of us propose to join you before Ticonderoga;
if, indeed, you succeed in getting so far,
Say, rather, in front of Montreal; for, I trust, this new
Commander-In-Chief will find something more for us to do,
than the last one did. Shall I have a sentinel placed at
Doortje's door, in your absence, Guert?
The smile, this question produced, was general; Guert,
himself, joining in it; for his good-nature was of proof.
When I say the smile was general, however, I ought to
except
Mary Wallace, who smiled little, that morning.
We shall be neighbours, then, Herman Mordaunt
quietly observed; that is to say, if you mean, by
accompanying
Corny and Dirck to the bush, you intend to go
with them to the patent, lately obtained by Messrs.
Littlepage
and Van Valkenburgh. I have an estate, in that
quarter, which is now ten years old; and these ladies have
consented to accompany me thither, as soon as the weather
is a little more settled, and I can be assured that our army
will be of sufficient force to protect us from the French and
Indians.
It is unnecessary for me to say with what delight Guert
and I heard this announcement! On Bulstrode, however, it
produced an exactly contrary effect. He did not appear, to
me, to be surprised, at a declaration that was so new to
us; but several expressions fell from him, that showed he
had no idea the two estates, that of Herman Mordaunt's, and
that which belonged to us, lay so near together. It was by
means of
his
questions, indeed, that I learned the real facts
of the case. It appeared that Herman Mordaunt's business,
in Albany, was to make some provisions in behalf of this
property, on which he had caused mills to be erected, and
some of the other improvements of a new settlement, to be
made, two or three years before; and which, by the
progress
and events of the war, was getting to be in closer
proximity
to the enemy, than was desirable. Even where the
French lay, at Ticonderoga, his mills, in particular, might
be thought in some danger, though forty or more miles
distant
;
for parties of savages, led on by white men, frequently
marched that distance through the forests, in order to break
up a settlement and to commit depredations. But the enemy
had crossed Lake George, the previous summer, and had
actually taken Fort William Henry, at its southern
extremity
,
by siege. It is true, this was the extent of their
inroad
;
and, it was now known, that they had abandoned
this bold conquest, and had fallen back upon Ty and Crown
Point, two of the strongest military positions in the British
colonies. Still, Ravensnest, as Herman Mordaunt's
property
was called, was far from being beyond the limits of
sorties; and the residence, at Albany, was solely to watch
the progress of events in that quarter, and to be near the
scene. If he had any public employment, it remained a
profound mystery. A new source of embarrassment had
arisen, however; and this it was that decided the proprietor
to visit his lands in person. The fifteen or twenty families
he had succeeded in establishing on the estate, at much cost
and trouble, had taken the alarm at the prospect of a
campaign
in their vicinity; and had announced an intention of
abandoning their huts and clearings, as the course most
expedient for the times. Two or three had already gone
off towards the Hampshire Grants, whence they had
originally
come; profiting by the last of the snow; and, it was
feared, that others might imitate their caution.
Herman Mordaunt saw no necessity for this abandonment
of advantages over the wilderness, that had been obtained
5 *
at so much cost and trouble. The labour of a removal,
and a return, was sufficient, of itself, to give a new direction
to the movements of his settlers; and, as their first entrance
into the country had been effected through his agency, and
aided by his means, he naturally wished to keep the people
he had got to his estate with so much difficulty, and at so
much cost, at their several positions, as long, at least, as he
conceived it to be prudent. In these circumstances,
therefore
,
he had determined to visit Ravensnest in person, and
to pass a part, if not most of the summer, among his people.
This would give them confidence, and would enable him to
infuse new life into their operations. It would seem, that
Anneke and Mary Wallace had refused to let Mr. Mordaunt
go alone; and, believing, himself, there was no danger in
the course he was about to take, the father and guardian,
for Mary Wallace was Herman Mordaunt's ward, had
yielded to the importunities of the two girls; and it had been
formally decided that they were all to proceed together, as
soon as the season should get to be a little more advanced.
Intelligence of this intention had been sent to the settlers;
and its effect was to induce them to remain at their posts, by
pacifying their fears.
I might as well add, here, what I learned subsequently,
in the due course of events. Bulstrode had been made
acquainted
with Herman Mordaunt's plans, they being sworn
friends, and the latter warmly in the interest of the former's
suit; and he had known how to profit by the information.
It was now time to put the troops in motion; and several
parties had already marched towards the north, taking post
at different points that it was thought desirable to occupy,
previously to the commencement of the campaign. Among
other corps under orders of this nature, was that commanded
by Bulstrode; and he had sufficient interest, at
head-quarters
,
to get it sent to the point nearest to Ravensnest; where
it gave him the double advantage, of having it in his power
to visit the ladies, on occasion, while, at the same time, he
must appear, to them, somewhat in the character of a
protector
.
The object of Dirck and myself, in visiting the
north, was no secret; and, it was generally understood, that
we were to go to Mooseridge; but we did not know,
ourselves
,
that Herman Mordaunt had an estate so near us.
This intelligence, as has been said, I now ascertained, was
as new to Bulstrode as it was to myself.
The knowledge of many little things I have just
mentioned
,
was obtained by me only at intervals, and by means
of observation and discourse. Nevertheless, the main points
were determined on the morning on which Guert referred to
his visit to the fortune-teller, and in the manner named.
The conversation lasted an hour; nor did it cease, until all
present got a general idea of the course intended to be
pursued
by the different parties present, during the succeeding
summer.
It happened, that morning, that Bulstrode, Dirck, and
Guert withdrew together, the two last to look at a horse the
former had just purchased, leaving me alone with the young
ladies. No sooner was the door closed on the retiring
members of our party, than I saw a smile struggling about
the handsome mouth of Anneke; Mary Wallace continuing
the whole time thoughtful, if not sad.
And
you
were of the party at the fortune-teller's, too, it
seems, Mr. Littlepage, Anneke remarked, after appearing
to be debating with herself on the propriety of proceeding
any farther in the subject. I knew there was such a
person
in Albany, and that thrifty housekeepers
did
sometimes
consult her; but I was ignorant that men, and
educated
men,
paid her that honour.
I believe there is no exception in the way of sex or
learning, to her influence, or her authority. They tell me
that most of the younger officers of the army visit her,
while they remain here.
I would much like to know if Mr. Bulstrode has been
of the number! He is young enough in years, though so
high in rank. A major may have as much curiosity as an
ensign; or, as it may appear, dear Mary, of a woman who
has lost her grandmother's favourite dessert-spoon.
Mary Wallace gave a gentle sigh, and she even raised
her eyes from her work; still, she made no answer.
You are severe on us, Anneke; for, since the affair on
the river, the whole family treated me with the familiarity
of a son or a brotherI fancy we have done no more than
Mr. Mordaunt has done in his day.
This may be very true, Corny, and not make the
consultation
the wisest thing in nature. I hope, however, you
do not keep your fortune a secret, but let your friends share
in your knowledge!
To me the woman was far from being communicative,
though she treated Guert Ten Eyck better. Certainly, she
told him many extraordinary things, of the past even; unless,
indeed, she knew who he was.
Is it probable, Mr. Littlepage, said Mary Wallace,
that any person in Albany should not know Guert Ten
Eyck, and a good deal of his past history? Poor Guert
makes himself known wherever he is!
And, often much to his advantage, I addeda remark
that cost me nothing; but which caused Mary Wallace's
face to brighten, and even brought a faint smile to her lips.
All that is true; yet there
was
something wild and unnatural
in the woman's manner, as she told these things!
All of which you seem determined to keep to yourself?
observed Anneke, as one asks a question.
It would hardly do to betray a friend's secrets. Let
Guert answer for himself; he is as frank as broad day, and
will not hesitate about letting you know all.
I wish Corny Littlepage were only as frank as twilight!
I have nothing to concealand least of all from you,
Anneke. The fortune-teller told me that the queen of my
heart was the queen of
too many
hearts; that the river had
done me no harm; and that I must particularly beware of
what she called Knights-Barrow
nights
.
I watched Anneke closely, as I repeated this warning of
Mother Doortje; but could not read the expression of her
sweet and thoughtful countenance. She neither smiled nor
frowned; but she certainly blushed. Of course, she did not
look at mefor that would have been to challenge
observation
.
Mary Wallace, however,
did
smile, and she
did
look
at me.
You believe all the wizzard told you, Corny? said
Anneke, after a short pause.
I believed that the queen of my heart was the queen of
many hearts; that the river had done me no harmthough
I could not say, or see, that it had done me much good; and
that I had much to fear from Knights-Barrow
nights
. I
believed all this, however, before I ever saw the
fortune-teller
.
The next remark that was made came from Anneke, and
it referred to the weather. The season was opening finely,
and fast; and it could not be long before the great
movements
of the year must commence. Several regiments had
arrived in the colonies, and various officers of note and rank
had accompanied them. Among others who had thus crossed
the Atlantic for the first time, was my Lord Howe, a young
soldier of whom fame spoke favourably, and from whom
much was expected in the course of the anticipated service
of the year. While we were talking over these things,
Herman Mordaunt re-entered the room, after a short absence,
and he took me with him to examine his preparations for
transporting the ladies to Ravensnest. As we went along, the
discourse was maintained, and I learned many things from
my older and intelligent companion, that were new to me.
New lords, new laws, they say, Corny, continued
Herman Mordaunt; and this Mr. Pitt, the great commoner,
as some persons call him, is bent on making the British
empire feel the truth of the axiom. Everything is alive in
the colonies, and the sluggish period of Lord Loudon's
command
is passed. Gen. Abercrombie, an officer from whom
much is expected, is now at the head of the King's troops,
and there is every prospect of an active and most important
campaign. The disgraces of the few last years
must
be
wiped out, and the English name be made once more to be
dreaded on this continent. The Lord Howe of whom
Anneke
spoke, is said to be a young man of merit, and to
possess
the blood of our Hanoverian monarchs; his mother
being a half-sister, in the natural way, of his present
Majesty
.
Herman Mordaunt then spoke more fully of his own
plans for the summerexpressed his happiness at knowing
that Dirck and myself were to be what he called his
neighbours
though,
on a more exact computation, it was
ascertained
,
that the nearest boundaries of the two patents, that
of Ravensnest, and that of Mooseridge, lay quite fourteen
miles apart, with a dense and virgin forest between them.
Nevertheless, this would be making us neighbours, in a
certain sense; as gentlemen always call men of their own
class neighbours, when they live within visiting distance, or
near enough to be seen once or twice in a year. And such
men
are
neighbours, in the sense that is most essential to
the termthey know each other better; understand each
other better; sympathize more freely; have more of the
intercourse that makes us judges of motives, principles, and
character, twenty-fold, than he who lives at the gate, and
merely sees the owner of the grounds pass in and out, on
his daily avocations. There is, and can be no greater
absurdity
,
than to imagine that the sheer neighbourhood, or
proximity of position, makes men acquainted. That was
one of Jason Newcome's Connecticut notions. Having been
educated in a state of society in which all associated on a
certain footing of intimacy, and in which half the difficulties
that occurred were told to the church, he was for ever
fancying he knew all the gentry of Westchester, because he
had lived a year or two in the county; when, in fact, he had
never spoken to one in a dozen of them. I never could
drive this notion out of his head, however; for
looking
often
at a man, or occasionally exchanging a bow with him on
the highway, he would insist was knowing him, or what he
called, being well acquainted; a very favourite
expression
of the Danbury man's; though their sympathies, habits,
opinions, and feelings, created so vast a void between the
parties, they hardly understood each other's terms, and
ordinary
language, when they did begin to converse, as
sometimes
happened. Notwithstanding all this, Jason insisted to
the last that he
knew
every gentleman in the county, whom
he had been accustomed to hear alluded to in discourse, and
when he had seen them once or twice, though it were only
at church. But Jason had a very flattering notion,
generally
,
of his own acquisitions on all subjects.
Herman Mordaunt had made careful provision for the
contemplated journey; having caused a covered vehicle to
be constructed, that could transport not only himself and
the ladies, but many articles of furniture that would be
required
during their residence in the forest. Another
conveyance
,
strong, spacious, and covered, was also prepared
for the blacks, and another portion of the effects. He
pointed out all these arrangements to me with great
satisfaction
,
dwelling on the affection and spirit of the girls with
a pleasure he did not affect to conceal. For my own part,
I have always been of opinion, that Anneke was solely
influenced
by pure, natural regard, in forming her indiscreet
resolution; while her father was governed by the secret
expectation
that the movement would leave open the means of
receiving visits and communications from Bulstrode, during
most of the summer. I commended the arrangements, made
one or two suggestions of my own in behalf of Anneke and
Mary, and we returned to our several homes.
A day or two after this visit to the workshops, and the
conversation related, the th took up its line of march
for the north. The troops defiled through the narrow streets
in the neighbourhood of the barracks, half an hour after
the appearance of the sun, preceded and followed by a long
train of baggage-wagons. They marched without tents,
however, it being well understood that they were going into
a region where the axe could at any time cover thousands
of men, in about the time that a camp could be laid out,
and the canvass spread. Hutting was the usual mode of
placing an army under cover in the forest; and a dozen
marches would take the battalion to the point where it was
intended it should remain, as a support to two or three other
corps still further in advance, and to keep open the
communications
.
Bulstrode, however, did not quit Albany in company with
his regiment. I had been invited, with Guert and Dirck, to
breakfast at Herman Mordaunt's that morning; and, as we
approached the door, I saw the Major's groom walking his
own and his master's horse, in the street, near by. This
was a sign we were to have the pleasure of Bulstrode's
company
at breakfast. Accordingly, on entering the room, we
found him present, in the uniform of an officer of his rank,
about to commence a march in the forests of America. I
thought him melancholy, as if sad at parting; but my most
jealous observation could detect no sign of similar feeling
on the part of Anneke. She was not quite as gay as usual,
but she was far from being sad.
I leave you, ladies, with the deepest regret, said
Bulstrode
,
while at table, for you have made this country
more than a home to meyou have rendered it
dear
.
This was said with feeling; more than I had ever seen
Bulstrode manifest before, and more than I had given him
credit for possessing. Anneke coloured a little; but there
was no tremor in the beautiful hand, that held a
highly-wrought
little tea-pot suspended over a cup, at that very
moment.
We shall soon meet again, Harry, Herman Mordaunt
remarked, in a tone of strong affection; for, our party will
not be a week behind you. Remember, we are to be
good
neighbours, as well as neighbours; and, if the mountain
will not come to Mahomet, Mahomet must go to the
mountain
.
Which means, Mr. Bulstrode, said Mary Wallace, with
one of her sweet smiles, and one that was as open and
natural
as childhood itself, that you are Mahomet, and we
are the mountain. Ladies can neither travel, with comfort,
in a wilderness, nor visit a camp, with propriety, if they
would.
They tell me, I shall not be in a camp at all, answered
the soldier; but in good, comfortable log-barracks, that
have been built for us by the battalion we relieve. I am
not without hopes, they will be such as even ladies will not
disdain to use, on an emergency. There ought to be no
Mahomet, and no mountain, between such old and intimate
friends.
The conversation then turned on the plans and
expectations
of the respective parties; and the usual promises were
made, of being sociable and good neighbours, as had just
been suggested. Herman Mordaunt evidently wished to
consider Bulstrode as one of his family; a feeling that might
excuse itself to the world, on the score of consanguinity;
but which, it was easy enough, for me, to see, had its origin
in a very different cause. When Bulstrode rose to take his
leave, I wished myself away, on account of the exhibition
of concern it produced; while the desire to watch the effect
on Anneke, would have kept me rooted to the floor, even
had it been proper that I should retire.
Bulstrode was more affected than I could have thought
possible. He took one of Herman Mordaunt's hands into
his own, and pressed it warmly, for some little time, before
he could speak at all.
God only knows what this summer is to see, and
whether we are ever to meet again, or not, he then said;
but, come what may, the past, the
happy past
, is so much
gained from the commonplace. If you never hear of me
again, my dear kinsman, my letters to England will give
you a better account of my gratitude, than anything I can
say in words. They have been written as your kindnesses
have been bestowed; and they faithfully pourtray the
feelings
to which your hospitality and friendship have given
rise. In a possible event, I have requested that every one
of them may be sent to America, for your special perusal
Nay, my dear Harry, this is foreboding the very worst,
interrupted Herman Mordaunt, dashing a tear from his eye,
and is making a very short separation, a more serious
matter than one ought
Nay, sir, a soldier, who is about to be posted within
striking distance of his enemy, can never speak, with
confidence
,
of separations that are to be short. This campaign
will be decisive, for me,glancing towards AnnekeI
must return a conqueror, in one sense, or I do not wish to
return at all. But, God bless you, Herman Mordaunt, as
your own countrymen call you; a thousand years could not
efface from my heart, the remembrance of all your
kindness
.
This was handsomely expressed; and the manner in
which it was uttered, was as good as the language.
Bulstrode
hesitated a momentlooked at the two girls in doubt
and first approached Mary Wallace.
Adieu, excellent Mary Wallace, he said, taking her
offered hand, and kissing it with a freedom from emotion,
that denoted it was only friendship and respect which
induced
the actI believe, you are a severe critic on Catos
and Scrubs; but, I forgive all your particular backbitings,
on account of your general indulgence and probity. You
may meet with a thousand mere acquaintances, before you
find another who shall have the same profound respect for
your many virtues, as myself.
This was handsomely said, too; and it caused Mary
Wallace
to remove the handkerchief from her eyes, and to utter
her adieus cordially, and with some emotion. Strangers
say that our women want feelingpassion; or, if they have
it, that it is veiled behind a mask of coldness, that takes
Vol. II.6
away from its loveliness and warmth; that they are girlish
and familiar, where they might better be reserved; and
distant
,
and unnatural, where feeling and nature ought to
assert their sway. That they have less
manner
, in all
respects
,
in that of self-control, and perhaps of self-respect, in
their ordinary intercourse, and in that of
acting
, where it
may seem necessary so to do, I believe to be true; but, he
who denies an American girl a heart, knows nothing about
her. She is
all
heart; and the apparent coldness is oftener
the consequence of not daring to trust her feelings, and her
general dislike to everything artificial, than to any want of
affections. Two girls, educated, however, as had been
Anneke and Mary Wallace, could not but acquit themselves
better, in such a scene, than those who had been less
accustomed
to the usages of polite life, which are always, more or
less, the usages of convention.
On the present occasion, Mary Wallace was strongly
affected; it would not have been possible, for one of her
gentle nature and warm affections, to be otherwise, when an
agreeable companion, one she had now known intimately
near two years, was about to take his leave of her, on an
errand that he himself either thought, or affected so well to
seem to think, might lead to the most melancholy issue.
She shook hands with Bulstrode, warmly; wished him good
fortune, and various other pleasant things; thanked him for
his good opinion, and expressed her hope, as well as her
belief, that they should all meet again before the summer
was over, and again be happy in each other's society.
Anneke's turn came next. Her handkerchief was at her
eyes; and, when it was removed, the face was pale, and the
cheeks were covered with tears. The smile that followed,
was sweetness itself; and, I will own, it caused me a most
severe pang. To my surprise, Bulstrode said nothing. He
took Anneke's hand, pressed it to his heart, kissed it, left a
note in it, bowed, and moved away. I felt ashamed to watch
the countenance of Miss Mordaunt, under such circumstances,
and turned aside, that observation might not increase the
distress and embarrassment she evidently felt. I saw
enough, notwithstanding, to render me more uncertain than
ever, as to the success of my own suit. Anneke's colour
had come and gone, as Bulstrode stood near her, acting his
dumb-show of leave-taking; and, to me, she seemed far
more affected than Mary Wallace had been. Nevertheless,
her feelings were always keener and more active than those
of her friend; and, that which my sensitiveness took for the
emotion of tenderness, might be nothing more than ordinary
womanly feeling and friendship. Besides, Bulstrode was
actually her relative.
We men all attended Bulstrode to his horse. He shook
us cordially by the hand; and, after he had got into the
saddle, he said  This summer will be warmer than is
usual, even in your warmy-cold climate. My letters from
home give me reason to think that there is, at last, a man
of talents at the head of affairs; and the British empire is
likely to feel the impulse he will give it, at its most remote
extremities. I shall expect you three young men to join the
th, as volunteers, as soon as you hear of our moving in
advance. I wish I had a thousand like you; for that affair
of the river tells where a man will be found when the time
comes. God bless you, Corny! leaning forward in his
saddle, to give me another shake of the hand; we
must
remain friends,
coute qui coute
.
There was no withstanding this frankness, and so much
good-temper. We shook hands most cordially; Bulstrode
raised his hat and bowed; after which he rode away, as I
fancied, at a slow, thoughtful, reluctant pace.
Notwithstanding
the kindness of this parting, I had more cause than
ever to regret Bulstrode had appeared among us; and the
scenes of that morning only confirmed me in a resolution,
previously adopted, not to urge Anneke to any decision, in
my case, at a moment when I felt there might be so much
danger it would be adverse.
CHAPTER V.
Come, let a proper text be read,
An' touch it aff wi' vigour,
How graceless Ham leugh at his dad,
Which made Canaan a nigger.
Burns
.
Ten
days after the departure of the th, Herman
Mordaunt and his family, with our own party, left Albany,
on the summer's business. In that interval, however, great
changes had taken place in the military aspect of things.
Several regiments of King's troops ascended the Hudson;
most of the sloops on the river, of which there could not
have been fewer than thirty or forty, having been
employed
in transporting them and their stores. Two or three
corps came across the country, from the eastern colonies,
while several provincial regiments appeared; everything
tending to a concentration at this point, the head of
navigation
on the Hudson. Among other men of mark, who
accompanied
the troops, was Lord Viscount Howe, the
nobleman
of whom Herman Mordaunt had spoken. He bore the
local rank of Brigadier,
[7]
[7]
The ordinary American reader may not know that the rank of
Brigadier, in the British army, is not a step in the regular line of
promotion, as with us. In England, the regular military gradations
are from Colonel to Major-general, Lieut. General, General, and Field
Marshal. The rank of Brigadier is barely recognised, like that of
Commodore, in the navy, to be used on emergencies; usually as
brevet
,
local
rank, to enable the government to employ clever colonels
at need.
and seemed to be the very soul of
the army. It was not his personal consideration alone, that
placed him so high in the estimation of the public and of
the troops, but his professional reputation, and professional
services. There were many young men of rank in the
army present; and, as for younger sons of peers, there were
enough to make honourables almost as plenty, at Albany,
as they were at Boston. Most of the colonial families of
mark and sons in the service, too; those of the middle and
southern colonies bearing commissions in regular regiments;
while the provincial troops from the eastern were led, as
was very usual, in that quarter of the country, by men of
the class of yeomen, in a great degree; the habits of equality
that prevailed in those provinces making few distinctions, on
the score of birth or fortune.
Yet it was said, I remember, that obedience was as
marked, among the provincials from Massachusetts and
Connecticut, as among those that came from farther south;
the men deferring to authority, as the agent of the laws.
They were fine troops, too; better than our own colony
regiments, I must acknowledge; seeming to belong to a
higher class of labourers; while, it must be admitted, that
most of their officers were no very brilliant representatives
of manners, acquirements, or habits, that would be likely to
qualify them for command. It must have been that the
officers and men suited each other; for, it was said all round,
that they stood well, and fought very bravely, whenever
they were particularly well led, as did not always happen to
be the case. As a body of mere physical men, they were
universally allowed to be the finest corps in the army,
regulars
and all included.
I saw Lord Howe two or three times, particularly at the
residence of Madam Schuyler, the lady I have already had
occasion to mention, and to whom I had given the letter of
introduction procured by my mother, the Mordaunts visiting
her with great assiduity, and frequently taking me with
them. As for Lord Howe, himself, he almost lived under
the roof of excellent Madam Schuyler; where, indeed, all
the good company assembled at Albany, was, at times, to
be seen.
Our party was a large one; and, it might have passed for
a small corps of the army itself, moving on in advance; as
was the case with corps, or parts of corps, now, almost daily.
Herman Mordaunt had delayed our departure, indeed,
expressly
with a view to render the country safe, by letting it
fill with detachments from the army; and our progress,
when we were once in motion, was literally from post to
post; encampment to encampment. It may be well to
enumerate
our force, and to relate the order of our march, that
the reader may better comprehend the sort of business we
were on.
6 *
Herman Mordaunt took with him, in addition to the ladies,
a black cook, and a black serving-girl; a negro-man, to
take care of his horses, and another as his house-servant.
He had three white labourers, in additionmen employed
about the teams, and as axe-men, to clear the woods, bridge
the streams, and to do other work of that nature, as it might
be required. On our side, there were us three gentlemen,
Yaap, my own faithful negro, Mr. Traverse, the surveyor,
two chain-bearers, and two axe-men. Guert Ten Eyck
carried with him, also, a negro-man, who was called Pete;
it being contrary to
bonos mores
to style him Peter or
Petrus
;
the latter being his true appellation. This made us
ten men strong, of whom eight were white, and two black.
Herman Mordaunt mustered, in all, just the same number,
of which, however, four were females. Thus, by uniting
our forces, we made a party of twenty souls, altogether.
Of this number, all the males, black and white, were well
armed, each man owning a good rifle, and each of the
gentlemen
a brace of pistols in addition. We carried the latter
belted to our bodies, with the weapons, which were small
and fitted to the service, turned behind, in such a way as to
be concealed by our outer garments. The belts were also
hid by the flaps of our nether garments. By this
arrangement
,
we were well armed without seeming to be so; a
precaution
that is sometimes useful in the woods.
It is hardly necessary to say, that we did not plunge into
the forest in the attire in which we had been accustomed to
appear in the streets of New York and Albany. Cocked
hats were laid aside altogether; forest caps, resembling in
form those we had worn in the winter, with the exception
that the fur had been removed, being substituted. The ladies
wore light beavers, suited to their sex; there being little
occasion for any shade for the face, under the dense
canopies
of the forest. Veils of green, however, were added, as
the customary American protection for the sex. Anneke
and Mary travelled in habits, made of light woman's cloth,
and in a manner to fit their exquisite forms like gloves. The
skirts were short, to enable them to walk with ease, in the
event of being compelled to go a-foot. A feather or two, in
each hat, had not been forgottenthe offering of the natural
propensity of their sex, to please the eyes of men.
As for us men, buckskin formed the principal material
of our garments. We all wore buckskin breeches, and
gaiters, and moccasins. The latter, however, had the
white-man's
soles; though Guert took a pair or two with him that
were of the pure Indian manufacture. Each of us had a
coatee, made of common cloth; but we all carried
hunting-shirts
,
to be worn as soon as we entered the woods. These
hunting-shirts, green in colour, fringed and ornamented
garments
,
of the form of shirts to be worn over all, were
exceedingly
smart in appearance, and were admirably suited
to the woods. It was thought that the fringes, form, and
colour, blended them so completely with the foliage, as to
render them in a manner invisible to one at a distance; or,
at least, undistinguished. They were much in favour with
all the forest corps of America, and formed the usual
uniform
of the riflemen of the woods, whether acting against
man, or only against the wild beasts.
Neither Mr. Worden, nor Jason, moved with the main
party; and it was precisely on account of these distinctions
of dress. As for the divine, he was so good a stickler for
appearances, he would have worn the gown and surplice,
even on a mission to the Indians; which, by-the-way, was
ostensibly his present business; and, at the several
occasions
,
on which I saw him at cock-fights, he kept on the
clerical coat and shovel-hat. In a word, Mr. Worden never
neglected externals, so far as dress was concerned; and, I
much question, if he would have consented to read prayers
without the surplice, or to preach without the gown, let the
desire for spiritual provender be as great as it might. I
very well remember to have heard my father say, that, on
one occasion, the parson had refused to officiate of a
Sunday
,
when travelling, rather than bring discredit on the
church, by appearing in the discharge of his holy office,
without the appliances that belonged to the clerical
character
.
More harm than good is done to religion, Mr.
Littlepage
,
said the Rev. Mr. Worden, on that occasion, by
thus lessening its rites in vulgar eyes. The first thing is
to teach men to respect holy things, my dear sir; and a
clergyman in his gown and surplice, commands threefold
the respect of one without them. I consider it, therefore, a
sacred duty to uphold the dignity of my office on all
occasions
.
It was in consequence of these opinions, that the divine
travelled in his clerical hat, clerical coat, black breeches,
and band, even when in pursuit of the souls of red men
among the wilds of North America! I will not take it upon
myself to say, these observances had not their use; but I
am very certain they put the reverend gentleman to a great
deal of inconvenience.
As for Jason, he gave a Danbury reason for travelling
in his best. Everybody did so, in his quarter of the country;
and, for his part, he thought it disrespectful to strangers, to
appear among them in old clothes! There was, however,
another and truer reason, and that was economy; for the
troops had so far raised the price of everything, that Jason
did not hesitate to pronounce Albany the dearest place he
had ever been in. There was some truth in this allegation;
and the distance from New York, being no less than one
hundred and sixty milesso reportedthe reader will at
once see, it was the business of quite a month, or even more,
to re-furnish the shelves of the shop that had been emptied.
The Dutch not only moved slow, but they were methodical;
and the shopkeeper whose stores were exhausted in April,
would not be apt to think of replenishing them, until the
regular time and season returned.
As a consequence of these views and motives, the Rev.
Mr. Worden and Mr. Jason Newcome left Albany
twenty-four
hours in advance of the rest of our party, with the
understanding they were to join us at a point where the
road led into the woods, and where it was thought the cocked
hat and the skin cap might travel in company harmoniously.
There was, however, a reason for the separation I have not
yet named, in the fact that all of my own set travelled on
foot, three or four pack-horses carrying our necessaries.
Now Mr. Worden had been offered a seat in a government
conveyance, and Jason managed to worm himself into the
party, in some way that to me was ever inexplicable. It is,
however, due to Mr. Newcome to confess that his faculty of
obtaining favours of all sorts, was of a most extraordinary
character; and he certainly never lost any chance of
preferment
for want of asking. In this respect, Jason was
always a moral enigma, to me; there being an absolute
absence, in his mind, of everything like a perception of the
fitness of things, so far as the claims and rights of persons
were connected with rank, education, birth, and experience.
Rank, in the official sense, once possessed, he understood
and respected; but of the claims to entitle one to its
enjoyment
,
he seemed to have no sort of notion. For property
he had a profound deference, so far as that deference
extended
to its importance and influence; but it would have
caused him not the slightest qualm, either in the way of
conscience
or feeling, to find himself suddenly installed in the
mansion of the patroons, for instance, and placed in
possession
of their estates, provided only he fancied he could
maintain his position. The circumstance that he was
dwelling
under the roof that was erected by another man's
ancestors
,
for instance, and that others were living who had a
better moral right to it, would give him no sort of trouble,
so long as any quirk of the law would sustain him in
possession
.
In a word, all that was allied to sentiment, in
matters of this nature, was totally lost on Jason Newcome,
who lived and acted, from the hour he first came among us,
as if the game of life were merely a game of puss in the
corner, in which he who inadvertently left his own post
unprotected
,
would be certain to find another filling his place
as speedily as possible. I have mentioned this propensity
of Jason's at some little length, as I feel certain, should this
history be carried down by my own posterity, as I hope and
design, it will be seen that this disposition to regard the
whole human family as so many tenants in common, of the
estate left by Adam, will lead, in the end, to something
extraordinary
.
But, leaving the Rev. Mr. Worden and Mr.
Jason Newcome to journey in their public conveyance, I
must return to our own party.
All of us men, with the exception of those who drove the
two wagons of Herman Mordaunt, marched a-foot. Each
of us carried a knapsack, in addition to his rifle and
ammunition
;
and, it will be imagined, that our day's work was
not a very long one. The first day, we halted at Madam
Schuyler's, by invitation, where we all dined; including the
surveyor. Lord Howe was among the guests, that day;
and he appeared to admire the spirit of Anneke and Mary
Wallace greatly, in attempting such an expedition, at such
a time.
You need have no fears, however, ladies, as we shall
keep up strong detachments between you and the French,
he said, more gravely, after some pleasant trifling on the
subject. Last summer's work, and the disgraceful
manner
in which poor Munro was abandoned to his fate, has
rendered us all keenly alive to the importance of compelling
the enemy to remain at the north end of Lake George; too
many battles having already been fought on this side it, for
the credit of the British arms. We pledge ourselves to your
safety.
Anneke thanked him for this pledge, and the conversation
changed. There was a young man present, who bore the
name of Schuyler, and who was nearly related to Madam,
with whose air, manner and appearance I was much struck.
His aunt called him `Philip;' and, being about my own age,
during this visit I got into conversation with him. He told
me he was attached to the commissariat under Gen.
Bradstreet
,
and that he should move on with the army, as soon
as the preparations for its marching were completed. He
then entered into a clear, simple explanation of the supposed
plan of the approaching campaign.
We shall see you and your friends among us, then, I
hope, he added, as we were walking on the lawn together,
previously to the summons to dinner; for, to own to you
the truth, Mr. Littlepage, I do not half like the necessity of
our having so many eastern troops among us, to clear this
colony of its enemies. It is true, a nation must fight its
foes wherever they may happen to be found; but there is so
little in common, between us and the Yankees, that I could
wish we were strong enough to beat back the French
alone.
We have the same sovereign and the same allegiance,
I answered; if you can call that something in common.
That is true; yet, I think you must have enough Dutch
blood about you to understand me. My duty calls me much
among the different regiments; and, I will own, that I find
more trouble with one New England regiment, than with a
whole brigade of the other troops. They have generals,
and colonels, and majors, enough for the army of the Duke
of Marlborough!
It is certain, there is no want of military rank among
themand they are particularly fond of referring to it.
Quite true, answered young Schuyler, smiling. You
will hear the word `general' or `colonel' oftener used, in
one of their cantonments, in a day, than you shall hear it
at Head Quarters in a month. They have capital points
about them, too; yet, somehow or other, we do not like
each other.
Twenty years later in life, I had reason to remember this
remark, as well as to reflect on the character of the man
who had uttered it. I, or my successors, will probably have
occasion to advert to matters connected with this feeling, in
the later passages of this record.
I had also a little conversation with Lord Howe, who
complimented me on what had passed on the river. He had
evidently received an account of that affair from some one
who was much my friend, and saw fit to allude to the
subject
in a way that was very agreeable to myself. This
short conversation was not worth repeating, but it opened
the way to an acquaintance that subsequently was connected
with some events of interest.
About an hour after dinner, our party took its leave of
Madam Schuyler, and moved on. The day's march was
intended to be short, though by this time the roads were
settled
,
and tolerably good. Of roads, however, we were not
long to enjoy the advantages, for they extended only some
thirty miles to the north of Albany, in our direction. With
the exception of the military route, which led direct to the
head-waters of Lake Champlain, this was about the extent
of all the avenues that penetrated the interior, in that quarter
of the country. Our direction was to the northward and
eastward, both Ravensnest and Mooseridge lying slightly in
the direction of the Hampshire Grants.
As soon as we reached the point on the great northern
road, or that which led towards Skeenesborough, Herman
Mordaunt was obliged to quit his wagons, and to put all the
females on horseback. The most necessary of the stores
were placed on pack-horses; and, after a delay of half a
day, time lost in making these arrangements, we proceeded.
The wagons were to follow, but at a slow pace, the ladies
being compelled to abandon them on account of the
ruggedness
of the ways, which would have rendered their motion
not easy to be borne. Our cavalcade and train of footmen
made a respectable display along the uneven road, which
soon became very little more than a line cut through the
forest, with an occasional wheel-track, but without the least
attempt to level the surface of the ground by any artificial
means. This was the place where we were to overtake Mr.
Worden and Jason, and where we did find their effects; the
owners themselves having gone on in advance, leaving word
that we should fall in with them somewhere on the route.
Guert and I marched in front, our youth and vigour
enabling
us to do this with great ease to ourselves. Knowing
that the ladies were well cared for, on horseback, we pushed
on, in order to make provision for their reception, at a house
a few miles distant, where we were to pass the night. This
building was of logs, of course, and stood quite alone in the
wilderness, having, however, some twenty or thirty acres
of cleared land around it; and it would not do to pass it, at
that time of the day. The distance from this solitary
dwelling
to the first habitation on Herman Mordaunt's property,
was eighteen miles; and that was a length of road that would
require the whole of a long May day to overcome, under
our circumstances.
Guert and myself might have been about a mile in
advance
of the rest of the party, when we saw a sort of
semi-clearing
before us, that we mistook at first for our
resting-place
.
A few acres had been chopped over, letting in the
light of the day upon the gloom of the forest, but the second
growth was already shooting up, covering the area with high
bushes. As we drew nearer, we saw it was a small,
abandoned
clearing. Entering it, voices were heard at no great
distance, and we stopped; for the human voice is not heard,
in such a place, without causing the traveller to pause, and
stand to his arms. This we did; after which we listened
with some curiosity and caution.
High! exclaimed some one, very distinctly, in
English
.
Jack! said another voice, in a sort of answering second,
that could not well be mistaken.
There 's three for low;is that good? put in the first
speaker.
It will do, sir; but here are a ten and an ace. Ten
and three, and four and two make nineteen;I 'm game.
High, low, Jack and game! whispered Guert; here
are fellows playing at cards, near us; let us go on and beat
up their quarters.
We did so; and, pushing aside some bushes, broke, quite
unexpectedly to all parties, on the Rev. Mr. Worden and
Jason Newcome, playing the game of `All Fours on a stump;'
or, if not literally in the classic position of using `the stump,'
substituting the trunk of a fallen tree for their table. As
we broke suddenly in upon the card-players, Jason gave
unequivocal signs of a disposition to conceal his hand, by
thrusting the cards he held into his bosom, while he rapidly
put the remainder of the pack under his thigh, pressing it
down in a way completely to conceal it. This sudden
movement was merely the effect of a puritanical education,
which, having taught him to consider that as a sin which
was not necessarily a sin at all, exacted from him that
hypocrisy
which is the tribute that vice pays to virtue! Very
different was the conduct of the Rev. Mr. Worden. Taught
to discriminate better, and unaccustomed to set up arbitrary
rules of his own as the law of God, this loose observer of
his professional obligations in other matters, made a very
proper distinction in this. Instead of giving the least
manifestation
of confusion or alarm, the log on which he was
seated was not more unmoved than he remained, at our
sudden
appearance at his side.
I hope, Corny, my dear boy, Mr. Worden cried, that
you did not forget to purchase a few packs of cards; which,
I plainly see, will be a great resource for us, in this woody
region. These cards of Jason's are so thumbed and
handled
,
that they are not fit to be touched by a gentleman, as
I will show you.  Why, what has become of the pack,
Master Newcome?It was on the log but a minute ago!
Jason actually blushed! Yes, for a wonder, shame
induced
Jason Newcome to change colour! The cards were
reluctantly produced from beneath his leg, and there the
schoolmaster sat, as it might be in presence of his school,
actually convicted of being engaged in the damning sin of
Vol. II.  7
handling certain spotted pieces of paper, invented for, and
used in the combinations of a game played for amusement.
Had it been push-pin, now, Guert whispered, it would
give Mr. Newcome no trouble at all; but he does not admire
the idea of being caught at `All Fours, on a stump.' We
must say a word to relieve the poor sinner's distress. I have
cards, Mr. Worden, and they shall be much at your service,
as soon as we can come at our effects. There is one pack
in my knapsack, but it is a little soiled by use, though
somewhat
cleaner than that. If you wish it, I will hand it to
you. I never travel without carrying one or two clean
packs with me.
Not just now, sir, I thank you. I love a game of Whist,
or Picquet, but cannot say I am an admirer of All Fours.
As Mr. Newcome knows no other, we were merely killing
half an hour, at that game; but I have enough of it to last
me for the summer. I am glad that cards have not been
forgotten, however; for, I dare say, we can make up a very
respectable party at Whist, when we all meet.
That we can, sir, and a party that shall have its good
players. Miss Mary Wallace plays as good a hand at Whist,
as a woman should, Mr. Worden; and a very pretty
accomplishment
it is, for a lady to possess; useful, sir, as well as
entertaining; for anything is preferable to dummy. I do
not think a woman should play quite as well as a man, our
sex having a natural claim to lead, in all such things; but
it is very convenient, sometimes, to find a lady who can
hold her hand with coolness and skill.
I would not marry a woman who did not understand
Picquet, exclaimed the Rev. Mr. Worden; to say nothing
of Whist, and one or two other games. But, let us be
moving, since the hour is getting late.
Move on we did, and in due time we all reached the place
at which we were to halt for the night. This looked like
plunging into the wilderness indeed; for the house had but
two rooms, one of which was appropriated to the use of the
females, while most of us men took up our lodgings in the
barn. Anneke and Mary Wallace, however, showed the
most perfect good-humour; and our dinner, or supper might
better be the name, was composed of deliciously fat and
tender broiled pigeons. It was the pigeon season, the woods
being full of the birds; and we were told, we might expect
to feast on the young to satiety.
About noon the next day, we reached the first clearing
on the estate of Ravensnest. The country through which
we were travelling was rolling rather than bold; but it
possessed
a feature of grandeur in its boundless forests. Our
route, that day, lay under lofty arches of young leaves, the
buds just breaking into the first green of the foliage, tall,
straight columns, sixty, eighty, and sometimes a hundred
feet of the trunks of the trees, rising almost without a branch.
The pines, in particular, were really majestic, most of them
being a hundred and fifty feet in height, and a few, as I
should think, nearly if not quite two hundred. As
everything
grows towards the upper light, in the forest, this ought
not to surprise those who are accustomed to see vegetation
expand its powers in wide-spreading tops, and low, gnarled
branches that almost touch the ground, as is the case in the
open fields, and on the lawns of the older regions. As is
usual in the American virgin forest, there was very little
under-brush; and we could see frequently a considerable
distance through these long vistas of trees; or, indeed, until
the number of the stems intercepted the sight.
The clearings of Ravensnest were neither very large nor
very inviting. In that day, the settlement of new lands was
a slow and painful operation, and was generally made at a
great outlay to the proprietor. Various expedients were
adopted to free the earth from its load of trees;
[8]
[8]
The late venerable Hendrick Frey was a man well known to all
who dwelt in the valley of the Mohawk. He had been a friend,
contemporary
,
and it is believed an executor of the celebrated Sir
William
Johnson, Bart. Thirty years since, he related to the writer the
following anecdote. Young Johnson first appeared in the valley as
the agent of a property belonging to his kinsman, Admiral Sir Peter
Warren, K. B.; who, having married in the colony, had acquired
several estates in it. Among other tracts was one called
Warrensbush
,
on the Mohawk, on which young Johnson first resided.
Finding
it difficult to get rid of the trees around his dwelling, Johnson
sent down to the admiral, at New York, to provide some purchases
with which to haul the trees down to the earth, after grubbing and
cutting the roots on one side. An acre was lowered in this manner,
each tree necessarily lying at a larger angle to the earth than the
next beneath it. An easterly wind came one night, and, to
Johnson's
surprise, he found half his trees erect again, on rising in the
morning! The mode of clearing lands by `purchases' was then
abandoned.
Editor
.
for, at that
time, the commerce of the colonies did not reward the toil
of the settler in the same liberal manner as has since
occurred
.
Herman Mordaunt, as we moved along, related to
me the cost and trouble he had been at already, in getting
the ten or fifteen families who were on his property, in the
first place, to the spot itself; and, in the second place, to
induce them to remain there. Not only was he obliged to
grant leases for three lives, or, in some cases, for thirty or
forty years, at rents that were merely nominal, but, as a
rule, the first six or eight years the tenants were to pay no
rent at all. On the contrary, he was obliged to extend to
them many favours, in various ways, that cost no
inconsiderable
sum in the course of the year. Among other things,
his agent kept a small shop, that contained the most
ordinary
supplies used by families of the class of the settler, and
these he sold at little more than cost, for their
accommodation
,
receiving his pay in such articles as they could raise
from their half-tilled fields, or their sugar-bushes, and
turning
those again into money, only after they were transported
to Albany, at the end of a considerable period. In a word,
the commencement of such a settlement was an arduous
undertaking, and the experiment was not very likely to
succeed
,
unless the landlord had both capital and patience.
The political economist can have no difficulty in
discovering
the causes of the circumstances just mentioned. They
were to be found in the fact that people were scarce, while
land was superabundant. In such a condition of society, the
tenant had the choice of his farm, instead of the landlord's
having a selection of his tenants, and the latter were to be
bought only on such conditions as suited themselves.
You see, continued Herman Mordaunt, as we walked
together, conversing on this subject, that my twenty
thousand
acres are not likely to be of much use to myself, even
should they prove to be of any to my daughter. A century
hence, indeed, my descendants may benefit from all this
outlay of money and trouble; but it is not probable that
either I or Anneke will ever see the principal and interest
of the sums that will be expended in the way of roads,
bridges, mills, and other things of that sort. Years must go
by, before the light rents which will only begin to be paid a
year or two hence, and then only by a very few tenants,
can amount to a sufficient sum to meet the expenses of
keeping
up the settlement, to say nothing of the quit-rents to be
paid to the crown.
This is not very encouraging to a new beginner in the
occupation of a landlord, I answered; and, when I look
into the facts, I confess, I am surprised that so many
gentlemen
in the colony are willing to invest the sums they
annually
do in wild lands.
Every man who is at his ease in his moneyed affairs,
Corny, feels a disposition to make some provision for his
posterity. This estate, if kept together, and in single hands,
may make some descendant of mine a man of fortune. Half
a century will produce a great change in this colony; and,
at the end of that period, a child of Anneke's may be
thankful
that his mother had a father who was willing to throw
away a few thousands of his own, the surplus of a fortune
that was sufficient for his wants without them, in order that
his grandson may see them converted into tens, or possibly
into hundreds of thousands.
Posterity will, at least, owe us a debt of gratitude, Mr.
Mordaunt; for I now see that Mooseridge is not likely to
make either Dirck or myself very affluent patroons.
On that you may rely. Satanstoe will produce you
more than the large tracts you possess in this quarter.
Do you no longer fear, sir, that the war, and
apprehension
of Indian ravages, may drive your people off?
Not much at present, though the danger was great at
one time. The war
may
do me good, as well as harm.
The armies consume everything they can get  soldiers
resembling locusts, in this respect. My tenants have had
the commissaries among them; and, I am told, every blade
of grass they can spareall their surplus grain, potatoes,
butter, cheese, and, in a word, everything that can be eaten,
and with which they are willing to part, has been contracted
for at the top of the market. The King pays in gold, and
the sight of the precious metals will keep even a Yankee
from moving.
About the time this was said, we came in sight of the spot
6 *
Herman Mordaunt had christened Ravensnest; a name that
had since been applied to the whole property. It was a log
building, that stood on the verge of a low cliff of rocks, at a
point where a bird of that appellation had originally a nest
on the uppermost branches of a dead hemlock. The
building
had been placed, and erected, with a view to defence,
having served for some time as a sort of rallying point to
the families of the tenantry, in the event of an Indian alarm.
At the commencement of the present war, taking into view
the exposed position of his possessions on that frontier,
frontier as to settlement, if not as to territorial limits,
Herman
Mordaunt had caused some attention to be paid to his
fortifications; which, though they might not have satisfied
Mons. Vauban, were not altogether without merit, considered
in reference to their use in case of a surprise.
The house formed three sides of a parallelogram, the
open portion of the court in the centre, facing the cliff. A
strong picket served to make a defence against bullets on that
side; while the dead walls of solid logs were quite
impregnable
against any assault known in forest warfare, but that
of fire. All the windows opened on the court; while the
single outer door was picketed, and otherwise protected by
coverings of plank. I was glad to see by the extent of this
rude structure, which was a hundred feet long by fifty in
depth, that Anneke and Mary Wallace would not be likely
to be straitened for room. Such proved to be the fact;
Herman Mordaunt's agent having prepared four or five
apartments for the family, that rendered them as comfortable
as people could well expect to be in such a situation.
Everything
was plain, and many things were rude; but shelter,
warmth and security had not been neglected.
CHAPTER VI.
And long shall timorous fancy see
The painted chief and pointed spear;
And Reason's self shall bow the knee
To shadows and delusions here.
Freneau
.
It
is not necessary to dwell on the manner in which
Herman
Mordaunt and his companions became established at
Ravensnest. Two or three days sufficed to render them as
comfortable as circumstances would permit; then Dirck
and I bethought us of proceeding in quest of the lands of
Mooseridge. Mr. Worden and Jason both declined going
any further; the mill-seat, of which the last was in quest,
being, as I now learned, on the estate of Herman Mordaunt,
and having been for some time the subject of a negotiation
between the pedagogue and its owner. As for the divine,
he declared that he saw a suitable `field' for his missionary
labour where he was; while, it was easy to see, that he
questioned if there were fields of any sort, where we were
going.
Our party, on quitting Ravensnest, consisted of Dirck and
myself, Guert, Mr. Traverse, the surveyor, three
chain-bearers
,
Jaap or Yaap, Guert's man, Pete, and one
woodsman
or hunter. This would have given us ten vigorous
and well-armed men, for our whole force. It was thought
best, however, to add two Indians to our number, in the
double character of hunters and runners, or messengers.
One of these red-skins was called Jumper, in the language
of the settlement where we found them; and the other
Trackless; the latter
sobriquet
having been given him on
account of a faculty he possessed of leaving little or no trail
in his journeys and marches. This Indian was about
six-and-twenty
years of age, and was called a Mohawk, living
with the people of that tribe; though, I subsequently
ascertained
that he was, in fact, an Onondago
[9]
[9]
Pronounced On-on-daw-ger, the latter syllable hard; or, like ga,
as it is sometimes spelled. This is the name of one of the midland
counties of New York. The tribe from which it is derived, in these
later times, has ever borne a better name for morals, than its
neighbours
,
the Oneidas, the Mohawks, &c., &c. The Onondagoes
belonged
to the Six Nations.
Editor
.
by birth. His
true name was Susquesus, or Crooked Turns; an
appellation
that might or might not speak well of his character, as
the `turns' were regarded in a moral, or in a physical sense.
Take that man, Mr. Littlepage, by all means, said
Herman Mordaunt's agent, when the matter was under
discussion
.
You will find him as useful, in the woods, as
your pocket-compass, besides being a reasonably good
hunter. He left here, as a runner, during the heaviest of
the snows, last winter, and a trial was made to find his trail,
within half an hour after he had quitted the clearing, but
without success. He had not gone a mile in the woods,
before all traces of him were lost, as completely as if he had
made the journey in the air.
As Susquesus had a reputation for sobriety, as was apt
to be the case with the Onondagoes, the man was engaged,
though one Indian would have been sufficient for our
purpose
.
But Jumper had been previously hired; and it would
have been dangerous, under our circumstances, to offend a
red-man, by putting him aside for another, even after
compensating
him fully for the disappointment. By Mr.
Traverse's
advice, therefore, we took both. The Indian or
Mohawk name of Jumper, was Quissquiss, a term that, I
fancy, signified nothing very honourable or illustrious.
The girls betrayed deep interest in us, on our taking leave;
more, I thought, than either had ever before manifested.
Guert had told me, privately, of an intention, on his part, to
make another offer to Mary Wallace; and I saw the traces
of it in the tearful eyes and flushed cheeks of his mistress.
But, at such a moment, one does not stop to think much of
such things; there being tears in Anneke's eyes, as well as
in those of her friend. We had a thousand good wishes to
exchange; and we promised to keep open the
communication
between the two parties, by means of our runners,
semi-weekly. The distance, which would vary from fifteen
to thirty miles, would readily admit of this, since either of
the Indians would pass over it, with the greatest ease to
himself, in a day, at that season of the year.
After all, the separation was to be short, for we had
promised
to come over and dine with Herman Mordaunt on his
fiftieth birth-day, which would occur within three weeks.
This arrangement made the parting tolerable to us young
men, and our constitutional gaiety did the rest. Half an
hour after the last breakfast at Ravensnest saw us all on our
road, cheerful, if not absolutely happy. Herman Mordaunt
accompanied us three miles; which led him to the end of
his own settlements, and to the edge of the virgin forest.
There he took his leave, and we pursued our way with the
utmost diligence, for hours, with the compass for our guide,
until we reached the banks of a small river that was
supposed
to lie some three or four miles from the southern
boundaries of the patent we sought. I say, `supposed to
lie,' for there existed then, and, I believe, there still exists,
much uncertainty concerning the landmarks of different
estates in the woods. On the banks of this stream, which
was deep but not broad, the surveyor called a halt, and we
made our dispositions for dinner. Men who had walked as
far and as fast as we had done, made but little ceremony;
and for twenty minutes every one was busy in appeasing
his hunger. This was no sooner accomplished, however,
than Mr. Traverse summoned the Indians to the side of the
fallen tree on which we had taken our seats, when the first
occasion occurred for putting the comparative intelligence
of the two runners to the proof. At the same time the
principal
chain-bearer, a man whose life had been passed in his
present occupation, was brought into the consultation, as
follows.
We are now on the banks of this stream, and about this
bend in it, commenced the surveyor, pointing to the precise
curvature of the river on a map he had spread before him,
at which he supposed we were actually situated; and the
next thing is to find that ridge on which the moose was
killed, and across which the line of the patent we seek is
known to run. This abstract of the title tells us to look for
a corner somewhere off here, about a mile or a mile and a
half from this bend in the rivera black oak, with its top
broken off by the wind, and standing in the centre of a
triangle
made by three chestnuts. I think you told me, David,
that you had never borne a chain on any of these ridges?
No, sir, never; answered David, the old chain-bearer
already mentioned; my business never having brought me
out so far east.A black oak, with corner blazes on it, and
its top broken down by the wind, and standing atween three
chestnuts, howsomedever, can be nothing so very hard to
find, for a person that's the least acquainted. These Injins
will be the likeliest bodies to know that tree, if they've any
nat'ral knowledge of the country.
Know a tree! There we were, and had been for many
hours, in the bosom of the forest, with trees in thousands
ranged around us; trees had risen on our march, as horizon
extends beyond horizon on the ocean, and this chain-bearer
fancied it might be in the power of one who often passed
through these dark and untenanted mazes, to recognise any
single member of those countless oaks, and beeches, and
pines! Nevertheless, Mr. Traverse did not seem to regard
David's suggestion as so very extravagant, for he turned
towards the Indians and addressed himself to them.
How's this? he asked; Jumper, do you know
anything
of the sort of tree I have described?
No, was the short, sententious answer.
Then, I fear, there is little hope that Trackless is any
wiser, as you are Mohawk born, and
he
, they tell me, is at
bottom an Onondago. What say you, Trackless? can you
help us to find the tree?
My eyes were fastened on Susquesus, as soon as the
Indians
were mentioned. There he stood, straight as the
trunk of a pine, light and agile in person, with nothing but
his breech-cloth, moccasins, and a blue calico shirt belted
to his loins with a scarlet band, through which was thrust
the handle of his tomahawk, and to which were attached his
shot-pouch and horn, while his rifle rested against his body,
butt downward. Trackless was a singularly handsome
Indian, the unpleasant peculiarities of his people being but
faintly portrayed in his face and form; while their nobler
and finer qualities came out in strong relief. His nose was
almost aquiline; his eye, dark as night, was restless and
piercing; his limbs Apollo-like; and his front and bearing
had all the fearless dignity of a warrior, blended with the
grace of nature. The only obvious defects were in his walk,
which was Indian, or in-toed and bending at the knee; but,
to counterbalance these, his movements were light, springy,
and swift. I fancied him, in figure, the very
beau-idal
of
a runner.
During the time the surveyor was speaking, the eye of
Susquesus was seemingly fastened on vacancy, and I would
have defied the nicest observer to detect any consciousness of
what was in hand, in the countenance of this forest stoic.
It was not his business to speak, while an older runner and
an older warrior was presentfor Jumper was bothand
he waited for others, who might know more, to reveal their
knowledge ere he produced his own. Thus directly
addressed
,
however, all reserve vanished, and he advanced two
or three steps, cast a curious glance at the map, even put a
finger on the river, the devious course of which it followed
across the map, much as a child would trace any similar
object that attracted his attention. Susquesus knew but
little of maps, it was clear enough; but the result showed
that he knew a great deal about the woods, his native field
of action.
Well, what do you make of my map, Trackless,
repeated
the surveyor. Is it not drawn to suit your fancy?
Goodreturned the Onondago, with emphasis. Now
show Susquesus
your
oak tree.
Here it is, Trackless. You see it is a tree drawn in
ink, with a broken top, and here are the three chestnuts, in
a sort of triangle, around it.
The Indian examined the tree with some interest, and a
slight smile illumined his handsome, though dark
countenance
.
He was evidently pleased at this proof of accuracy
in the colony surveyors, and, no doubt, thought the better
of them for the fidelity of their work.
Good, he repeated, in his low, guttural, almost
feminine
voice, so soft and mild in its tone.
Very
good. The
pale-faces know everything! Now, let my brother find the
tree.
That is easier said than done, Susquesus, answered
Traverse, laughing. It is one thing to sketch a tree on a
map, and another to go to its root, as it stands in the forest,
surrounded by thousands of other trees.
Pale-face must first see him, or how paint him? Where
painter?
Ay, the surveyor saw the tree once, and marked it once,
but that is not finding it again. Can you tell me where the
oak stands? Mr. Littlepage will give the man who finds
that corner a French crown. Put me anywhere on the line
of the old survey, and I will ask favours of no one.
Painted tree
there
, said Susquesus, pointing a little
scornfully at the map, as it seemed to me. Pale-face can't
find him in wood. Live tree out younder; Injin know.
Trackless pointed with great dignity towards the
north-east
,
standing motionless as a statue the while, as if inviting
the closest possible scrutiny into the correctness of his
assertion
.
Can you lead us to the tree? demanded Traverse,
eagerly. Do it, and the money is yours.
Susquesus made a significant gesture of assent; then he
set about collecting the scanty remains of his dinner, a
precaution
in which we imitated him, as a supper would be
equally agreeable as the meal just taken, a few hours later.
When everything was put away, and the packs were on our
shouldersnot on those of the Indians, for
they
seldom
condescended
to carry burthens, which was an occupation for
women  Trackless led the way, in the direction he had
already pointed out.
Well did the Onondago deserve his name, as it seemed to
me, while he threaded his way through that gloomy forest,
without path, mark or sign of any sort, that was intelligible
to others. His pace was between a walk and a gentle trot,
and it required all our muscles to keep near him. He
looked to neither the right nor the left, but appeared to
pursue
his course guided by an instinct, or as the keen-scented
hound follows the viewless traces of his game. This lasted
for ten minutes, when Traverse called another halt, and we
clustered together in council.
How much further do you think it may be to the tree,
Onondago? demanded the surveyor, as soon as the whole
party was collected in a circle. I have a reason for
asking
.
So many minutes, answered the Indian, holding up
five fingers, or the four fingers and thumb of his right hand.
Oak with broken top, and pale-face marks,
there
.
The precision and confidence with which the Trackless
pointed, not a little surprised me, for I could not imagine
how any human being could pretend to be minutely certain
of such a fact, under the circumstances in which we were
placed. So it was, however; and so it proved in the end.
In the mean time, Traverse proceeded to carry out his own
plans.
As we are so near to the tree, he said, for the surveyor
had no doubt of the red-man's accuracy,
we
must also be
near the line. The last runs north and south, on this part
of the patent, and we shall shortly cross it. Spread
yourselves
,
therefore, chain-bearers, and look for blazed trees;
for, put me anywhere on the boundaries, and I 'll answer
for finding any oak, beech, or maple, that is mentioned in
the corners.
As soon as this order was received, all the surveyor's
men obeyed, opening the order of their march, and
spreading
themselves in a way to extend their means of observing
materially. When all was ready, a sign was made to the
Indian to proceed. Susquesus obeyed, and we were all
soon in quick motion again.
Guert's activity enabled him to keep nearest to the
Onondago
,
and a shout from his clear, full throat, first announced
the complete success of the search. In a moment the rest
of us pressed forward, and were soon at the end of our
journey
.
There was Susquesus, quietly leaning against the
trunk of the broken oak, without the smallest expression of
triumph in either his manner or his countenance. That
which he had done, he had done naturally, and without any
apparent effort or hesitation. To him the forest had its
signs, and metes, and marksas the inhabitant of the vast
capital has his means of threading its mazes with the
readiness
of familiarity and habit. As for Traverse, he first
examined the top of the tree, where he found the indicated
fracture; then he looked round for the three chestnuts, each
of which was in its place; after which he drew near to look
into the more particular signs of his craft. There they were,
three of the inner sides of the oak being blazed, the proof it
was a corner; while that which had no scar on its surface
looked outward, or from the Patent of Mooseridge. Just
as all these agreeable facts were ascertained, shouts from
the chain-bearers south of us, announced that they had
discovered
Vol. II.  8
the linemen of their stamp being quite as
quick-sighted
,
in ascertaining their own peculiar traces, as the
native of the forest is in finding his way to any object in it
which he has once seen, and may desire to revisit. By
following the line, these men soon joined us, when they
gave us the additional information that they had also
actually
found the skeleton of the moose that had given its name
to the estate.
Thus far, all was well, our success much exceeding our
hopes. The hunters were sent to look for a spring; and,
one being found at no great distance, we all repaired to the
spot, and hutted for the night. Nothing could be more
simple than our encampment; which consisted of coverings
made of the branches of trees, with leaves and skins for our
beds. Next day, however, Traverse finding the position
favourable for his work, he determined to select the spot as
head-quarters; and we all set about the erection of a
log-house
,
in which we might seek a shelter in the event of a
storm, and where we might deposit our implements, spare
ammunition, and such stores as we had brought with us on
our backs. As everybody worked with good-will at the
erection of this rude building, and the labourers were very
expert with the axe, we had it nearly complete by the
setting
of the next day's sun. Traverse chose the place
because
the water was abundant, and good, and because a
small knoll was near the spring, that was covered with
young pines that were about fourteen or fifteen inches in
diameter, while they grew to the height of near a hundred
feet, with few branches, and straight as the Onondago.
These trees were felled, cut into lengths of twenty and thirty
feet, notched at the ends, and rolled alternately on each
other, so as to enclose an area that was one-third longer
than it was wide. The notches were deep, and brought the
logs within two or three inches of each other; and the
interstices
were filled with pieces of riven chestnut, a wood that
splits easily and in straight lines; which pieces were driven
hard into their beds, so as to exclude the winds and the
rains. As the weather was warm, and the building
somewhat
airy at the best, we cut no windows, though we had
a narrow door in the centre of one of the longer sides. For
a roof we used the bark of the hemlock, which, at that
season, came off in large pieces, and which was laid on
sticks, raised to the desired elevation by means of a
ridgepole
.
All this was making no more than one of the common
log-houses of the new settlements, though in a more hurried
and a less artificial manner than was usual. We had no
chimney, for our cooking could be done in the open air;
and less attention was paid to the general finish of the work,
than might have been the case had we expected to pass the
winter there. The floor was somewhat rude, but it had the
effect of raising us from the ground, and giving us perfectly
dry lodgings; an advantage not always obtained in the
woods. It was composed of logs roughly squared on three
sides, and placed on sleepers. To my surprise, Traverse
directed a door to be made of riven logs, that were pinned
together with cross-pieces, and which was hung on the
usual wooden hinges. When I spoke of this as unnecessary
labour, occupying two men an entire day to complete, he
reminded me that we were much in advance from the
settlements
;
that an active war was being waged around us, and
that the agents of the French had been very busy among
our own tribes, while those in Canada often pushed their
war-parties far within our borders. He had always found
a great satisfaction, as well as security, in having a sort of
citadel to retreat to, when on these exposed surveys; and
he never neglected the necessary precaution, when he
fancied
himself in the least danger.
We were quite a week in completing our house; though,
after the first day, neither the surveyor nor his
chain-bearers
troubled themselves with the labour, any further than
to make an occasional suggestion. Traverse and his men
went to work in their own pursuit, running lines to divide
the patent into its great lots, each of which was made to
contain a thousand acres. It should be mentioned that all
the surveys, in that day, were made on the most liberal
scale, our forty thousand acres turning out, in the end, to
amount to quite three thousand more. So it was with the
subdivisions of the Patent, each of which was found to be
of more than the nominal dimensions. Blazed trees, and
records cut into the bark, served to indicate the lines, while
a map went on
pari passu
with the labour, the field-book
containing a description of each lot, in order that the
proprietor
of the estate might have some notions of the nature
of its soil and surface, as well as of the quality and sizes of
the trees it bore.
The original surveyors, those on whose labours the
patent
of the King was granted, had a comparatively trifling
duty to perform. So long as they gave a reasonably
accurate
outline of an area that would contain forty thousand
acres of land, more or less, and did not trespass on any prior
grant, no material harm could be done, there being no
scarcity of surface in the colony; but, Mr. Traverse had to
descend to a little more particularity. It is true, he ran out
his hundreds of acres daily, duly marking his corners and
blazing his line trees, but something very like a summer's
work lay before him. This he understood, and his
proceedings
were as methodical and deliberate as the nature of his
situation required.
In a very few days, things had gotten fairly in train, and
everybody was employed in some manner that was found to
be useful. The surveying party was making a very
satisfactory
progress, running out their great lots between sun
and sun, while Dirck and myself made the notes concerning
their quality, under the dictation of Mr. Traverse. Guert
did little besides shoot and fish, keeping our larder well
supplied
with trout, pigeons, squirrels, and such other game as
the season would allow, occasionally knocking over
something
in the shape of poor venison. The hunters brought
us their share of eatables also; and we did well enough, in
this particular, more especially as trout proved to be very
abundant. Yaap, or Jaap, as I shall call him in future, and
Pete, performed domestic duty, acting as scullions and cooks,
though the first was much better fitted to perform the
service
of a forester. The two Indians did little else, for the
first fortnight, but come and go between Ravensnest and
Mooseridge, carrying missives and acting as guides to the
hunters, who went through once or twice within that period,
to bring us out supplies of flour, groceries, and other similar
necessaries; no inducement being able to prevail on the
Indians to carry anything that approached a burthen, either
in weight or appearance.
The surveying party did not always return to the hut at
night, but it `'camped out,' as they called it, whenever the
work led them to a distance on the other side of the tract.
Mr. Traverse had chosen his position for head-quarters
more in reference to its proximity to the settlement at
Ravensnest
,
than in reference to its position on the Patent. It was
sufficiently central to the latter, as regarded a north and
south line, but was altogether on the western side of the
property. As his surveys extended east, therefore, he was
often carried too far from the building to return to it each
night, though his absences never extended beyond the
evening
of the third day. In consequence of this arrangement,
his people were enabled to carry the food they required
without inconvenience, for the periods they were away,
coming back for fresh supplies as the lines brought them
west again. Sundays were strictly observed by us all, as
days of rest; a respect to the day that is not always
observed
in the forest; he who is in the solitude of the woods,
like him who roams athwart the wastes of the ocean, often
forgetting that the spirit of the Creator is abroad equally on
the ocean and on the land, ready to receive that homage of
his creatures, which is a tribute due to beneficence without
bounds, a holiness that is spotless, and a truth that is
inherent
.
As Jumper, or the Trackless, returned from his
constantly
recurring visits to our neighbours, we young men
waited with impatience for the letter that the messenger was
certain to bear. This letter was sometimes written by
Herman
Mordaunt himself, but oftener by Anneke, or Mary
Wallace. It was addressed to no one by name, but
uniformly
bore the superscription of `To the Hermits of
Mooseridge
;'
nor was there anything in the language to betray
and particular attention to either of the party. We might
have liked it better, perhaps, could we have received epistles
that were a little more pointed in this particular; but those
we actually got were much too precious to leave any serious
grounds of complaint. One from Herman Mordaunt reached
us on the evening of the second Saturday, when our whole
party was at home, and assembled at supper. It was brought
in by the Trackless, and, among other matters, contained
this paragraph:
We learn that things hourly assume a more serious
8 *
aspect with the armies. Our troops are pushing north, in
large bodies, and the French are said to be reinforcing.
Living as we do, out of the direct line of march, and fully
thirty miles in the rear of the old battle-grounds, I should
feel no apprehension, were it not for a report I hear, that
the woods are full of Indians. I very well know that such
a report invariably accompanies the near approach of
hostilities
in the frontier settlements, and is to be received with
many grains of allowance; but it seems so probable the
French should push their savages on this flank of our army,
to annoy it on the advance, that, I confess, the rumour has
some influence on my feelings. We have been fortifying
still more; and I would advise you not to neglect such a
precaution altogether. The Canadian Indians are said to be
more subtle than our own; nor is government altogether
without the apprehension that our own have been tampered
with. It was said at Albany, that much French silver had
been seen in the hands of the people of the Six Nations; and
that even French blankets, knives, and tomahawks, were
more plentiful among them than might be accounted for by
the ordinary plunder of their warfare. One of your
runners
,
the man who is called the Trackless, is said to live
out of his own tribe; and such Indians are always to be
suspected. Their absence is sometimes owing to reasons
that are creditable; but far oftener to those that are not.
It may be well to have an eye on the conduct of this man.
After all, we are in the hands of a beneficent and gracious
God, and we know how often his mercy has saved us, on
occasions more trying than this!
This letter was read several times, among ourselves,
including
Mr. Traverse. As the
oi polloi
of our party were
eating out of ear-shot, and the Indians had left us, it
naturally
induced a conversation that turned on the risks we ran,
and on the probability of Susquesus's being false.
As for the rumour that the woods are full of Indians,
the surveyor quietly observed, it is very much as Herman
Mordaunt saysthere is never a blanket seen, but fame
magnifies it into a whole bale. There is danger to be
apprehended
from savages, I will allow, but not one-half that
the settlers ordinarily imagine. As for the French, they
are likely to need all their savages at Ty; for, they tell me,
Gen. Abercrombie will go against them with three men to
their one.
With that superiority, at least, I answered; but,
after all, would not a sagacious officer be likely to annoy
his flank, in the manner here mentioned?
We are every mile of forty to the eastward of the line
of march; and why should parties keep so distant from their
enemies?
Even such a supposition would place our foes between
us and our friends; no very comfortable consideration, of
itself. But, what think you of this hint concerning the
Onondago?
There may be truth in
that
more than in the report
that the woods are full of savages. It is usually a bad sign
when an Indian quits his tribe; and this runner of ours is
certainly an Onondago;
that
I know, for the fellow has
twice refused rum. Bread he will take, as often as offered;
but rum has not wet his lips, since I have seen him, offered
in fair weather or foul.
T'at
is
a bad signput in Guert, a little dogmatically
for him. T'e man t'at refuses his glass, in good company,
has commonly something wrong in his morals. I always
keep clear of such chaps.
Poor Guert!How true that was, and what an influence
the opinion had on his character and habits. As for the
Indian, I could not judge him so harshly. There was
something
in his countenance that disposed me to put confidence
in him, at the very moment his cold, abstracted manners
cold and abstracted even for a red-skin in pale-face
company
created
doubts and distrust.
Certainly, nothing is easier than for a man in his
situation
to sell us, I answered, after a short pause, if he be
so disposed. But, what could the French gain by cutting
off a party as peaceably employed as this? It can be of no
moment to them, whether Mooseridge be surveyed into lots
this year, or the next.
Quite true; and I am of opinion that Mons. Montcalm
is very indifferent whether it be ever surveyed at all,
returned
Traverse, who was an intelligent and tolerably
educated
man. You forget, however, Mr. Littlepage, that
both parties offer such things as premiums on scalps.
A Huron may not care about our lines, corners, and marked
trees; but he
does
care, a great deal, whether he is to go
home with an empty string, or with half-a-dozen human
scalps at his girdle.
I observed that Dirck thrust his fingers through his bushy
hair, and that his usually placid countenance assumed an
indignant and semi-ferocious appearance. A little amused
at this, I walked towards the log on which Susquesus was
seated, having ended his meal, in silent thought.
What news do you bring us from the red-coats,
Trackless
?
I asked, with as much of an air of indifference as I
could assume. Are they out in sufficient numbers to eat
the French?
Look at leaves; count 'em; answered the Indian.
Yes, I know they are in force; but, what are the
red-skins
about? Is the hatchet buried, among the Six
Nations
,
that you are satisfied with being a runner, when
scalps may be had near Ticonderoga?
Susquesus
Onondago
the red-man replied, laying a
strong emphasis on the name of his tribe. No Mohawk
blood run in him.
His
people no dig up hatchet, this
summer
.
Why not, Trackless? You are allies of the Yengeese,
and ought to give us your aid, when it is wanted.
Count leaves  count Yengeese. Too much for one
army. No want Onondago.
That may be true, possibly, for we are certainly very
strong. But, how is it with the woodsare they altogether
clear of red-skins, in times as troublesome as these?
Susquesus looked grave, but he made no answer. Still,
he did not endeavour to avoid the keen look I fastened on
his face, but sat composed, rigid, and gazing before him.
Knowing the uselessness of attempting to get anything out
of an Indian, when he was indisposed to be communicative,
I thought it wisest to change the discourse. This I did by
making a few general inquiries as to the state of the streams,
all of which were answered, when I walked away.
CHAPTER VII.
Fear not, till Birnam Wood
Shall come to Dunsinane.
Macbeth
.
I cannot
say I was quite satisfied with the manner of
Susquesus; nor, on the other hand, was I absolutely
uneasy
.
All might be well; and, if it were not, the power of
this man to injure us could not be very great. A new
occurrence
,
however, raised very unpleasant doubts of his
honesty. Jumper being out on a hunt, the Onondago was
sent across to Ravensnest the next trip, out of his turn; but,
instead of returning, as had been the practice of both, the
next day, we saw no more of him for near a fortnight. As
we talked over this sudden and unexpected disappearance,
we came to the conclusion, that, perceiving he was
distrusted
,
the fellow had deserted, and would be seen no more.
During his absence, we paid a visit to Ravensnest ourselves,
spending two or three happy days with the girls, whom we
found delighted with the wildness of their abode, and as
happy as innocence, health, and ceaseless interest in the
forest and its habits, could make them. Herman Mordaunt,
having fortified his house sufficiently, as he fancied, to
remove
all danger of an assault, returned with us to
Mooseridge
,
and passed two or three days in walking over and
examining the quality of the land, together with the
advantages
offered by the water-courses. As for Mr. Worden
and Jason, the former had gone to join the army, craving
the flesh-pots of a regimental mess, in preference to the
simple fare of the woods; while Jason had driven a hard
bargain with Herman Mordaunt for the possession of the
mill-seat; which had been the subject of frequent
discussions
between the parties, and about which the pedagogue
had deemed it prudent to draw on the wisdom of Mother
Doortje. As the reader may have some curiosity to know
how such things were conducted in the colony, in the year
1758, I will recapitulate the terms of the bargain that was
finally agreed on, signed and sealed.
Herman Mordaunt expected no emolument to himself,
from Ravensnest, but looked forward solely to a provision
for posterity. In consequence of these views, he refused to
sell, but gave leases on such conditions as would induce
tenants to come into his terms, in a country in which land
was far plentier than men. For some reason, that never
was very clear to me, he was particularly anxious to secure
Jason Newcome, and no tolerable terms seemed extravagant
to effect his purpose. It is not surprising, therefore, that
our miller in perspective got much the best of the bargain,
as its conditions will show.
The lease was for three lives, and twenty-one years
afterwards
.
This would have been thought equal to a lease for
forty-two years, in that day, in Europe; but experience is
showing that it is, in truth, for a much longer period, in
America.
[10]
[10]
It has been found that a three lives' lease, in the State of New
York, is equal to a term of more than thirty years.
Editor
.
The first ten years, no rent at all was to be
paid. For the next ten, the land, five hundred acres, was
to pay sixpence currency an acre, the tenant having the
right to cut timber at pleasure. This was a great
concession
,
as the mill-lot contained much pine. For the
remainder
of the lease, be it longer or shorter, a shilling an
acre, or about sixpense sterling, was to be paid for the land,
and forty pounds currency, or one hundred dollars a year,
for the mill-seat. The mills to be taken by the landlord, at
an appraisal `made by men', at the expiration of the lease;
the tenant to pay the taxes. The tenant had the privilege
of using all the materials for his dams, buildings, &c., he
could find on the land.
The policy of the owners of Mooseridge was different.
We intended to sell at low prices, at first, reserving for
leases hereafter, such farms as could not be immediately
disposed of, or for which the purchaser failed to pay. In
this manner it was thought we should sooner get returns for
our outlays, and sooner `build up a settlement,' as the
phrase goes. In America, the reader should know,
everything
is `built.' The priest `builds up' a flock; the
speculator
,
a fortune; the lawyer, a reputation; and the landlord,
a settlement; sometimes, with sufficient accuracy in
language
,
he even builds a town.
Jason was a very happy man, the moment he got his
lease, signed and sealed, in his own possession. It made
him a sort of a land-holder on the spot, and one who had
nothing to pay for ten years to come. God forgive me, if I
do the man injustice; but, from the first, I had a suspicion
that Jason trusted to fortune to prevent any pay-day from
ever coming at all. As for Herman Mordaunt, he seemed
satisfied, for he fancied that he had got a man of some
education
on his property, who might answer a good purpose
in civilizing, and in otherwise advancing the interests of his
estate.
Just as the rays of the rising sun streamed through the
crevices of our log tenement, and ere one of us three idlers
had risen from his pallet, I heard a moccasined foot moving
near me, in the nearly noiseless tread of an Indian.
Springing
to my feet, I found myself face to face with the missing
Onondago!
You here, Susquesus! I exclaimed; we supposed
you had abandoned us. What has brought you back?
Time to go, now, answered the Indian, quietly.
Yengeese and Canada warrior soon fight.
Is this true!And do you,
can
you know it to be true!
Where have you been this fortnight past?
Been seehave seeknow him just so. Comecall
young men; go on war-path.
Here, then, was an explanation of the mystery of the
Onondago's absence! He had heard us speak of an
intention
of moving with the troops, at the last moment, and he
had gone to reconnoitre, in order that we might have
seasonable
notice when it would be necessary to quit the `Ridge,'
as we familiarly termed the Patent. I saw nothing
treasonable
in this, but rather deemed it a sign of friendly interest
in our concerns; though it was certainly `running' much
farther than the Indian had been directed to proceed, and
`running' a little off the track. One might overlook such
an irregularity in a savage, however, more especially as I
began to weary of the monotony of our present manner of
living, and was not sorry to discover a plausible apology for
a change.
The reader may be certain, it was not long before I had
communicated the intelligence brought by the Trackless, to
my companions; who received it as young men would be
apt to listen to tidings so stirring. The Onondago was
summoned to our council, and he renewed his protestation
that it was time for us to be moving.
No stop he answered, when questioned again on the
subject; time go. Canoe readygun loadedwarrior
counted  chief woke up  council fire gone out. Time,
go.
Well then, Corny, said Guert, rising and stretching
his fine frame like a lion roused from his lair, here 's off.
We can go to Ravensnest to sleep, to-day; and, to-morrow
we will work our way out into the highway, and fall into
the line of march of the army. I shall have another
opportunity
of seeing Mary Wallace, and of telling her how much
I love her. That will be so much gained, at all events.
No see squawno go to Nest! said the Indian, with
energy. War-path
this
way, pointing in a direction that
might have varied a quarter of a circle from that to Herman
Mordaunt's settlement. Bad for warrior to see squaw
when he dig up hatchetonly make woman of him. No;
go this waypath there  no here  scalp theresquaw
here.
As the gestures of the Onondago were quite as significant
as his language, we had no difficulty in understanding him.
Guert continued his questions, however, while dressing, and
we all soon became convinced, by the words of the Indian,
broken and abrupt as they were, that Abercrombie was on
the point of embarking with his army on Lake George, and
that we must needs be active, if we intended to be present
at the contemplated operations in front of Ticonderoga.
Our decision was soon reached, and our preparations
made. By packing and shouldering his knapsack, and
arming himself, each man would be ready; though a short
delay grew out of the absence of Traverse and his
chain-bearers
.
We wrote a letter, however, explaining the reason
of our intended absence, promising to return as soon as the
operations in front of Ty should be terminated. This letter
we left with Pete, who was to remain as cook, though Jaap
bestirred himself, loaded his broad shoulders with certain
indispensables for our march, took his rifle, pack and horn,
and was ready to move as soon as any of us. All this the
fellow did, moreover, without orders; deeming it a part of
his duty to follow his young master, even if he followed
him to evil. No dog, indeed, could be truer, in this
particular
,
than Jaap or Jacob Satanstoe, for he had adopted the
name of the Neck as his patronymic; much as the nobles
of other regions style themselves after
their
lands.
When all was ready, and we were on the point of
quitting
the hut, the question arose seriously, whether we were
to go by Ravensnest, or by the new route that the Onondago
had mentioned. Path there was not, in either direction;
but, we had land-marks, springs, and other known signs,
on the former; while of the latter we literally knew nothing.
Then Anneke and Mary Wallace, with their bright,
blooming
,
sunny facesbright and happy whenever we appeared,
most certainly, of latewere in the former direction, and
even Dirck cried out `for Ravensnest.' But, on that route
the Onondago refused to stir one foot. He stood, resembling
a finger-post, pointing north-westerly with an immovable
obstinacy, that threatened to bring the order of our march
into some confusion.
We know nothing of that route, Trackless, Guert
observed
,
or rather replied, for the Indian's manner was so
expressive as to amount to a remark, and we would rather
travel a road with which we are a little acquainted.
Besides
,
we wish to pay our parting compliments to the
ladies.
Squaw no good, now  war-path no go to squaw.
HuronFrench warrior, here.
Ay, and they are there, too. We shall be on their heels
soon enough, by going to Ravensnest.
No soon 'noughcan't do him. Path long, time short.
Pale-face warrior in great hurry.
Pale-face warriors' friends are in a hurry, tooso you
will do well to follow us, as we do not intend to follow you.
Come, gentlemen, we will lead the Indian, as the Indian
does not seem disposed to lead us. After a mile or two he
will think it more honourable to go in advance; and, for
that distance, I believe, I can show you the way.
That road good for young men who don't want see
enemy! said Susquesus, with ironical point.
By St. Nicholas! Indian, what do you mean? cried
Vol. II.  9
Guert, turning short on his heels and moving swiftly
towards
the Onondago, who did not wait for the menacing
blow, but wheeled in his tracks and led off, at a quick pace,
directly towards the north-west.
I do believe that Guert pursued, for the first minute, with
no other intention than that of laying his powerful arm on
the offender's shoulder; but I dropped in on his footsteps so
soon, Dirck following me, and Jaap Dirck, that we were all
moving off Indian file, or in the fashion of the woods, at the
rate of four miles in the hour, almost before we knew it.
An impulse of that angry nature is not over in a minute,
and, before either of us had sufficiently cooled to be entirely
reasonable, the whole party was fairly out of sight of the
hut. After that no one appeared to think of the necessity
or of the expediency of reverting to the original intention.
It was certainly indiscreet, thus to confide absolutely in the
good faith of a savage, or a semi-savage, at least, whom we
scarcely knew, and whom we had actually distrusted; but
we did it, and precisely in the manner and under the feelings
I have described. I know that we all thought of the
indiscretion
of which we had been guilty, after the first mile;
but each was too proud to make the other acquainted with
his misgivings. I say all, but Jaap ought to be excepted,
for nothing in the shape of danger ever gave that negro any
concern, unless it was spooks. He
was
afraid of `spooks,'
but he did not fear man.
Susquesus manifested the same confidence in his
knowledge
of the woods, while now leading the way, league after
league through the dark forest, as he had done when he took
us to the oak with the broken top. On this occasion, he
guided us more by the sun, and the course generally, than
by any acquaintance with objects that we passed; though,
three times that day did he point out to us particular things
that he had before seen, while traversing the woods in
directions
that crossed, at angles more or less oblique, the line of
our present route. As for us, it was like a sailor's pointing
to a path on the trackless ocean. We had our
pocket-compasses
,
it is true, and understood well enough that a
north-west course would bring us out somewhere near the
foot of Lake George; but, I much doubt if we could have
made, by any means, as direct a line, by their aid, as we
did by that of the Indian.
On this subject we had a discussion among ourselves, I
well remember, when we halted to eat and rest, a little after
the turn of the day. For five hours had we walked with
great rapidity, much as the bird flies, so far as course was
concerned, never turning aside, unless it might be to avoid
some impassable obstacle; and our calculation was that we
had made quite twenty, of the forty miles we had to go over,
according to the Onondago's account of the probable length
of our journey. We had strung our sinews and hardened
our muscles in such a way as to place us above the
influence
of common fatigue; yet, it must be confessed, the
Indian
was much the freshest of the five, when we reached
the spring where we dined.
An Indian does seem to have a nose much like that of
a hound, said Guert, as our appetites began to be appeased;
that
must be admitted. Yet I think, Corny, a compass
would carry a man through the woods with more certainty
than any signs on the bark of trees, or looks at the sun.
A compass cannot err, of course; but it would be a
troublesome thing to be stopping every minute or two, to
look at your compass, which must have time to become
steady, you will remember, or it would become a guide that
is worse than none.
Every minute or two! Say once in an hour, or once
in half an hour, at most. I would engage to travel as
straight as the best Indian of them all, by looking at my
compass once in half an hour.
Susquesus was seated near enough to us three to
overhear
our conversation, and he understood English perfectly,
though he spoke it in the usual, clipped manner of an Indian.
I thought I could detect a covert gleam of contempt in his
dark countenance, at this boast of Guert's; but he made no
remark. We finished our meal, rested our legs, and, when
our watches told us it was one o'clock, we rose in a body
to resume our march. We were renewing the priming of
our rifles, a precaution each man took twice every day, to
prevent the effects of the damps of the woods, when the
Onondago quietly fell in behind Guert, patiently waiting the
leisure of the latter.
We are all ready, Trackless, cried the Albanian;
give us the lead and the step, as before.
No  answered the Indian. Compass lead, now.
Susquesus no see any longer,blind as young dog.
Oh! that is your game, is it! Well, let it be so. Now,
Corny, you shall learn the virtue there is in a compass.
Hereupon Guert drew his compass from a pocket in his
hunting-shirt, placed it on a log, in order to get a perfectly
accurate start, and waited until the quivering needle had
become perfectly stationary. Then he made his
observation
,
and took a large hemlock, which stood at the distance
of some twenty rods, a great distance for a sight in the
forest, as his land-mark, gave a shout, caught up his
compass
,
and led off. We followed, of course, and soon reached
the tree. As Guert now fancied he was well entered on the
right course, he disdained to turn to renew his observation,
but called out for us to `come on;' as he had a new tree
for his guide, and that in the true direction. We may
have proceeded in this manner for half a mile, and I began
to think that Guert was about to triumphfor, to me, it did
really seem that our course was as straight as it had been
at any time that day. Guert now began to brag of had
success
,
talking
to
me, and
at
the Indian, who was between us,
over his shoulder.
You see, Corny, he said, I am used to the bush,
after all, and have often been up among the Mohawks, and
on their hunts. The great point is to begin right; after
which you can have no great trouble. Make certain of the
first ten rods, and you can be at ease about the ten
thousand
that are to follow. So it is with life, Corny, boy;
begin right, and a young man is pretty certain of coming
out right. I made a mistake at the start, and you see the
trouble it has given me. But, I was left an orphan,
Littlepage
,
at ten years of age; and the boy that has neither father
nor money, must be an uncommon boy not to kick himself
out of the traces before he is twenty. Well, Onondago,
what do you say to following the compass, now!
Best look at himhe tell, answered Susquesus, our
whole line halting to let Guert comply.
This dd compass will never come round! exclaimed
Guert, shaking the little instrument in order to help the
needle round to the point at which he wished to see it stand.
These little devils are very apt to get out of order, Corny,
after all.
Try moregot threesaid the Indian, holding up the
number of fingers he mentioned, as was his wont, when
mentioning numbers of any sort.
On this hint Dirck and I drew out our compasses, and
the three were placed on a log, at the side of which we had
come to our halt. The result showed that the three `little
devils' agreed most accurately, and that we were marching
exactly south-east, instead of north-west! Guert looked, on
that occasion, very much as he did when he rose from the
snow, after the hand-sled had upset with us. There was no
resisting the truth; we had got turned completely round,
without knowing it. The fact that the sun was so near the
zenith, probably contributed to our mistake; but, any one
who has tried the experiment, will soon ascertain how easy
it is for him to lose his direction, beneath the obscurity and
amid the inequalities of a virgin forest. Guert gave it up,
like a man as he was, and the Indian again passed in front,
without the slightest manifestation of triumph or discontent.
It required nothing less than a thunderbolt to disturb the
composure of that Onondago!
From that moment our progress was as swift as it had
been previously to the halt; while our course was seemingly
as unerring as the flight of the pigeon. Susquesus did not
steer exactly north-west, as before, however, but he inclined
more northerly. At length, it was just as the sun
approached
the summits of the western mountains, an opening
appeared in our front, beneath the arches of the woods, and
we knew that a lake was near us, and that we were on the
summit of high land, though at what precise elevation could
not yet be told. Our route had lain across hills, and through
valleys, and along small streams; though, as I afterwards
ascertained, the Hudson did not run far enough north to
intercept our march; or rather, by a sudden turn to the
west, it left our course clear. Had we inclined westwardly
ourselves, we might have almost done that which Col.
Follock
had once laughingly recommended to my mother, in
order to avoid the dangers of the Powles Hook Ferry, gone
round the river.
9 *
A clearing now showed itself a little on our right; and
thither the Indian held his way. This clearing was not the
result of the labours of man, but was the fruit of one of those
forest accidents that sometimes let in the light of the sun
upon the mysteries of the woods. This clearing was on the
bald cap of a rocky mountain, where Indians had doubtless
often encamped; the vestiges of their fires proving that the
winds had been assisted by the sister element, in clearing
away the few stunted trees that had once grown in the
fissures of the rocks. As it was, there might have been an
open space of some two or three acres, that was now as
naked as if it had never known any vegetation more
ambitious
than the bush of the whortleberry or the honeysuckle.
Delicious water was spouting from a higher ridge of the
rocks, that led away northerly, forming the summit of an
extensive range in that direction. At this spring Susquesus
stooped to drink; then he announced that our day's work
was done.
Until this announcement, I do not believe that one of us
all had taken the time to look about him, so earnest and
rapid had been our march. Now, however, each man threw
aside his pack, laid down his rifle, and, thus disencumbered,
we turned to gaze on one of the most surprisingly beautiful
scenes eye of mine had ever beheld.
From what I have read and heard, I am now fully aware,
that the grandest of our American scenery falls far behind
that which is to be found among the lakes and precipices of
the Alps, and along the almost miraculous coast of the
Mediterranean
;
and I shall not pretend that the view I now
beheld approached many, in magnificence, that are to be
met with in those magic regions. Nevertheless, it was both
grand and soft; and it had one element of vastness, in the
green mantle of its interminable woods, that is not often to
be met with in countries that have long submitted to the
sway of man. Such as it was, I shall endeavour to
describe
it.
Beneath us, at the distance of near a thousand feet, lay a
lake of the most limpid and placid water, that was beautifully
diversified in shape, by means of bluffs, bays, and curvatures
of the shores, and which had an extent of near forty miles.
We were on its eastern margin, and about one-third of the
distance from its southern to its northern end. Countless
islands lay almost under our feet, rendering the mixture of
land and water, at that particular point, as various and
fanciful
as the human imagination could desire. To the north,
the placid sheet extended a great distance, bounded by rocky
precipices, passing by a narrow gorge into a winder and
larger estuary beyond. To the south, the water lay
expanded
to its oval termination, with here and there an
island to relieve the surface. In that direction only, were
any of the results of human industry to be traced.
Everywhere
else, the gorges, the receding valleys, the long ranges
of hills, and the bald caps of granite, presented nothing to
the eye but the unwearying charms of nature. Far as the
eye could reach, mountain behind mountain, the earth was
covered with its green mantle of luxuriant leaves; such as
vegetation bestows on a virgin soil beneath a beneficent sun.
The rolling and variegated carpet of the earth resembled a
firmament reversed, with clouds composed of foliage.
At the southern termination of the lake, however, there
was an opening in the forest of considerable extent; and
one that had been so thoroughly made as to leave few or no
trees. From this point we were distant several miles, and
that distance necessarily rendered objects indistinct; though
we had little difficulty in perceiving the ruins of extensive
fortifications. A thousand white specks, we now ascertained
to be tents, for the works were all that remained of Fort
William Henry, and there lay encamped the army of
Abercrombie
;
much the largest force that had then ever collected
in America, under the colours of England. History has
since informed us that this army contained the formidable
number of sixteen thousand men. Hundreds of boats, large
batteaux, that were capable of carrying forty or fifty men,
were moving about in front of the encampment, and, remote
as we were, it was not impossible to discover the signs of
preparation, and of an early movement. The Indian had
not deceived us thus far, at least, but had shown himself an
intelligent judge of what was going on, as well as a faithful
guide.
We were to pass the night on the mountain. Our beds
were none of the best, as the reader may suppose, and our
cover slight; yet I do not remember to have opened my
eyes from the moment they were closed, until I awoke in the
morning. The fatigue of a forced march did that for us
which down cannot obtain for the voluptuary, and we all
slept as profoundly as children. Consciousness returned to
me, by means of a gentle shake of the shoulder, which
proceeded
from Susquesus. On arising, I found the Indian
still near me, his countenance, for the first time since I had
known him, expressing something like an animated pleasure.
He had awoke none of the others, and he signed for me to
follow him, without arousing either of my companions.
Why I had been thus particularly selected for the scene that
succeeded, I cannot say, unless the Onondago's native
sagacity
had taught him to distinguish between the educations
and feelings of us three young men. So it was, however,
and I left the rude shelter we had prepared for the night,
alone.
A glorious sight awaited me! The sun had just tipped
the mountain-tops with gold, while the lake and the valleys,
the hill-sides even, and the entire world beneath, still reposed
in shadow. It appeared to me like the awakening of created
things from the sleep of nature. For a moment or more, I
could only gaze on the wonderful picture presented by the
strong contrast between the golden hill-tops and their
shadowed
sidesthe promises of day and the vestiges of night.
But the Onondago was too much engrossed with his own
feelings, to suffer me long to disregard what he conceived
to be the principal point of interest. Directed by his finger
and eye, for he spoke not, I turned my look towards the
distant shore of William Henry, and at once perceived the
cause of his unusual excitement. As soon as the Indian
was certain that I saw the objects that attracted himself so
strongly, he exclaimed with a strong, guttural, emphatic
cadence
Good!
Abercrombie's army was actually in motion! Sixteen
thousand men had embarked in boats, and were moving
towards the northern end of the lake, with imposing force,
and a most beautiful accuracy. The unruffled surface of
the lake was dotted with the flotilla, boats in hundreds
stretching across it in long, dark lines, moving on towards
their point of destination with the method and concert of an
army with its wings displayed. The last brigade of boats
had just left the shore when I first saw this striking
spectacle
,
and the whole picture lay spread before me at a single
glance. America had never before witnessed such a sight;
and it may be long before she will again witness such
another
.
For several minutes I stood entranced; nor did I
speak until the rays of the sun had penetrated the dusky
light that lay on the inferior world, as low as the bases of
the western mountains.
What are we to do, Susquesus? I then asked, feeling
how much right the Indian now might justly claim to govern
our movements.
Eat breakfast, first  the Onondago quietly replied;
then go down mountain.
Neither of which will place us in the midst of that
gallant
army, as it is our wish to be.
See, bye'm by. Injin knowno hurry, now. Hurry
come, when Frenchman shoot.
I did not like this speech, nor the manner in which it was
uttered; but there were too many things to think of, just
then, to be long occupied by vague conjectures touching the
Onondago's evasive allusions. Guert and Dirck were called,
and made to share in the pleasure that such a sight could
not fail to communicate. Then it was I got the first notion
of what I should call the truly martial character of Ten
Eyck. His fine, manly figure appeared to me to enlarge,
his countenance actually became illuminated, and the
expression
of his eye, usually so full of good-nature and fun,
seemed to change its character entirely, to one of sternness
and severity.
This is a noble sight, Mr. Littlepage, Guert remarked,
after gazing at the measured but quick movement of the
flotilla, for some time, in silencea truly noble sight, and
it is a reproach to us three for having lost so much time in
the woods, when we ought to have been
there
, ready to aid
in driving the French from the province.
We are not too late, my good friend, as the first blow
yet remains to be struck.
You say true, and I shall join that army, if I have to
swim to reach the boats. It will be no difficult thing for us
to swim from one of these islands to another, and the troops
must pass through the midst of them, in order to get into
the lower lake. Any reasonable man would stop to pick
us up.
No need, said the Onondago, in his quiet way. Eat
breakfast; then go. Got canoethat 'nough.
A canoe! By St. Nicholas! Mr. Susquesus, I'll tell
you what it isyou shall never want a friend as long as
Guert Ten Eyck is living, and able to assist you. That
idea of the canoe is a most thoughtful one, and shows that
a reasoning man has had the care of us. We can now
join the troops, with the rifles in our hand, as becomes
gentlemen
and volunteers.
By this time Jaap was up, and looking at the scene, with
all his eyes. It is scarcely necessary to describe the effect
on a negro. He laughed in fits, shook his head like the
Chinese figure of a mandarin, rolled over on the rocks,
arose, shook himself like a dog that quits the water, laughed
again, and finally shouted. As we were all accustomed to
these displays of negro sensibility, they only excited a smile
among us, and not even that from Dirck. As for the Indian,
he took no more notice of these natural, but undignified
signs of pleasure, in Jaap, than if the latter had been a dog,
or any other unintellectual animal. Perhaps no weakness
would be so likely to excite his contempt, as to be a
witness
of so complete an absence of self-command, as the
untutored
negro manifested on this occasion.
As soon as our first curiosity and interest were a little
abated, we applied ourselves to the necessary duty of
breaking
our fasts. The meal was soon despatched; and, to say
the truth, it was not of a quality to detain one long from
anything
of interest. The moment we had finished, the whole
party left the cap of the mountain, following our guide as
usual.
The Onondago had purposely brought us to that lookout,
a spot known to him, in order that we might get the view
of its panorama. It was impossible to descend to the
lake-shore
at that spot, however, and we were obliged to make a
dtour of three or four miles, in order to reach a ravine, by
means of which, and not without difficulty either, that
important
object was obtained. Here we found a bark canoe,
of a size sufficient to hold all five of us, and we embarked
without a moment's delay.
The wind had sprung up from the south, as the day
advanced
,
and the flotilla of boats was coming on, at a greatly
increased rate, as to speed. By the time we had threaded
our way through the islands, and reached the main channel,
if indeed any one passage could be so termed, among such a
variety, the leading boat of the army was within hail. The
Indian paddled, and, waving his hand in sign of amity, he
soon brought us alongside of the batteau. As we approached
it, however, I observed the fine, large form of the Viscount
Howe, standing erect in its bows, dressed in his Light
Infantry
Forest Uniform, as if eager to be literally the
foremost
man of a movement, in the success of which, the honour
of the British empire, itself, was felt to be concerned.
CHAPTER VIII.
My sons? It may
Unman my heart, and the poor boys will weep;
And what can I reply, to comfort them,
Save with some hollow hopes, and ill-worn smiles?
Sardanapalus
.
My Lord Howe
did not at first recognise us, in our
hunting-shirts
.
With Guert Ten Eyck, however, he had formed
such an acquaintance, while at Albany, as caused him to
remember his voice, and our welcome was both frank and
cordial. We inquired for the th, declaring our
intention
to join that corps, from the commander of which all
three of us had reiterated and pressing invitations to join his
mess. The intention of seeking our friend immediately,
nevertheless, was changed by a remark of our present host,
if one may use such a term as applied to the commander of
a brigade of boats.
Bulstrode's regiment is in the centre, and will be early
in the field, he said; but not as early as the advanced
guard. If you desire good living, gentlemen, I am far from
wishing to dissuade you from seeking the flesh-pots of the
th; there being a certain Mr. Billings, in that corps,
who has an extraordinary faculty, they tell me, in getting
up a good dinner out of nothing; but, if you want service,
we shall certainly be the first brigade in action; and, to such
fare as I can command, you will be most acceptable guests.
As for anything else, time must show.
After this, no more was said about looking for Bulstrode;
though we let our noble commander understand, that we
should tax his hospitality no longer than to see him fairly
in the field, after driving away the party that it was
expected
the enemy would send to oppose our landing.
Susquesus no sooner learned our decision, than he took
his departure, quietly paddling away towards the eastern
shore; no one attempting to intercept a canoe that was seen
to quit the batteau that was known to carry the commander
of the advanced brigade.
The wind freshened, as the day advanced, and most of
the boats having something or other in the shape of a sail,
our progress now became quite rapid. By nine o'clock we
were fairly in the Lower Lake, and there was every
prospect
of our reaching our point of destination by mid-day. I
confess, the business we were on, the novelty of my
situation
,
and the certainty that we should meet in Montcalm an
experienced as well as a most gallant foe, conspired to
render
me thoughtful, though I trust not timid, during the few
hours we were in the batteau. Perfectly inactive, it is not
surprising that so young a soldier should feel sobered by the
solemn reflections that are apt to get possession of the mind,
at the probable approach of deathif not to myself, at least
to many of those who were around me. Nor was there
anything boastful or inflated in the manner or conversation
of our distinguished leader, who had seen much warm
service
in Germany, in the wars of his reputed grandfather and
uncle, young as he was. On the contrary, My Lord Howe,
that day, was grave and thoughtful, as became a man who
held the lives of others in his keeping, though he was neither
depressed nor doubting. There were moments, indeed, when
he spoke cheerfully to those who were near him; though, as
a whole, his deportment was, as I have just said, grave and
thoughtful. Once I caught his eye fastened on me, with a
saddened expression; and, I suppose that a question he soon
after put me, was connected with the subject of his thoughts.
How would our excellent and respectable friend, Madam
Schuyler, feel, did she know our precise position at this
moment, Mr. Littlepage? I do believe that excellent
woman
feels more concern for those in whom she takes an
interest, than they often feel for themselves.
I think, my lord, that, in such a case, we should
certainly
receive the benefit of her prayers.
You are an only child, I think she told me,
Littlepage
?
I am, my lord; and thankful am I that my mother
cannot
foresee this scene.
I, too, have those that love me, though they are
accustomed
to think of me as a soldier, and liable to a soldier's
risks. Happy is the military man who can possess his mind,
in the moment of trial, free from the embarrassing, though
pleasing, and otherwise so grateful ties of affection. But,
we are nearing the shore, and must attend to duty.
This is the last conversation I held with that brave
soldier
;
and these were the last words, of a private nature, I
ever heard him utter. From that moment, his whole soul
seemed occupied with the discharge of his duty, the success
of our arms, and the defeat of the enemy.
I am not soldier enough to describe what followed in a
very military or intelligible manner. As the brigade drew
near the foot of the lake, where there was a wide extent of
low land, principally in forest, however, some batteaux were
brought to the front, on which were mounted a number of
pieces of heavy artillery. The French had a party of
considerable
force to oppose our landing; but, as it appeared,
they had not made a sufficient provision of guns, on their
part, to contend with success; and our grape scouring the
woods, we met with but little real resistance. Nor did we
assail them precisely at the point where we were expected,
but proceeded rather to the right of their position. At the
signal, the advanced brigade pushed for the shore, led by
our gallant commander, and we were all soon on
terr firm
,
Vol. II.  10
without sustaining any loss worth naming. We four, that
is, Guert, Dirck, myself and Jaap, kept as near as was
proper to the noble brigadier, who instantly ordered an
advance
,
to press the retreating foe. The skirmishing was
not sharp, however, and we gained ground fast, the enemy
retiring in the direction of Ticonderoga, and we pressing on
their rear, quite as fast as prudence and our preparations
would allow. I could see that a cloud of Indians was in
our front, and will own, that I felt afraid of an ambush; for
the artful warfare practised by those beings of the wood,
could not but be familiar, by tradition at least, to one born
and educated in the colonies. We had landed in a cove,
not literally at the foot of the lake, but rather on its western
side; and room was no sooner obtained, than Gen.
Abercrombie
got most of his force on shore, and formed it, as
speedily as possible, in columns. Of these columns we had
four, the two in the centre being composed entirely of King's
troops, six regiments in all, numbering more than as many
thousand men; while five thousand provincials were on the
flanks, leaving quite four thousand of the latter with the
boats, of which this vast flotilla actually contained the large
number of one thousand and twenty-five! All our boats,
however, had not yet reached the point of debarkation;
those with the stores, artillery, &c., &c., being still some
distance in the rear.
Our party was now placed with the right centre column,
at the head of which marched our noble acquaintance. The
enemy had posted a single battalion in a log encampment,
near the ordinary landing; but finding the character of the
force with which he was about to be assailed, its
commandant
set fire to his huts and retreated. The skirmishing was
now even of less moment than it had been on landing, and
we all moved forward in high spirits, though the want of
guides, the density of the woods, and the difficulties of the
ground, soon produced a certain degree of confusion in our
march. The columns got entangled with each other, and
no one seemed to possess the means of promptly extricating
them from this awkward embarrassment. Want of guides
was the great evil under which we laboured; but it was an
evil that it was now too late to remedy.
Our column, notwithstanding, or its head rather, continued
to advance, with its gallant leader keeping even pace with
its foremost platoon. We four volunteers acted as lookouts,
a little on its flank; and I trust there will be no boasting,
if I say, we kept rather in advance of the leading files, than
otherwise. In this state of things, French uniforms were
seen in front, and a pretty strong party of the enemy was
encountered, wandering, like ourselves, a little uncertain of
the route they ought to take, in order to reach their
entrenchments
in the shortest time. As a matter of course, this
party could not pass the head of our column, without
bringing
on a collision, though it were one that was only
momentary
.
Which party gave the first fire, I cannot say,
though I thought it was the French. The discharge was
not heavy, however, and was almost immediately mutual.
I know that all four of us let off our rifles, and that we
halted, under a cover, to reload. I had just driven the ball
down, when my eye caught the signs of some confusion in
the head of the column, and I saw the body of an officer
borne to the rear. It was that of Lord Howe! He had
fallen at the first serious discharge made by the enemy in
that campaign! The fall of its leader, so immediately in
its presence, seemed to rouse the column into a sense of
the necessity of doing something effective, and it assaulted
the party in its front with the rage of so many tigers,
dispersing
the enemy like chaff; making a considerable
number
of prisoners, besides killing and wounding not a few.
I never saw a man more thoroughly aroused than was
Guert Ten Eyck, in this little affair. He had been much
noticed by Lord Howe, during the residence of that
unfortunate
nobleman at Albany; and the loss of the last appeared
to awaken all that there was of the ferocious in the nature
of my usually kind-hearted Albany friend. He acted as our
immediate commander; and he led us forward on the heels
of the retreating French, until we actually came in sight of
their entrenchments. Then, indeed, we all saw it was
necessary
to retreat in our turn; and Guert consented to fall
back, though it was done surlily, and like a lion at bay. A
party of Indians pressed us hard, in this retreat, and we ran
an imminent risk of our scalps; all of which, I have ever
believed, would have been lost, were it not for the
resolution
and Herculean strength of Jaap. It happened, as we
were dodging from tree to tree, that all four of our rifles
were discharged at the same time; a circumstance of which
our assailants availed themselves to make a rush at us.
Luckily the weight of the onset fell on Jaap, who clubbed
his rifle, and literally knocked down in succession the three
Indians that first reached him. This intrepidity and success
gave us time to reload; and Dirck, ever a cool and capital
shot, laid the fourth Huron on his face, with a ball through
his heart. Guert then held his fire, and called on Jaap to
retreat. He was obeyed; and under cover of our two rifles,
the whole party got off; the red-skins being too thoroughly
rebuked to press us very closely, after the specimen they
had just received of the stuff of which we were made.
We owed our escape, however, as much to another
circumstance
,
as to this resolution of Jaap, and the expedient
of Guert. Among the provincials was a partisan of great
repute, of the name of Rogers. This officer led a party of
riflemen on our left flank, and he drove in the enemy's
skirmishers
,
along his own front, with rapidity, causing them to
suffer a considerable loss. By this means, the Indians
before us were held in check; as there was the danger that
Major Rogers's party might fall in upon their rear, should
they attempt to pursue us, and thus cut them off from their
allies. It was well it was so; inasmuch as we had to fall
back more than a mile, ere we reached the spot where
Abercrombie
brought his columns to a halt, and encamped for
the night. This position was distant about two miles from
the works before Ticonderoga; and consequently at no
great distance from the outlet of Lake George. Here the
army was brought into good order, and took up its station
for some little time.
It was necessary to await the arrival of the stores,
ammunition
and artillery. As the bringing up these materials,
through a country that was little else than a virgin forest,
was no easy task, it occupied us quite two days.
Melancholy
days they were, too; the death of Lord Howe acting
on the whole army much as if it had been a defeat. He
was the idol of the King's troops, and he had rendered
himself
as popular with us Americans, as with his own
countrymen
.
A sort of ominous sadness prevailed among us;
each common man appearing to feel his loss as he might
have felt that of a brother.
We looked up the th, and joined Bulstrode, as soon
as we reached the ground chosen for the new encampment.
Our reception was friendly, and even kind; and it became
warmer still, as soon as it was understood that we composed
the little party that had skirmished so freely on the flank
of the right centre column, and which was known to have
gone farther in advance than any one else, in that part of
the field. Thus we joined our corps with some
eclat
, at the
very outset, everybody welcoming us cordially, and with
seeming sincerity.
Nevertheless, the general sadness existed in the th,
as well as in all the other corps. Lord Howe was as much
beloved in that regiment, as in any other; and our meeting
and subsequent intercourse could not be called joyful.
Bulstrode
had an extensive and important command, for his
rank and years, and he certainly was proud of his position;
but I could see that even his elastic and usually gay
temperament
was much affected by what had occurred. That
night we walked together, apart from our companions, when
he spoke on the subject of our loss.
It may appear strange to you, Corny, he said, to find
so much depression in camp, after a debarkation that has
certainly been successful, and a little affair that has given
us, as they assure me, a couple of hundred prisoners. I tell
you, however, my friend, it were better for this army to
have seen its best corps annihilated, than to have lost the
man it has. Howe was literally the soul of this entire force.
He was a soldier by nature, and made all around him
soldiers
.
As for the Commander-In-Chief, he does not
understand
you Americans, and will not use you as he ought;
then he does not understand the nature of the warfare of this
continent, and will be very likely to make a blunder. I 'll
tell you how it is, Corny; Howe had as much influence
with Abercrombie, as he had with every one else; and an
attempt will be made to introduce his mode of fighting; but
such a man as Lord Howe requires another Lord Howe to
carry out his own conceptions. That is the point on which,
I fear, we shall fail.
All this sounded very sensible to me, though it sounded
10 *
discouragingly; I found, however, that Bulstrode did not
entertain these feelings alone, but that most around me were
of the same way of thinking. In the mean time, the
preparations
proceeded; and it was understood that the 8th was
to be the day that was to decide the fate of Ticonderoga.
The fort proper, at this celebrated station, stands on a
peninsula
,
and can only be assailed on one side. The outworks
were very extensive on that side, and the garrison was
known to be formidable. As these outworks, however,
consisted
principally of a log breastwork, and it could be
approached
through open woods, which of itself afforded some
cover, it was determined to carry it by storm, and, if
possible
,
enter the main work with the retreating enemy. Had
we waited for our artillery, and established batteries, our
success would have been certain; but the engineer reported
favourably of the other project; and perhaps it better suited
the temper and impatience of the whole army, to push on,
rather than proceed by the slow movements of a regular
siege.
On the morning of the 8th, therefore, the troops were
paraded for the assault, our party falling in on the flank of
the th, as volunteers. The ground did not admit of the
use of many horses, and Bulstrode marched with us on foot.
I can relate but little of the general movements of that
memorable
day, the woods concealing so much of what was
done, on both sides. I know this, however; that the flower
of our army were brought into the line, and were foremost
in the assault; including both regulars and provincials.
The 42d, a Highland corps, that had awakened much
interest
in America, both by the appearance and character of
its men, was placed at a point where it was thought the
heaviest service was to be performed. The 55th, another
corps on which much reliance was placed, was also put at
the head of another column. A swamp extending for some
distance along the only exposed front of the peninsula, these
two corps were designated to carry the log breastwork, that
commenced at the point where the swamp ceases; much the
most arduous portion of the expected service, since this was
the only accessible approach to the fortress itself. To
render their position more secure, the French had placed
several pieces of artillery in battery, along the line of this
breastwork; while we had not yet a gun in front to cover
our advance.
It was said, that Abercrombie did not take counsel of any
of the American officers with him, before he decided on the
attack of the 8th of July. He had directed his principal
engineer to reconnoitre; and that gentleman having reported
that the defences offered no serious scientific obstacles, the
assault was decided on. This report was accurate,
doubtless
,
agreeably to the principles and facts of European
warfare
;
but it was not suited to those of the conflicts of this
continent. It was to be regretted, however, that the
experience
of 1755, and the fate of Braddock, had not inculcated
a more extensive lesson of discretion among the royal
commanders
,
than was manifested by the incidents of this day.
The th was placed in column directly in the rear of
the Highlanders, who were led, on this occasion, by Col.
Gordon Graham; a veteran officer of great experience, and
of an undaunted courage.
[11]
[11]
Holmes's Annals say, that Lord John Murray commanded the
42d, on this occasion. I presume, as Mr. Littlepage was there, and
was posted so near the corps in question, he cannot well be mistaken.
Mrs. Grant, of Laggan, who was at Albany at the time, and whose
father was in the battle, agrees with Mr. Littlepage, in saying that
Gordon Graham led the 42d.
Editor
.
Of course, I saw this officer
and this regiment, being as they were directly in my front,
but I saw little else; more especially after the smoke of the
first discharge was added to the other obstacles to vision.
A considerable time was consumed in making the
preparations
;
but, when everything was supposed to be ready,
the columns were set in motion. It was generally
understood
that the troops were to receive the enemy's fire, then
rush forward to the breastwork, cross the latter at the
bayonet's
point, if it should be necessary, and deliver their own
fire at close quarters; or on their retreating foes.
Permission
was given to us volunteers, and to divers light parties
of irregulars, to open on any of the French of whom we
might get glimpses, as little was expected from us in the
charge.
Nearly an hour was consumed in approaching the point
of attack, owing to the difficulties of the ground, and the
necessity of making frequent halts, in order to dress. At
length the important moment arrived when the head of the
column was ready to unmask itself, and consequently to
come under fire. A short halt sufficed for the arrangements
here, when the bagpipes commenced their exciting music,
and we broke out of cover, shouting and cheering each
other on. We must have been within two hundred yards
of the breastwork at the time, and the first gun discharged
was Jaap's, who, by working his way into the cover of the
swamp, had got some distance ahead of us, and who
actually
shot down a French officer who had got upon the logs
of his defences, in order to reconnoitre. That assault,
however
,
was fearfully avenged! The Highlanders were
moving
on like a whirlwind, grave, silent and steady, cheered
only by their music, when a sheet of flame glanced along
the enemy's line, and the iron and leaden messengers of
dealth came whistling in among us like a hurricane. The
Scotsmen were staggered by that shock; but they recovered
instantly and pressed forward. The th did not escape
harmless, by any means; while the din told us that the
conflict
extended along the whole of the breastwork, towards
the lake-shore. How many were shot down in our column,
by that first discharge, I never knew; but the slaughter was
dreadful, and among those who fell was the veteran Graham,
himself. I can safely say, however, that the plan of attack
was completely deranged from this first onset; the columns
displaying and commencing their fire as soon as possible.
No men could have behaved better than all that I could
see; the whole of us pushing on for the breastwork, until
we encountered fallen trees; which were made to serve the
purpose of chevaux-de-frise. These trees had been felled
along the front of the breastwork, while their branches were
cut, and pointed like stakes. It was impossible to pass in
any order, and the troops halted when they reached them,
and continued to fire by platoons, with as much regularity
as on parade. A few minutes of this work, however,
compelled
different corps to fall back, and the vain conflict was
continued for four hours, on our part almost entirely by a
smart but ineffective fire of musketry; while the French sent
their grape into our ranks almost with as much impunity as
if they had been on parade. It had been far better for our
men had they been less disciplined, and less under the
control
of their officers; for the sole effect of steadiness, under
such circumstances, is to leave the gallant and devoted
troops, who refuse to fall back, while they are unable to
advance, only so much the longer in jeopardy.
Guert had shouted with the rest; and I soon found that,
by following him for a leader, we should quickly be in the
midst of the fray. He actually led us up to the fallen trees;
and, finding something like a cover there, we three
established
ourselves among them as riflemen, doing fully our
share of service. When the troops fell back, however, we
were left in a manner alone, and it was rather dangerous
work to retire; and finding ourselves out of the line of fire
from our own men, no immaterial point in such a fray, we
maintained our post to the last. Admonished, after a long
time, of the necessity of retreating, by the manner in which
the fire of our own line lessened, we got off with sound
skins, though Guert retired the whole distance with his
face to the enemy, firing as he withdrew. We all did the
last, indeed, using the trees for covers. Towards the close
we attracted especial attention; and there were two or three
minutes during which the flight of bullets around us might
truly, without much exaggeration, be likened to a storm of
hail!
Jaap was not with us in this sally, and I went into the
swamp to look for him. The search was not long, for I
found my fellow retreating also, and bringing in with him a
stout Canadian Indian as a prisoner. He was making his
captive carry three discharged rifles, and blankets; one of
which had been his own property once, and the others that
of two of his tribe, whom the negro had left lying in the
swamp as bloody trophies of his exploits. I cannot explain
the philosophy of the thing, but that negro ever appeared to
me to fight as if he enjoyed the occupation as an
amusement
.
These facts were scarcely ascertained, when we learned
the important intelligence that a general retreat was ordered.
Our proud and powerful army was beaten, and that, too, by
a force two-thirds less than its own! It is not easy to
describe
the miserable scene that followed. The transporting
of the wounded to the rear had been going on the whole time;
and, as usually happens, when it is permitted, it had
contributed
largely to thin the ranks. These unfortunate men
were put into the batteaux in hundreds, while most of the
dead were left where they lay. So completely were our
hopes frustrated, and our spirits lowered, that most of the
boats pulled off that night, and all the remainder quitted the
foot of the lake early next day.
Thus terminated the dire expedition of 1758 against
Ticonderoga
,
and with it our expectations of seeing Montreal,
or Quebec, that season. I dare say, we had fully ten
thousand
bayonets in the field that bloody day, and quite five
thousand men closely engaged. The mistake was in
attempting
to carry a post that was so nearly impregnable, by
assault
;
and this, too, without the cover of artillery. The
enemy was said to have four or five thousand men present;
and this may be true, as applied to all within the defences;
though I question if more than half that number pulled
triggers on us, in the miserable affair. There is always
much of exaggeration in both the boasting and the apologies
of war.
Our own loss, on this sad occasion, was reported at 548
slain, and 1356 wounded. This was probably within the
truth; though the missing were said to be surprisingly few,
some thirty or forty, in all; the men having no place to
repair to but the boats. Of the Highlanders, it was said
that nearly half the common men, and twenty-five, or nearly
all
the officers, were either killed or wounded! One
account
,
indeed, said that
every
officer of that corps, who was
on the ground, suffered. The 55th, also, was dreadfully
cut up. Ten of its officers were slain outright, and many
were wounded. As for the th, it fared a little better,
not heading a column; but its loss was fearful. Bulstrode
was seriously wounded, early in the attack, though his hurt
was never supposed to be dangerous. Billings was left dead
on the field, and Harris got a scratch that served him to
talk of in after life.
The confusion was tremendous after such a conflict and
such a defeat. The troops re-embarked without much
regard
to corps or regularity of movement; and the boats
moved away as fast as they received their melancholy
cargoes
.
An immense amount of property was lost; though
I believe all the customary military trophies were preserved.
As the provincials had been the least engaged, and had
suffered
much the least, in proportion to numbers, a large body
of them was kept as a rear-guard, while the regular corps
removed their wounded and
matriel
.
As for us three or four, including Jaap, who stuck by his
prisoner, we scarcely knew what to do with ourselves.
Everybody who felt any interest in us, was either killed or
wounded. Bulstrode we could not see; nor could we even
find the regiment. Should we succeed in the attempt at the
last, very few now remained in it who would have taken
much, or indeed any concern in us. Under the
circumstances
,
therefore, we held a consultation on the lake-shore,
uncertain whether to ask admission into one of the
departing
boats, or to remain until morning, that our retreat might
have a more manly aspect.
I 'll tell you what it is, Corny, said Guert Ten Eyck,
in a somewhat positive manner, the less
we
say about this
campaign, and of our share in it, the petter. We are not
soldiers, in the regular way, and if we keep quiet, nobody
will know what a t'rashing we t'ree, in particular, haf
receivet. My advice is, t'at we get out of this army as we
got into itt'at is, py a one-sided movement, and for ever
after holt our tongues about our having had anyt'ing to do
with it. I never knew a worsted man any the more
respected
for his mishap; and I will own, that I set down
flogging as a very material part of a fight.
I am quite sure, Guert, I am as little disposed to brag
of my share in this affair, as you or any one can possibly
be; but it is much easier to talk about getting away from
this confused crowd than really to do the thing. I doubt if
any of these boats will take us in; for an Englishman,
flogged, is not apt to be very good-natured; and all our
friends seem to be killed or wounded.
You want go? asked a low Indian voice at my elbow.
Got 'nough, eh?
Turning, I saw Susquesus standing within two feet of me.
Our consultation was necessarily in the midst of a moving
throng; and the Onondago must have approached us,
unnoticed
,
at the commencement of our conference. There he
was, however, though whence he came or how he got there,
I could not imagine, at the time, and have never been able
to learn since.
Can you help us to get away, Susquesus? was my
answer. Do you know of any means of crossing the
lake?
Got canoe. That good. Canoe go, though Yengeese
run.
That in which we came off to the army, do you mean?
The Indian nodded his head, and made a sign for us to
follow. Little persuasion was necessary, and we proceeded
at his heels, in a body, in the direction he led. I will
confess
,
that when I saw our guide proceeding eastward, along
the lake-shore, I had some misgivings on the subject of his
good faith. That was the direction which took us towards,
instead of
from
the enemy; and there was something so
mysterious in the conduct of this man, that it gave me
uneasiness
.
Here he was, in the midst of the English army
in the height of its confusion, though he had declined joining
it previously to the battle. Nothing was easier than to enter
the throng, in its present confused state, and move about
undetected for hours, if one had the nerve necessary for the
service; and, in that property, I felt certain the Onondago
was not deficient. There was a coolness in the manner of
the man, a quiet observation, both blended with the seeming
apathy of a red-skin, that gave every assurance of his fitness
for the duty.
Nevertheless, there was no remedy but to follow, or to
break with our guide on the spot. We did not like to do
the last, although we conferred together on the subject, but
followed, keeping our hands on the locks of our rifles, in
readiness for a brush, should we be led into danger.
Susquesus
had no such treacherous intentions, however, while
he had disposed of his canoe in a place that denoted his
judgment. We had to walk quite a mile ere we reached
the little bush-fringed creek in which he had concealed it.
I have always thought we ran a grave risk, in advancing so
far in that direction, since the enemy's Indians would
certainly
be hanging around the skirts of our army, in quest
of scalps; but I afterwards learned the secret of the
Onondago's
confidence, who first spoke on the subject after we
had left the shore, and then only in an answer to a remark
of Guert's.
No danger, he said; red-man gettin' Yengeese scalps,
on the war-path. Too much kill, now, to want more.
As both governments pursued the culpable policy of
paying
for human scalps, this suggestion probably contained
the whole truth.
Previously to quitting the creek, however, there was a
difficulty to dispose of. Jaap had brought his Huron
prisoner
with him; and the Onondago declared that the canoe
could not carry six. This we knew from experience,
indeed
,
though five went in it very comfortably.
No room, said Susquesus, for red-man. Five good
six bad.
What shall we do with the fellow, Corny? asked
Guert, with a little interest. Jaap says he is a proper
devil, by daylight, and that he had a world of trouble in
taking him, and in bringing him in. For five minutes, it
was heads or tails which was to give in; and the nigger
only got the best of it, by his own account of the battle,
because
the red-skin had the unaccountable folly to try to
beat in Jaap's brains. He might as well have battered the
Rock of Gibraltar, you know, as to attempt to break a
nigger's
skull, and so your fellow got the best of it. What
shall we do with the rascal?
Take scalp, said the Onondago, sententiously; got
good scalp  war-lock ready  paint, war-paint  capital
scalp.
Ay, that may do better for you, Master Succetush
so Guert always called our guide, than it will do for us
Christians. I 'm afraid we shall have to let the ravenous
devil go, after disarming him.
Disarmed he is already; but he cannot be long without
a musket, on this battle-ground. I am of your opinion,
Guert; so, Jaap, release your prisoner at once, that we may
return to Ravensnest, as fast as possible.
Dat berry hard, Masser Corny, sah! exclaimed Jaap,
who did not half like the orders he received.
No words about it, sir, but cut his fastenings  Jaap
Vol. II.  11
had tied the Indian's arms behind him, with a rope, as an
easy mode of leading him along. Do you know the man's
name?
Yes, sahhe say he name be Mussprobably Jaap's
defective manner of repeating some Indian sound; and a
proper muss he get in, Masser Corny, when he try to cotch
Jaap by he wool!
Here I was obliged to clap my hand suddenly on the
black's mouth, for the fellow was so delighted with the
recollection
of the manner in which he had got the better of
his red adversary, that he broke out into one of the
uncontrollable
fits of noisy laughter, that are so common to his
race. I repeated the order, somewhat sternly, for Jaap to
cut the cords, and then to follow us to the canoe, in which
the Onondago and my two friends had already taken their
places. My own foot was raised to enter the canoe, when
I heard heavy stripes inflicted on the back of some one.
Rushing back to the spot where I had left Jaap and his
captive
,
Muss, I found the former inflicting a severe
punishment
,
on the naked back of the other, with the end of the
cord that still bound his arms. Muss, as Jaap called him,
neither flinched nor cried. The pine stands not more erect
or unyielding, in a summer's noontide, than he bore up
under the pain. Indignantly I thrust the negro away, cut
the fellow's bonds with my own hands, and drove my slave
before me to the canoe.
CHAPTER IX.
Pale set the sunthe shades of evening fell,
The mournful night-wind sung their funeral knell;
And the same day beheld their warriors dead,
Their sovereign captive and their glory fled!
Mrs. Hemans
.
I shall
never forget the journey of that fearful night.
Susquesus paddled the canoe, unaided by us, who were too
much fatigued with the toil of the day, to labour much, as
soon as we found ourselves in a place of safety. Even Jaap
lay down and slept for several hours, the sleep of the weary.
I do not think any of us, however, actually slept for the
first hour or two, the scenes through which we had just
passed, and that, indeed, through which we were then
passing
,
acting as preventives to such an indulgence.
It must have been about nine in the evening, when our
canoe quitted the ill-fated shore at the south end of Lake
George, moving steadily and silently along the eastern
margin
of the sheet. By that time, fully five hundred boats had
departed for the head of the lake, the retreat having
commenced
long before sunset. No order was observed in this
melancholy procession, each batteau moving off as her load
was completed. All the wounded were on the placid bosom
of the `Holy Lake,' as some writers have termed this sheet
of limpid water, by the time we ourselves got in motion;
and the sounds of parting boats told us that the unhurt were
following as fast as circumstances would allow.
What a night it was! There was no moon, and a veil
of dark vapour was drawn across the vault of the heavens,
concealing most of the mild summer stars, that ought to
have been seen twinkling in their Creator's praise. Down,
between the boundaries of hills, there was not a breath of
air, though we occasionally heard the sighings of light
currents
among the tree-tops, above us. The eastern shore
having fewer sinuosities than the western, most of the boats
followed its dark, frowning mass, as the nearest route, and
we soon found ourselves near the line of the retiring batteaux.
I call it the line, for though there was no order observed,
each party making the best of its way to the common point
of destination, there were so many boats in motion at the
same time, that, far as the eye could penetrate by that
gloomy light, an unbroken succession of them was visible.
Our motion was faster than that of these heavily-laden and
feebly-rowed batteaux, the soldiers being too much fatigued
to toil at the oars, after the day they had just gone through.
We consequently passed nearly everything, and soon got on
a parallel course with that of the boats, moving along at a
few rods in-shore of them. Dirck remarked, however, that
two or three small craft even passed us. They went so
near the mountain, quite within its shadows, in fact, as to
render it difficult to say what they were; though it was
supposed they might be whale-boats, of which there were
more than a hundred in the flotilla, carrying officers of
rank.
No one spoke. It appeared to me that not a human
voice was raised among those humiliated and defeated
thousands
.
The plash of oars, so long as we were at a distance
from the line, alone broke the silence of night; but that was
incessant. As our canoe drew ahead, however, an hour or
two after we had left the shore, and we overtook the boats
that had first started, the moaning and groans of the wounded
became blended with the monotonous sounds of the oars. In
two respects, these unfortunate men had reason to felicitate
themselves, notwithstanding their sufferings. No army
could have transported its wounded with less pain to the
hurt; and the feverish thirst that loss of blood always
induces
,
might be assuaged by the limpid element on which
we all floated.
After paddling for hours, Susquesus was relieved by Jaap,
Dirck, Guert and myself occasionally lending our aid.
Each had a paddle, and each used it as he saw fit, while the
Onondago slept. Occasionally I caught a nap, myself, as
did my companions; and we all felt refreshed by the rest
and sleep. At length we reached the narrow pass, that
separated the Upper from the Lower Lake, and we entered
the former. This is near the place where the islands are
so numerous, and we were unavoidably made to pass quite
close to some of the batteaux. I say to some, for the line
became broken at this point, each boat going through the
openings it found the most convenient.
Come nearer with that bark canoe, called out an
officer
,
from a batteau; I wish to learn who is in it.
We are volunteers, that joined the th, the day the
army moved up, and were guests of Major Bulstrode. Pray
sir, can you tell us where that officer can be found?
Poor Bulstrode! He got a very awkward hit, early in
the day, and was taken past me to the rear. He will be
able neither to walk nor to ride, for some months, if they
save his leg. I heard the Commander-In-Chief order him
to be sent across the lake, in the first boat with wounded;
and some one told me, Bulstrode, himself, expressed an
intention
to be carried some distance, to a friend's house, to
escape from the abominations of an army hospital. The
fellow has horses enough to transport him, on a horse-litter,
to Cape Horn, if he wishes it. I 'll warrant you, Bulstrode
works his way into good quarters, if they are to be had in
America. I suppose this arm of mine will have to come off,
as soon as we reach Fort William Henry; and, that job
done, I confess I should like amazingly to keep him
company
.
Proceed, gentlemen; I hope I have not detained
you; but, observing a bark canoe, I thought it my duty to
ascertain we were not followed by spies.
This, then, was another victim of war! He spoke of the
loss of his arm, notwithstanding, with as much coolness as
if it were the loss of a tooth; yet, I question not, that in
secret, he mourned over the calamity in bitterness of heart.
Men never wear the mask more completely than when
excited and stimulated by the rivalry of arms. Bulstrode,
too, at Ravensnest! He could be carried nowhere else, so
easily; and, should his wound be of a nature that did not
require constant medical treatment, where could he be so
happily bestowed as under the roof of Herman Mordaunt?
Shall I confess that the idea gave me great pain, and that
I was fool enough to wish I, too, could return to Anneke,
and appeal to her sympathies, by dragging with me a
wounded limb!
Our canoe now passed quite near another batteau, the
officer in command of which was standing erect, seemingly
watching our movements. He appeared to be unhurt, but
11 *
was probably intrusted with some special duty. As we
paddled by, the following curious conversation occurred.
You move rapidly to the rear, my friends, observed
the stranger; pray moderate your zeal; others are in
advance of you with the evil tidings!
You must think ill of our patriotism and loyalty, sir, to
imagine we are hastening on with the intelligence of a check
to the British arms, I answered as drily, and almost as
equivocally, in manner, as the other had spoken.
The check!I beg a thousand pardonsI see you
are
patriots, and of the purest water! Check is just the word;
though check-
mate
would be more descriptive and
significant
!
A charming time we've had of it, gentlemen! What
say you?it is your move, now.
There has been much firmness and gallantry manifested
by the troops, I answered, as we, who have been merely
volunteers, will always be ready to testify.
I beg your pardons, again and again, returned the
officer, raising his hat and bowing profoundlyI did not
know I had the honour to address volunteers. You are
entitled to superlative respect, gentlemen, having come
voluntarily
into such a field. For my part, I find the honour
oppressive, having no such supererogatory virtue to boast
of. Volunteers! On my word, gentlemen, you will have
many wonders to relate, when you get back into the family
circle.
We shall have to speak of the gallantry of the
Highlanders
,
for we saw all they did and all they suffered.
Ah! Were you, then, near that brave corps!
exclaimed
the other, with something like honest, natural
feeling
,
for the first time exhibited in his voice and meaning;
I honour men who were only
spectator
s of so much
courage
,
especially if they took a tolerably
near
view of it.
May I venture to ask your names, gentlemen.
I answered, giving him our names, and mentioning the
fact that we had been the guest of Bulstrode, and how much
we were disappointed in having missed not only our friend,
but his corps.
Gentlemen, I honour courage, let it come whence it
may, said the stranger, with strong feeling, and no acting,
and most admire it when I see it exhibited by natives of
these colonies, in a quarrel of their own. I have heard of
you as being with poor Howe, when he fell, and hope to
know more of you. As for Mr. Bulstrode, he has passed
southward, now some hours, and intends to make his cure
among some connections that he has in this province. Do
not let this be the last of our intercourse, I beg of you; but
look up Capt. Charles Lee, of the th, who will be glad
to take each and all of you by the hand, when we once more
get into camp.
We expressed our thanks, but Susquesus causing the
canoe to make a sudden inclination towards the shore, the
conversation was suddenly interrupted.
By this time the Indian was awake, and exercising his
authority in the canoe, again. Gliding among the islands,
he shortly landed us at the precise point where we had
embarked
only five days before. Securing his little bark, the
Onondago led the way up the ravine, and brought us out on
the naked cap of the mountain, where we had before slept,
after an hour of extreme effort.
If the night had been so memorable, the picture presented
at the dawn of day, was not less so! We reached that lofty
look-out about the same time in the morning as the Indian
had awakened me on the previous occasion, and had the same
natural outlines to the view. In one sense, also, the
artificial
accessaries were the same, though exhibited under a
very different aspect. I presume the truth will not be much,
if any exceeded, when I say that a thousand boats were in
sight, on this, as on the former occasion! A few, a dozen
or so, at most, appeared to have reached the head of the
lake; but all the rest of that vast flotilla was scattered along
the placid surface of the lovely sheet, forming a long,
straggling
line of dark spots, that extended to the beach under
Fort William Henry, in one direction, and far as eye could
reach in the other. How different did that melancholy,
broken procession of boats appear, from the gallant array,
the martial bands, the cheerful troops, and the multitude of
ardent young men who had pressed forward, in brigades,
less than a week before, filled with hope, and exulting in
their strength! As I gazed on the picture, I could not but
fancy to myself the vast amount of physical pain, the keen
mental suffering, and the deep mortification that might have
been found, amid that horde of returning adventurers. We
had just come up from the level of this scene of human
agony, and our imaginations could portray details that were
beyond the reach of the senses, at the elevation on which we
stood.
A week before, and the name of Abercrombie filled every
mouth in America; expectation had almost placed his
renown
on that giddy height, where performance itself is so
often insecure. In the brief interval, he was destroyed.
Those who had been ready to bless him, would now heap
curses on his devoted head, and none would be so bold as
to urge aught in his favour. Men in masses, when goaded
by disappointment, are never just. It is, indeed, a hard
lesson for the individual to acquire; but, released from his
close, personal responsibility, the single man follows the
crowd, and soothes his own mortification and wounded pride
by joining in the cry that is to immolate a victim. Yet
Abercrombie was not the foolhardy and besotted bully that
Braddock had proved himself to be. His misfortune was to
be ignorant of the warfare of the region in which he was
required to serve, and possibly to over-estimate the
imaginary
invincible character of the veterans he led. In a very
short time he was recalled, and America heard no more of
him. As some relief to the disgrace that had anew alighted
on the British arms, Bradstreet, a soldier who knew the
country, and who placed much reliance on the young man
of her name and family whom I had met at Madam
Schuyler's
,
marched against Frontenac, in Canada, at the head of
a strong body of provincials; an enterprise that, as it was
conducted with skill, resulted in a triumph.
But with all this my narrative has no proper connection.
No sooner did we reach the bald mountain-top, than the
Onondago directed Jaap to light a fire, while he produced,
from a deposit left on the advance, certain of the materials
that were necessary to a meal. As neither of us had tasted
food since the morning of the previous day, this repast was
welcome, and we all partook of it like so many famished
men. The negro got his share, of course, and then we
called a council as to future proceedings.
The question is, whether we ought to make a straight
path to Ravensnest, observed Guert, or proceed first to
the surveyor's, and see how things are going on in that
direction
.
As there can be no great danger of a pursuit on the part
of the French, since all their boats are in the other lake, I
remarked, the state of the country is very much what it
was before the army moved.
Ask that question of the Indian, put in Dirck, a little
significantly.
We looked at Susquesus inquiringly, for a look always
sufficed to let him comprehend us, when a tolerably plain
allusion had been previously made.
Black-man do foolish t'ing, observed the Onondago.
What I do, you red-skin devil? demanded Jaap, who
felt a sort of natural antipathy to all Indians, good or bad,
excellent or indifferent; a feeling that the Indians repaid to
his race by contempt indifferently concealed. What I do,
red-devil, ha?dat you dares tell Masser Corny
dat!
Susquesus manifested no resentment at this strong and
somewhat rude appeal; but sat as motionless as if he had
not heard it. This vexed Jaap so much the more; and, my
fellow being exceedingly pugnacious on all occasions that
touched his pride, there might have been immediate war
between the two, had I not raised a finger, at once
effectually
stilling the outbreak of Jacob Satanstoe's wrath.
You should not bring such a charge against my slave,
Onondago, I said, unless able to prove it.
He beat red warrior like dog.
What of dat! growled Jaap, who was only half-quieted
by my sign. Who ebber hear it hurt red-skin to rope-end
him?
Warrior back like squaw's. Blow hurt him. He never
forget.
Well, let him remember den, grinned the negro,
showing
his ivory teeth from ear to ear. Muss was
my
prisoner
;
and what
good
he do me, if he let go widout
punishment
.
I wish you tell Masser Corny
dat
, instead of tellin'
him nonsense. When he flog me, who ebber hear me
grumble?
You have not had half enough of it, Jaap, or your
manners would be better, I thought it necessary to put in,
for the fellow had never before manifested so quarrelsome a
disposition in my presence; most probably because I had
never before seen him at variance with an Indian. Let
me hear no more of this, or I shall be obliged to pay off the
arrears on the spot.
A little hiding does a nigger good, sometimes, observed
Guert, significantly.
I observed that Dirck, who loved my very slave
principally
because he was mine, looked at the offender
reprovingly
;
and by these combined demonstrations, we succeeded
in curbing the fellow's tongue.
Well, Susquesus, I added, we all listen, to hear what
you mean.
Musquerusque chief  Huron chief  got very tender
back; never forget rope.
You mean us to understand that my black's prisoner
will be apt to make some attempt to revenge himself for the
flogging he got from his captor?
Just so. Indian good memoryno forget friendno
forget enemy.
But your Huron will be puzzled to find us, Onondago.
He will suppose us with the army; and, should he even
venture to look for us there, you see he will be
disappointed
.
Never know. Wook full of paths  Injin full of
cunning
.
Why talk of Ravensnest?
Was the name of Ravensnest mentioned in the presence
of that Huron? I asked, more uneasy than such a trifle
would probably have justified me in confessing.
Ay, something was said about it, but not in a way the
fellow could understand, answered Guert, carelessly. Let
him come on, if he has not had enough of us yet.
This was not my manner of viewing the matter, however;
for the mentioning of Ravensnest brought Anneke to my
mind, surrounded by the horrors of an Indian's revenge.
I will send you back to the Huron, Susquesus, I added,
if you can name to me the price that will purchase his
forgiveness
.
The Onondago looked at me meaningly a moment; then,
bending forward, he passed the fore-finger of his hand
around the head of Jaap, along the line that is commonly
made by the knife of the warrior, as he cuts away the trophy
of success from his victim. Jaap comprehended the
meaning
of this very significant gesture, as well as any of us,
and the manner in which he clutched the wool, as if to keep
the scalp in its place, set us all laughing. The negro did
not partake of our mirth; but I saw that he regarded the
Indian, much as the bull-dog shows his teeth, before he
makes his spring. Another motion of my finger, however,
quelled the rising. It was necessary to put an end to this,
and Jaap was ordered to prepare our packs, in readiness for
the expected march. Relieved from his presence,
Susquesus
was asked to be more explicit.
You know Injin, the Onondago answered. Now he
t'ink red-coats driv' away and skeared, he go look for scalp.
Love all sort scalpold scalp, young scalpman scalp,
woman scalp  boy scalp, gal scalp  all get pay, all get
honour. No difference to him.
Ay! exclaimed Guert, with a strong aspiration, such
as escapes a man who feels strongly; he is a devil
incarnate
,
when he once gets fairly on the scent of blood! So
you expect these French Injins will make an excursion in
among the settlers, out here to the south-east of us?
Go to nearestdon't care where he be. Nearest your
friend; won't like that, s'pose?
You are right enough, Onondago, in saying that. I
shall not like it, nor will my companions, here, like it; and
the first thing you will have to do, will be to guide us,
straight as the bird flies, to the Ravensnest; the picketed
house, you know, where we have left our sweethearts.
Susquesus understood all that was said, without any
difficulty
;
in proof of which, he smiled at this allusion to the
precious character of the inmates of the house Guert told
him to seek.
Squaw pretty 'nough, he answered, complacently.
No wonder young man like him. But, can't go there,
now. First find friends measure land. All Injin land,
once!
This last remark was made in a way I did not like; for
the idea seemed to cross the Onondago's brain so suddenly,
as to draw from him this brief assertion in pure bitterness
of spirit.
I should be very sorry if it had not been, Susquesus,
I observed, myself, since the title is all the better for its
having been so, as our Indian deed will show. You know,
of course, that my father, and his friend, Col. Follock,
bought this land of the Mohawks, and paid them their own
price for it.
Red-man nebber measure land so. He p'int with finger,
break bush down, and say, `there, take from that water to
that water.'
All very true, my friend; but, as that sort of
measurement
will not answer to keep farms separate, we are obliged
to survey the whole off into lots of smaller size. The
Mohawks
first gave my father and his friend, as much land as
they could walk round in two suns, allowing them the night
to rest in.
That
good deed! exclaimed the Indian, with strong
emphasis. Leg can't cheatpen great rogue.
Well, we have the benefit of both grants; for the
proprietors
actually walked round the estate, a party of Indians
accompanying them, to see that all was fair. After that,
the chiefs signed a deed in writing, that there might be no
mistake, and then we got the King's grant.
Who give King land, at all?All land here red-man
land; who give him to king?
Who made the Delawares women?The warriors of
the Six nations, was it not, Susquesus?
Yesmy people help. Six Nation great warrior, and
put petticoat on Delawares, so they can't go on war-path
any more. What that to do with King's land?
Why, the King's warriors, you know, my friend, have
taken possession of this country, just as the Six Nations
took possession of the Delawares, before they made them
women.
What become of King's warrior, now? demanded the
Indian, quick as lightning. Where he run away to?
Where land Ticonderoga, now? Whose land t'other end
lake, now?
Why, the King's troops have certainly met with a
disaster
;
and, for the present, their rights are weakened, it
must be admitted. But, another day may see all this
changed, and the King will get his land again. You will
remember, he has not sold Ticonderoga to the French, as
the Mohawks sold Mooseridge to us; and that, you must
admit, makes a great difference. A bargain is a bargain,
Onondago.
Yes, bargain, bargainthat good. Good for red-man,
good for pale-faceno differencewhat Mohawk sell, he
no take back, but let pale-face keepbut how come
Mohawk
and King sell, too? Bot' own land, eh?
This was rather a puzzling question to answer to an
Indian
.
We white people can very well understand that a
human government, which professes, on the principles
recognised
by civilized nations, to have jurisdiction over
certain
extensive territories that lie in the virgin forest, and
which are used only, and that occasionally, by certain
savage
tribes as hunting-grounds, should deem it right to
satisfy those tribes, by purchase, before they parcelled out
their lands for the purposes of civilized life; but, it would
not be so easy to make an unsophisticated mind understand
that there could be two owners to the same property. The
transaction is simple enough to us, and it tells in favour of
our habits, for we have the power to grant these lands
without
`extinguishing the Indian title,' as it is termed; but it
presents difficulties to the understandings of those who are
not accustomed to see society surrounded by the multifarious
interests of civilization. In point of fact, the Indian
purchases
give no other title, under our laws, than the right to
sue out, in council, a claim to acquire by the grant of the
crown; paying to the latter such a consideration as in
its wisdom it shall see fit to demand. Still, it was necessary
to make some answer to the Onondago's question, lest he
might carry away the mistaken notion that we did not justly
own our possessions.
Suppose you find a rifle to your fancy, Susquesus, I
said after reflecting a moment on the subject, and you find
two Indians who both claim to own it; now, if you pay each
warrior his price, is your right to the title any the worse for
having done so? Is it not rather better?
The Indian was struck with this reply, which suited the
character of his mind. Thrusting out his hand, he received
mine, and shook it cordially, as much as to say he was
satisfied. Having disposed of this episode thus satisfactorily,
Vol. II.  12
we turned to the more interesting subject of our immediate
movements.
It would seem that the Onondago expects the French
Indians will now strike at the settlements, I remarked to
my companions, and, that our friends at Ravensnest may
need our aid; but, at the same time, he thinks we should
first return to Mooseridge, and join the surveyors. Which
mode of proceeding strikes you as the best, my friends?
Let us first hear the Injin's reasons for going after the
surveyors, answered Guert. If he has a sufficient reason
for his plan, I am ready to follow it.
Surveyor got scalp, as well as squaw, said Susquesus,
in his brief, meaning manner.
That must settle the point! exclaimed Guert. I
understand
it all, now. The Onondago thinks the Mooseridge
party may be cut off, as being alone and unsupported, and
that we ought to apprise them of this danger.
All perfectly just, I replied, and it is what they, being
our own people, have a right to expect from us. Still,
Guert, I should think those surveyors might be safe where
they are, in the bosom of the forest, for a year to come.
Their business there cannot be known, and who is then to
betray them?
See, said Susquesus, earnestly. Kill deer, and leave
him in the wood. Won't raven find carcass?
That may be true enough; but a raven has an instinct,
given him by nature, to furnish him with food. He flies
high in the air, moreover, and can see farther than an
Indian
.
Nuttin' see farther than Injin! Red-man fly high, too.
See from salt lake to sweet water. Know ebbery t'ing in
wood. Tell him nuttin' he don't know.
You do not suppose, Susquesus, that the Huron warriors
could find our surveyors, at Mooseridge?
Why, no find him? Find moose; why no find ridge,
too? Find Mooseridge, sartain; find land-measurer.
On the whole, Corny, Guert remarked, after musing a
little, we may do well to follow the Injin's advice. I have
heard of so many misfortunes that have befallen people in
the bush, from having despised Indian counsels, that I own
to a little superstition on the subject. Just look at what
happened yesterday! Had red-skin opinions been taken,
Abercrombie might now have been a conqueror, instead of
a miserable, beaten man.
Susquesus raised a finger, and his dark countenance
became
illumined by an expression that was more eloquent
even than his tongue.
Why no open ear to red-man! he asked, with dignity.
Some bird sing a song that goodsome sing bad song
but all bird know his own song. Mohawk warrior use to
wood, and follow a crooked war-path, when he meet much
enemy. Great Yengeese chief think his warrior have two
life, that he put him before cannon and rifle, to stand up and
be shot. No Injin do so foolishnonever!
As this was too true to be controverted, the matter was
not discussed; but, having determined among ourselves to
let the Onondago take us back on the path by which we had
come, we announced our readiness to start as soon as it
might suit his convenience. Being sufficiently rested,
Susquesus
,
who did everything on system, manifesting neither
impatience nor laziness, arose and quietly led the way.
Our course was just the reverse of that on which we had
travelled when we left Mooseridge; and I did not fail to
observe that, so accurate was the knowledge of our guide,
we passed many of the same objects as we had previously
gone near. There was nothing like a track, with the
exception
of occasional foot-prints left by ourselves; but it was
evident the Onondago paid not the least attention to these,
possessing other and more accessible clues to his course.
Guert marched next to the Indian, and I was third in the
line. How often, that busy day, did I gaze at my file-leader,
in admiration of his figure and mien! Nature appeared to
have intended him for a soldier. Although so powerful, his
frame was agilea particular in which he differed from
Dirck; who, although so young, already gave symptoms
of heaviness, at no distant day. Then Guert's carriage was
as fine as his form. The head was held erect; the eye was
intrepid in its glance; and the tread elastic, though so firm.
To the last hour, on that long and weary march, Guert
leaped logs, sprang across hollows in the ground, and
otherwise
manifested that his iron sinews and hardened muscles
still retained all their powers. As he moved in my front, I
saw, for the first time, that some of the fringe of his
hunting-shirt
had been cut away in the fight, and that a
musket-ball
had passed directly through his cap. I afterwards
ascertained that Guert was aware of these escapes, but his
nature was so manly, he did not think of mentioning them.
We made a single halt, as before, to dine; but little was
said, at this meal, and no change in our plan was proposed.
This was the point where we ought to have diverged from
the former course, did we intend to proceed first to
Ravensnest
;
but, though all knew it, nothing was said on the
subject
.
We shall carry unwelcome tidings to Mr. Traverse,
and his men, Guert observed, a minute or two before our
halt was up; for, I take it for granted, the news cannot
have gone ahead of
us
.
We first, answered the Onondago. Too soon for
Huron, yet. T'ink sonobody know.
I wish, Corny, pursued the Albanian, we had thought
of saying a word to Doortje about this accursed expedition.
There is no use in a man's being above his business; and
he who puts himself in the way of fortune, might profit by
now and then consulting a fortune-teller.
Had we done so, and had all that has happened been
foretold, do you suppose it would have made any change in
the result?
Perhaps not, since we should have been the persons to
relate what we had heard. But, Abercrombie, himself, need
have had no scruples about visiting that remarkable old
woman
.
She 's a wonderful creature, Corny, as we must allow,
and a prudent general would not fail to respect what she told
him. It is a thousand pities that either the
Commander-In-Chief
,
or the Adjutant-General, had not paid Doortje a visit
before they left Albany. My Lord Howe's valuable life
might then have been saved.
In what way, Guert? I am at a loss to see in what
manner any good could come of it.
In what manner?  Why, in the plainest possible.
Now, suppose Doortje had foretold this defeat; it is clear,
Abercrombie, if he put any faith in the old woman, would
not have made the attack.
And thus defeat the defeat. Do you not see, Guert, that
the soothsayer can, at the best, but foretell what
is
to
happen
,
and that which
must
come
will
. It would be an easy
matter for any of us to get great reputations for
fortune-telling
,
if all we had to do was to predict misfortunes, in
order that our friends might avoid them. As nothing would
ever happen, in consequence of the precautions taken to
avert the evils, a name would be easily and cheaply
maintained
.
By St. Nicholas! Corny, I never thought of that! But,
you have been college-taught; and a thousand things are
picked up at colleges, that one never dreams of at an
academy
.
I see reason, every day, to lament my idleness when
a boy; and fortunate shall I be, if I do not lament it all my
life.
Poor Guert! He was always so humble, when the
subject
of education arose, however accidentally or
unintentionally
on my part, that it was never commented on, that it did
not give me pain, exciting a wish to avoid it. As the time
for the halt was now up, it was easy to terminate the present
discussion, by declaring as much, and proceeding on our
way.
We had a hard afternoon's walk of it, though neither of
the five manifested the least disposition to give in. As for
Susquesus, to me, he never seemed to know either fatigue
or hunger. He was doubtless acquainted with both; but
his habits of self-command were so severe, as to enable him
completely to conceal his sufferings in this, as well as in
most other respects.
The sun was near setting when we entered within the
limits of the Mooseridge estate. We ascertained this fact
by passing the line-trees, some of which had figures cut into
their barks, to denote the numbers of the great subdivisions
of the property. Guert pointed out these marks; being far
more accustomed to the woods than either Dirck or myself.
Aided by such guides, we had no difficulty in making a
sufficiently
straight course to the hut.
Susquesus thought a little caution necessary, as we drew
near to the end of our journey. Causing us to remain
behind, he advanced in front, himself, to reconnoitre. A
signal, however, soon took us to the place where he stood,
when we discovered the hut just as we had left it, but no one
12 *
near it. This might be the result of mere accident, the
surveying party frequently `'camping out,' in preference to
making a long march after a fatiguing day's work; and
Pete would be very likely to prefer going to join these men,
to remaining alone in the hut. We advanced to the
building
,
therefore, with confidence. On reaching it, we found
the place empty, as had been anticipated, though with every
sign about it of its tenants having left it but a short time
previously; that morning, at the furthest.
Jaap set about preparing a supper out of the regular
supplies
of the party; all of which were found in their places,
and in abundance. On inquiry of the fellow, I ascertained
it was his opinion Mr. Traverse had gone off that very day,
most probably to some distant portion of the Patent, taking
Pete with him, as everything was covered up and put away
with that sort of care that denotes an absence of some little
time. The Indian heard the negro's remark, to this effect,
and, tossing his head significantly, he said
No need guessgo seelight enoughplenty time.
Injin soon tell.
He quitted the hut, on the spot, and immediately set about
this self-assigned duty.
CHAPTER X.
Thou tremblest; and the whiteness in thy cheek
Is apter than thy tongue to tell thy errand.
Shakspeare
.
Curiosity
induced me to follow the Indian, in order to
watch his movements. Susquesus proceeded a short
distance
from the hut, quitting the knoll entirely, until he
reached lower land, where a foot-print would be most likely
to be visible, when he commenced a slow circuit of the place,
with eyes fastened on the earth, as the nose of the hound
follows the scent. I was so much interested in the
Onondago's
manner, as to join him, falling-in in his rear, in
order not to interfere with his object.
Of foot-marks there were plenty, more particularly on the
low, moist ground, where we were; but they all appeared,
to me, to have no interest with the Indian. Most of our
party wore moccasins; and it was not easy to see how,
under such circumstances, and amid such a maze of
impressions
,
it could be possible for any one to distinguish a hostile
from a friendly trail. That Susquesus thought the thing
might be done, however, was very evident by his
perseverance
,
and his earnestness.
At first, my companion met with no success, or with
nothing
that he fancied success; but, after making half the
circuit of the hut, keeping always a hundred yards distant
from it, he suddenly stopped; stooped quite to the earth; then
arose, and, sticking a broken knot into the ground, as a
mark, he signed to me to keep a little on one side, while he
turned at right angles to his former course, and moved
inwards
towards our dwelling. I followed slowly, watching
his movements, step by step.
In this manner we reached the hut, deviating from a
direct line, in order to do so. At the hut, itself, Susquesus
made a long and minute examination; but even I could see,
that the marks here were so numerous, as to baffle even
him. After finishing his search at this point, the Indian
turned, and went back to the place where he had stuck the
knot in the ground. In doing this, however, he followed
his own trail, returning by precisely the same deviating
course as that by which he had come. This, alone, would
have satisfied me that he saw more than I did; for, to own
the truth, I could not have done the same thing.
When we reached the knot, Susquesus followed that (to
me invisible) trail outside of the circle, leading off into the
forest in a direct line from the hut and spring. I continued
near him, although neither had spoken during the whole of
this examination, which had now lasted quite half an hour.
As it was getting dark, however, and Jaap showed the
signal
that our supper was ready, I thought it might be well,
at length, to break the silence.
What do you make of all this, Trackless? I inquired.
Do you find any signs of a trail?
Good trail  Susquesus answered; new trail, too.
Look like Huron!
This was startling intelligence, certainly; yet, much as I
was disposed to defer to my companion's intelligence in
such matters, in general, I thought he must be mistaken in
his fact. In the first place, though I had seen many
foot-prints
near the hut, and along the low land on which the
Indian made his circuit, I could see none where we then
were. I mentioned this to the Indian, and desired him to
show me, particularly, one of the signs which had led him
to his conclusion.
See, said Susquesus, stooping so low as to place a
finger on the dead leaves that ever make a sort of carpet to
the forest, here been moccasinthat heel; this toe.
Aided, in this manner, I could discover a faint foot-print,
which might, by aid of the imagination, be thus read; though
the very slight impression that was to be traced, might
almost as well be supposed anything else, as it seemed to
me.
I see what you mean, Susquesus; and, I allow, it
may
be a foot-print, I answered; but then it may also have
been left by anything else, which has touched the ground
just at that spot. It may have been made by a falling
branch of a tree.
Where branch? asked the Indian, quick as lightning.
Sure enough; that is more than I can tell you. But I
cannot suppose
that
a Huron foot-print, without more evidence
than you now give.
What you call that?thisthatt'other? added the
Indian, stepping quickly back, and pointing to four other
similar, but very faint impressions on the leaves; no see
him, eh?Just leg apart, too!
This was true enough; and now my attention was thus
directed, and my senses were thus aided, I confess I did
discover
certain proofs of footsteps, that would, otherwise, have
baffled my most serious search.
I can see what you mean, Susquesus, I said, and will
allow that this line of impressions, or marks, does make
them look more like footsteps. At any rate, most of our
party wear moccasins as well as the red-men, and how do
you know that some of the surveyors have not passed this
way?
Surveyor no make such mark. Toe turn in.
This was true, too. But it did not follow that a foot-print
was a Huron's, merely because it was Indian. Then, where
were the enemy's warriors to come from, in so short a time
as had intervened between the late battle and the present
moment? There was little question all the forces of the
French, pale-face and red-man, had been collected at
Ticonderoga
to meet the English; and the distance was so great
as almost to render it impossible for a party to reach this
spot so soon, coming from the vicinity of the fortress after
the occurrence of the late events. Did not the lake
interpose
an obstacle, I might have inferred that parties of
skirmishers
would be thrown on the flanks of the advancing
army, thus bringing foes within a lessened distance of us;
but, there was the lake, affording a safe approach for more
than thirty miles, and rendering the employment of any
such skirmishers useless. All this occurred to me at the
moment, and I mentioned it to my companion as an
argument
against his own supposition.
No true, answered Susquesus, shaking his head. That
trailhe Huron trail, too. Don't know red-man to say so.
But red-men are human as well as pale-faces. It must
be seventy miles from this spot to the foot of Lake George,
and your conjecture would make it necessary that a party
should have travelled that distance in less than twenty-four
hours, and be here some time before us.
We no travel him, eh?
I grant you that, Trackless; but we came a long bit of
the road in a canoe, each and all of us sleeping, and resting
ourselves, in turns. These Hurons must have come the
whole distance by land.
No so. Huron paddle canoe well as Onondago. Lake
therecanoe plenty. Why not come?
Do you suppose, Trackless, that any of the French
Indians would venture on the lake while it was covered with
our boats, as was the case last night?
What `our boat' good for, eh? Carry wounded
warrior
carry
runaway warriorwhat he care? T'ink Huron
'fraid of boat? Boat got eye, eh? Boat see; boat hear;
boat shoot, eh?
Perhaps not; but those who were in the boats can do
all this, and would be apt, at least, to speak to a strange
canoe.
Boat speak my canoe, eh? Onondago canoe, strange
canoe, too.
All this was clear enough, when I began to reflect on it.
It was certainly possible for a canoe with two or three
paddles, to go the whole length of the lake in much less
time than we had employed in going two-thirds of the
distance
;
and a party landing in the vicinity of William-Henry,
could certainly have reached the spot where we then were,
several hours sooner than we had reached it ourselves. Still,
there existed all the other improbabilities on my side of the
question. It was improbable that a party should have
proceeded
in precisely this manner; it was still more
improbable
that such a party, coming on a war-path, from a
distant
part of the country, should know exactly where to find
our hut. After a moment's pause, and while we both slowly
proceeded to join our companion, I suggested these objections
to the Onondago.
Don't know Injin, answered the other, betraying more
earnestness of manner than was usual with him, when he
condescended to discuss any of the usages of the tribes, with
a pale-face. He fight first; then he want scalp. Ever
see dead horse in woodwell, no crow there, eh? Plenty
crow, isn't he? Just so, Injin. Wounded soldier carry off,
and Injin watch in wood, behind army, to get scalp. Scalp
good, after battle. Want him, very much. Wood full of
Huron, along path to Albany. Yengeese down in heart;
Huron up. Scalp so good, t'ink of nuttin' else.
By this time we had reached the hut, where I found Guert
and Dirck already at their supper. I will own that my
appetite was not as good as it might have been, but for the
Onondago's conjectures and discoveries; though I took a
seat, and began to eat with my friends. While at the meal,
I communicated to my companions all that had passed,
particularly
asking of Guert, who had a respectable knowledge
of the bush, what he thought of the probabilities of the case.
If hostile red-skins have really been here, lately, the
Albanian answered, they have been throughly cunning
devils; for not an article in or about the hut has been
disturbed
.
I had an eye to that myself, the moment we
arrived
;
for I have thought it far from unlikely that the
Hurons
would be out, on the road between William-Henry
and the settlements, trying to get scalps from the parties
that would be likely to be sent to the rear with wounded
officers.
In which case our friend Bulstrode might be in
danger
?
He must take his chance, like all of us. But, he will
probably be carried to Ravensnest, as the nearest nest for
him to nestle in. I don't half like this trail, however, Corny;
it is seldom a red-skin of the Onondago's character, makes
a mistake in such a matter!
It is too late, now, to do anything to-night, Dirck
observed
.
Besides, I don't think any great calamity is likely
to befall any of us, or Doortje would have dropped some
hint about it. These fortune-tellers seldom let anything
serious pass without a notice of some sort or other. You
see, Corny, we went through all this business at Ty,
without
a scratch, which is so much in favour of the old
woman's
being right.
Poor Dirck! that prediction had made a deep impression
on his character, and on his future life. A man's faith must
be strong, to fancy that a negative of this nature could carry
with it any of the force of a positive, affirmative prediction.
Nevertheless, Dirck had spoken the truth, in one respect.
It was too late to do anything that night, and it only
remained
to prepare to take our rest as securely as possible.
We consulted on the subject, calling on the Indian to aid
us. After talking the matter over, it was determined to
remain
where we were, securing the door, and bringing
everybody
within the building; for the negroes and the Indians
had been much in the habit of sleeping about, under
brush-covers
that they had erected for themselves. It was thought
that, having once visited the hut, and finding it empty, the
enemy, if enemy there were, would not be very likely to
return to it immediately, and that we might consider
ourselves
as comparatively safe, from that circumstance alone.
Then, there were all the chances that the trail might have
been left by friendly, instead of hostile Indians, although
Susquesus shook his head in the negative, whenever this
was mentioned. At all events, we had but a choice of three
expedientsto abandon the Patent, and seek safety in flight;
to `'camp out;' or to shut ourselves up in our fortress. Of
the first, no one thought for a moment; and of the two
others, we decided on the last, as far the most comfortable,
and, on the whole, as the safest.
An hour after we had come to this determination, I
question
if either of the five knew anything about it. I never
slept more profoundly in my life, and my companions
subsequently
gave the same account of their several conditions.
Fatigue, and youth, and health, gave us all refreshing sleep;
and, as we lay down at nine, two o'clock came after so
much time totally lost in the way of consciousness. I say
two o'clock; for my watch told me that was just the hour,
when the Indian awoke me, by shaking my shoulder. One
gets the habits of watchfulness in the woods, and I was on
my feet in an instant.
Dark as it was, for it was deep night, I could distinguish
that Susquesus was alone stirring, and that he had unbarred
the door of our cabin. Indeed, he passed through that open
space, into the air of the forest, the moment he perceived I
was conscious of what I was about. Without pausing to
reflect, I followed, and soon stood at his side, some fifteen
or twenty feet from the hut.
This good place to hear, said the Indian, in a low
suppressed
tone. Now, open ear.
What a scene was that, which now presented itself to my
senses! I can see it, at this distance of time, after years of
peaceful happiness, and years of toil and adventure. The
morning, or it might be better to say the night, was not very
dark in itself; but the gloom of the woods being added to
the obscurity of the hour, it lent an intensity of blackness
to the trunks of the trees, that gave to each a funereal and
solemn aspect. It was impossible to see for any distance,
and the objects that were visible were only those that were
nearest at hand. Notwithstanding, one might imagine the
canopied space beneath the tops of the trees, and fancy it,
in the majesty of its gloomy vastness. Of sounds there were
literally none, when the Indian first bade me listen. The
stillness was so profound, that I thought I heard the sighing
of the night air among the upper branches of the loftier
trees. This might have been mere imagination;
nevertheless
,
all above the summits of the giant oaks, maples and
pines, formed a sort of upper world as regarded us; a world
with which we had little communication, during our sojourn
in the woods below. The raven, and the eagle, and the
hawk, sailed in that region, above the clouds of leaves
beneath
them, and occasionally stooped, perhaps, to strike
their quarry; but, to all else, it was inaccessible, and to a
degree invisible.
But, my present concern is with the world I was in; and,
what a world it was! Solemn, silent, dark, vast and
mysterious
.
I listened in vain, to catch the footstep of some busy
squirrel, for the forest was alive with the smaller animals,
by night quite as much as by day; but everything, at that
moment, seemed stilled to the silence of death.
I can hear nothing, Trackless, I whisperedWhy
are you out here?
You hear, soonwake me up, and I hear twice. Soon
come ag'in.
It did soon come again. It was a human cry, escaping
from human lips in their agony! I heard it once only; but,
should I live to be a hundred, it would not be forgotten. I
often hear it in my sleep, and twenty times have I awoke
since, fancying that agonizing call was in my ears. It was
long, loud, piercing, and the word `help' was as distinct as
tongue could make it.
Great God! I exclaimedsome one is set upon, and
calls for aid in his extremity. Let us arouse our friends,
and go to his assistance. I cannot remain here, Susquesus,
with such a cry in my ears.
Best go, t'ink too, answered the Onondago. No need
call, though; two better than four. Stop minute.
I did remain stationary that brief space, listening with
agonized uncertainty, while the Indian entered the hut, and
returned, bringing out his rifle and my own. Arming
ourselves
,
and shutting the door of the cabin, to exclude the
night-air, at least, Susquesus led off, with his noiseless step,
in a south-west direction, or that in which we had heard
the sound.
Vol. II.  13
Our march was too swift and earnest to admit of
discourse
.
The Onondago had admonished me to make as
little noise as possible; and, between the anxiety I felt, and
the care taken to comply, there was, indeed, but little
opportunity
for conversing. My feelings were wrought up to
a high pitch; but my confidence in my companion being
great, I followed in his footsteps, as diligently as my skill
would allow. Susquesus rather trod on air than walked;
yet I kept close at his heels, until we had gone, as I should
think, fully half a mile in the direction from which that
awful cry had come. Here Susquesus halted, saying to me,
in a low voice
No far from herebest stop.
I submitted, in all things, to the directions of my Indian
guide. The latter had selected the dark shadows of two or
three young pines for our cover, where, by getting within
their low branches, we were completely concealed from any
eye that was distant from us eight or ten feet. No sooner
were we thus posted, than the Onondago pointed to the trunk
of a fallen tree, and we took our seats silently on it. I
observed
that my companion kept his thumb on the cock of
his rifle, while his fore-finger was passed around the trigger.
It is scarcely necessary to say that I observed the same
precaution.
This good, said Susquesus, in a voice so low and soft
that it could not attract more attention than a whisper;
this very goodhear him ag'in, soon; then know.
A stifled groan
was
heard, and that almost as soon as my
companion ceased to speak. I felt my blood curdle at these
frightful evidences of human suffering; and an impulse of
humanity caused me to move, as if about to rise. The hand
of Trackless checked the imprudence.
No good, he said, sternly. Sit still. Warrior know
how to sit still.
But, Heavenly Providence! There is some one in
agony, quite near us, man. Did you not hear a groan,
Trackless?
To be sure, hear him.What of that? Pain make
groan come, alway, from pale-face.
You think, then, it is a white-man who suffers? if so, it
must be one of our party, as there is no one else near us.
If I hear it again, I must go to his relief, Onondago.
Why you behave like squaw? What of little groan?
Sartain, he pale-face; Injin never groan on war-path. Why
he groan, you t'ink? Cause Huron meet him. That reason
he groan. You groan, too, no sit still. Injin know time to
shootknow time not to shoot.
I had every disposition to call aloud, to inquire who
needed succour; yet the admonitions of my companion,
aided as they were by the gloomy mysteries of that vast
forest, in the hour of deepest night, enabled me to command
the impulse. Three times, notwithstanding, was that groan
repeated; and, as it appeared to me, each time more and
more faintly. I thought, too, when all was still in the
forestwhen we sat ourselves in breathless expectation of
what might next reach our earsattentive to each sighing
of the night-air, and distrustful even of the rustling leaf
that the last groan of all, though certainly the faintest of
any we had heard, was much the nearest. Once, indeed, I
heard, or fancied I heard, the word `water,' murmured in a
low, smothered tone, almost in my ear. I thought, too, I
knew the voice; that it was familiar to me; though I could
not decide, in the state of my feelings, exactly to whom it
belonged.
In this manner we passed what, to me, were two of the
most painful hours of my life, waiting the slow return of
light. My own impatience was nearly ungovernable;
though the Indian sat, the whole of that time, seemingly as
insensible as the long which formed his seat, and almost as
motionless. At length this intensely anxious, and even
physically painful watch, drew near its end. Signs of day
gleamed through the canopy of leaves, and the rays of dull
light appeared to struggle downward, rendering objects
dimly discernible.
It was not long ere we could ascertain that we had so
completely covered ourselves, as to be in a position where
the branches of the pines completely shut out the view of
objects beyond. This was favourable to reconnoitring,
however, previously to quitting our concealment, and enabled
us to have some care of ourselves while attending to the
duties of humanity.
Susquesus used the greatest caution in looking around
before he left the cover. I was close at his side, peeping
through such openings as offered; for my curiosity was so
intense, that I almost forgot the causes for apprhension. It
was not long before I heard the familiar Indian interjection,
hugh! from my companion; a proof that something had
caught his eye, of a more than ordinarily exciting character.
He pointed in the way I was to look, and there, indeed, I
beheld one of those frightful instances of barbarous cruelty,
that the usages of savage warfare have sanctioned, as far
back as our histories extend, among the forest warriors of
this continent. The tops of two saplings had been brought
down near each other, by main force, the victim's hands
attached firmly to upper branches of each, and the trees
permitted
to fly back to their natural positions, or as near them
as the revolting means of junction would allow. I could
scarce believe my senses, when my sight first revealed the
truth. But there hung the victim, suspended by his arms,
at an elevation of at least ten or fifteen feet from the earth.
I confess I sincerely hoped he was dead, and the motionless
attitude of the body gave me reason to think it might be so.
Still, the cries for help, uttered wildly, hopelessly, in the
midst of a vast and vacant forest, the groans extorted by
suffering, must have been his. He had probably been thus
suspended and abandoned, while alive!
Even the Onondago could not restrain me, after I fully
saw and understood the nature of the cruelty which had
been exercised on the miserable victim who was thus
suspended
directly before my eyes, and I broke out of the cover,
ready, I am willing to confess, to pull trigger on the first
hostile red-man I saw. Fortunately for myself, most
probably
,
the place had long been deserted. As the back of
the sufferer was towards me, I could not tell who he was;
but his dress was coarse, and of the description that belongs
to the lowest class. Blood had flowed freely from his head,
and I made no doubt he had been scalped; though the
height at which he hung, and the manner in which his head
had fallen forward upon his breast, prevented me from
ascertaining
the fact at once, by the aid of sight. Thus much
did I perceive, however, ere the Indian joined me.
See! said Susquesus, whose quick eye never let
anything
escape it long, told you so; Huron been here.
As this was said, the Indian pointed significantly at the
naked skin, which was visible between the heavy, coarse
shoes of the victim, and the trowsers he wore, when I
discovered
it was black. Moving quickly in front, so as to get
a view of the face, I recognised the distorted features of
Petrus, or Pete, Guert Ten Eyck's negro. This man had
been left with the surveyors, it will be remembered, and he
had either fallen into the hands of his captors, while at the
hut, engaged in his ordinary duties, or he had been met in
the forest while going to, or coming from those he served,
and had thus been treated. We never ascertained the facts,
which remain in doubt to this hour.
Give me your tomahawk, Trackless, I cried, as soon
as horror would permit me to speak, that I may cut down
this sapling, and liberate the unfortunate creature!
No goodbetter so, answered the Indian. Bear
wolf can't get him, now. Let black-skin hanggood as
buryno safe stay here long. Look round and count
Huron, then go.
Look round and count the Hurons, I thought to
myself
;
and in what manner is this to be done? By this
time, however, it was sufficiently light to see foot-prints, if
any there were, and the Onondago set about examining
such traces of what had passed at that terrible spot, as
might be intelligible to one of his experience.
At the foot of a huge oak, that grew a few yards from
the fatal saplings, we found the two wooden, covered pails,
in which we knew Pete had been accustomed to carry food
to Mr. Traverse and the chain-bearers. They were empty,
but whether the provisions they unquestionably had
contained
fell to the share of those for whom they were intended,
or to that of the captors, we never learned. No traces of
bones, potato-skins, or other fragments were discovered;
and, if the Hurons had seized the provisions, they doubtless
transferred them to their own repositories, without stopping
to eat. Susquesus detected proof that the victim had been
seated at the foot of the oak, and that he had been seized at
that spot. There were the marks of many feet there, and
some proofs of a slight scuffle. Blood, too, was to be traced
13*
on the leaves, from the foot of the oak, to the place where
poor Pete was suspended; a proof that he had been hurt,
previously to being abandoned to his cruel fate.
But the point of most interest with Trackless was to
ascertain
the number of our foes. This might be done, in some
measure, according to his view of the matter, by means of
the foot-prints. There was no want of such signs, the leaves
being much disturbed in places, though after a short but
anxious search, my companion thought it wisest to repair to
the hut, lest those it contained might be surprised in their
sleep. He gave me to understand that the enemy did not
appear to be numerous at that spot, three or four at most,
though it was quite possible, nay highly probable, that they
had separated, and that their whole force was not present at
this miserable scene.
It was broad daylight when we came in sight of the hut
again, and I perceived Jaap was up and busy with his pots
and kettles near the spring. No one else was visible, and
we inferred that Guert and Dirck were still on their pallets.
We took a long and distrustful survey of the forest around
the cabin, from the height where we stood, ere we ventured
to approach it any nearer. Discovering no signs of danger,
and the forest being quite clear of underbrush or cover of
any sort, large trees excepted, for some distance from the
hut, we then advanced without apprehension. This open
character of the woods near our dwelling was felt to be a
very favourable circumstance, rendering it impossible for an
enemy to get very near us by day-light, without being seen.
It was owing to the fact that we had used so much of the
smaller timber, in our own operations, while the negroes
had burned most of the underbrush for fuel.
Sure enough, I found my two friends fast asleep, and
certainly much exposed. When aroused and told all that
had occurred to me and the Indian, their surprise was great,
nor was their horror less. Jaap, who, missing us on rising,
supposed we had gone in pursuit of game, had followed us
into the hut, and heard my communications. His
indignation
was great, at the idea of one of his own colour's being
thus treated, and I heard him vowing vengeance between
his set teeth, in terms that were by no means measured.
By St. Nicholas! exclaimed Guert, who had now
finished dressing, and who accompanied me out into the
open air, my poor fellow shall be revenged, if the rifle will
do it! Scalped, too, do you say, Corny?
As far as we could ascertain, suspended as he was from
the tree. But, scalped he must be, as an Indian never
permits
a dead captive to escape this mutilation.
And you have been out in the forest three hours, you
tell me, Corny?You and Trackless?
About that time, I should judge. The heart must have
been of stone, that could resist those cries!
I do not blame you, Littlepage, though it would have
been kinder, and wiser, had you taken your friends with
you. We must stick together, in future, let what may
happen. Poor Petrus! I wonder Doortje should have
hinted nothing of that nigger's fate!
We then held a long consultation on the subject of our
mode of proceeding, next. It is unnecessary to dwell on
this conference, as its conclusions will be seen in the events
of the narrative; but it was brought to a close by a very
sudden interruption, and that was the sound of an axe in the
forest. The blows came in the direction of the scene of
Pete's murder, and we had collected our rifles, and were
preparing to move towards the suspected point, when we
saw Jaap staggering along, coming to the hut, beneath the
load of his friend's body. The fellow had stolen away,
unseen
,
on this pious duty, and had executed it with success.
In a minute or two he reached the spring, and began to
wash away the revolting remains of the massacre from the
head of the Huron's victim.
We now ascertained that poor Pete had been badly cut
by knives, as well as scalped, and suspended in the manner
related. Both arms appeared to be dislocated, and the only
relief to our feelings, was in the hope that an attempt to
inflict
so much suffering must have soon defeated itself. Guert,
in particular, expressed his hope that such was the case,
though the awful sounds of the past night were still too fresh
in my ears to enable me to believe all I could wish on that
subject. A grave was dug, and we buried the body at once,
rolling a large log or two on the spot, in order to prevent
wild beasts from disinterring it. Jaap worked hard in the
performance of these rites, and Guert Ten Eyck actually
repeated the Lord's Prayer and the Creed over the grave,
when the body was placed in it, with a fervour and
earnestness
that a little surprised me.
He was but a nigger, Corny, it is true, said the
Albanian
,
a little apologetically perhaps, after all was over, but
he was a very goot nigger, in the first place; then, he had
a soul, as well as a white manPete had his merits, as well
as a Tominie, and I trust they will not be forgotten in the
last great account. He was an excellent cook, as you must
have seen, and I never knew a nigger that had more of the
dog-like fidelity to his master. The fellow never got into
a frolic without coming honestly to ask leave; though, to be
sure, I was not a hard master, in these particulars, on
reasonable
occasions.
We next ate our breakfasts, with as much appetite as we
could. Shouldering our packs, and placing all around, and
in the hut, as much as possible in the condition in which we
had found the place, we then commenced our march,
Susquesus
leading, as usual.
We went in quest of the surveyors, who were supposed
to be in the south-east corner of the Patent, employed as
usual, and ignorant of all that had passed. At first, we
had thought of discharging our rifles, as signals to bring
them in; but these signals might apprize our enemies, as
well as our friends, of our presence, and the distance was
too great, moreover, to render it probable the reports could
be heard by those for whom alone they would be intended.
The route we took was determined by our general
knowledge
of the quarter of the Patent in which the surveyors
ought now to be, as well as by the direction in which the
body of Pete had been found. The poor fellow was
certainly
either going to, or coming from the party, and being
in constant communication with them, he doubtless knew
where they were at work. Then the different trails of
the surveyors were easily enough found by Trackless, and
he told us that the most recent led off in the direction I have
named. Towards the south-east, therefore, we held our
way, marching, as before, in Indian file; the Onondago
leading, and the negro bringing up the rear.
CHAPTER XI.
'Tis too horrible!
The weariest and most loathed worldly life
That age, ache, penury, and imprisonment
Can lay on nature, is a paradise,
To what we fear of death.
Measure for Measure
.
We
were not long in reaching the point of the Patent in
which the surveyors had been at work, after which we could
have but little difficulty in finding their present actual
position
.
The marked trees were guides that told the whole
story of their labours. For an hour and a half, however,
we moved rapidly forward, Susquesus on the lead, silent,
earnest, watchful, and I fear I must add, revengeful. Not
a syllable had been uttered during the whole of that time,
though our senses were keenly on the alert; and we avoided
everything like a cover that might conceal an ambush.
Suddenly the Indian halted; at the next instant he was
behind a tree. Each of us imitated him, quick as thought,
for this was our previous training in the event of
encountering
an enemy; and we all well knew the importance of a
cover in forest warfare. Still, no foe could be seen. After
examining around us in every direction, for a minute or two,
and finding the woods vacant and silent as ever, Guert and
I quitted our own trees, and joined the Trackless, at the
foot of his own huge pine.
Why this, Susquesus? demanded the Albanian, sharply;
for he began to suspect a little acting, got up to magnify the
Indian's usefulness; here is neither pale-face nor red-skin.
Have done with this folly, and let us go forward.
No good  warrior been here; p'rhaps gone, p'rhaps
no; soon see. Open eye, and look.
As a gesture accompanied this speech, we did look again,
and this time in the right direction. At the distance of a
hundred yards from us was a chestnut, that might be seen
from its roots to its branches. On the ground, partly
concealed
by the tree, and partly exposed, was the leg of a man,
placed as the limb would be apt to lie, on the supposition
that its owner lay on his back, asleep. It showed a
moccasin
,
and the usual legging of an Indian; but the thigh,
and all the rest of the frame, was concealed. The quick
eye of the Onondago had caught this small object, even at
that distance, comprehended it at a glance, when he instantly
sought a cover, as described. Guert and I had some
difficulty
at first, even after it was pointed out to us, in
recognising
this object; but it soon became distinct and intelligible.
Is that a red-skin's leg? asked Guert, dropping the
muzzle of his rifle, as if about to try his skill on it.
Don't know, answered the Indian; got leggin, got
moccasin; can't see colour. Look most pale-face; leg big.
What there was to enable one, at that distance, to
distinguish
between the leg of a white man and the leg of an
Indian, at first greatly exceeded our means of conjecturing;
but the Onondago explained it, when asked, in his own
usual, sententious manner, by saying:
Toe turn outInjin turn inno like, at all. Pale-face
big; Injin no very big.
The first was true enough in walking, and it did seem
probable that the difference might exist in sleep. Guert now
declared there was no use in hesitating any longer; if asleep,
he would approach the chestnut cautiously, and capture the
stranger, if an Indian, before he could rise; and if a white
man, it must be some one belonging to our own set, who
was taking a nap, probably, after a fatiguing march.
Susquesus
must have satisfied himself, by this time, that there
was no immediate danger; for merely saying, all go
together
,
he quitted the cover, and led down towards the chestnut
with a rapid but noiseless step. As we moved in a body,
all five of us reached the tree at the same instant, where we
found Sam, one of our own hunters, and whem we supposed
to be with Mr. Traverse, stretched on his back, dead;
with a wound in his breast that had been inflicted by a knife.
He, too, had been scalped!
The looks we exchanged, said all that could be said on
the subject of the gravity of this new discovery. Susquesus,
alone, was undisturbed; I rather think he expected what he
found. After examining the body, he seemed satisfied,
simply saying, kill, last night.
That poor Sam had been dead several hours was pretty
certain, and the circumstance removed all apprehension of
any immediate danger from his destroyers. The ruthless
warriors of the woods seldom remained long near the spot
they had desolated, but passed on, like the tornado, or the
tempest. Guert, who was ever prompt when anything was
to be done, pointed to a natural hollow in the earth; one of
those cavities that are so common in the forest, and which
are usually attributed to the upturning of trees in remote
ages, and suggested that we should use it as a grave. The
body was accordingly laid in the hole, and we covered it in
the best manner we could; succeeding in placing over it
something like a foot deep of light loam, together with
several
flat stones; rolling logs on all, as we had done at the
grave of Pete. By this time Guert's feelings were so
thoroughly
aroused, that, in addition to the prayer and the
creed, which he again repeated, in a very decorous and
devout manner, he concluded the whole ceremony by a brief
address. Nor was Guert anything but serious in what he
did, or said, on either of these solemn occasions; his words,
like his acts, being purely the impulses of a simple mind,
which possesses longings after devotion and scriptural truths,
without knowing exactly how to express them; and this,
moreover, in spite of the mere animal propensities, and gay
habits of his physical conformation, and constitutional
tendencies
.
Deat', my frients, said Guert, most seriously, becoming
Dutch, as usual, as he became interested; Deat' is a
sutten
visiter. He comes like a t'ief in the night, as you must
all have often he'rt the Tominie say; and happy is he
whose loins are girtet, and whose lamp is trimmed. Such,
I trust, is the case with each of you; for, it is not to be
concealet, that we are likely to have serious work before us.
Here have been Injins, beyont a question; and they are
Injins, too, that are out on the war-path, in search of
English
scalps; or, what is of equal importance to Mr. Follock
and myself, Dutch scalps in the pargain; which makes it
so much the more necessary for every man to be on his
guart, and to stant up to his work, when it may come, as
the pull-tog stants up to the ox. Got forpit t'at I should
preach revenge over t'e grave of a frient; but the soltier
fights none the worse for knowing t'at he has peen injuret in
his feelin's, as has certainly peen the case with ourselves.
Perhaps I ought to say a wort in behalf of the teat, as this
is the last, and only time, that a fellow-creature will ever
have occasion to speak of him. Sam was an excellent
hunter, as his worst enemy must allow; and now he is
gone, few petter remain pehint. He had one weakness,
which, stanting over his grave, an honest man ought not to
try to conceal; he dit love liquor; put, in this, he was not
alone. Nevertheless, he was honest; and his wort might
pass where many a man's pont would be wort'less; and I
leave him in the merciful hants of his Creator. My frients,
I haf but little more to say, and that is thisthat life is
uncertain, and deat' is sure. Samuel has gone before us,
only a little while; and may we all be equally preparet to
meet our great account. Amen.
Did any one smile at this address! Far from it!
Singular
,
disconnected, and unsophisticated as it may seem to
certain persons, it had one great merit that is not always
discernible in the speeches of those who officiate at the most
elaborate funeral rites. Guert was sincere, though he might
not be either logical or very clear. This was apparent in
his countenance, his voice, his whole manner. For myself,
I will allow, I saw nothing particularly out of place, in this
address, at the time, nor do I now regard it as either
irreverent
or unseasonable.
We left the grave of the hunter, in the depths of that
interminable
forest, as the ship passes away from the spot on
the ocean where she has dropped her dead. At some future
day, perhaps, the plough-share may turn up the bones, and
the husbandman ruminate on the probable fate of the lonely
man, whose remains will then again be brought to the light
of day. As we left the spot, the Indian detained us a
moment
,
to put us on our guard.
Huron do that, he said, meaningly  No see
difference
,
eh? Saw no hang up like Pete.
That is true enough, Susquesus, Guert answered; for
Guert, by his age, his greater familiarity with the woods,
his high courage and his personal prowess, had now
assumed
,
unresistingly on our part, a sort of chieftainship
over us. Can you tell us the reason, however?
Muss, you call him, back sore  that all. Know him
well; don't love flog. No Injin love flog.
And you think, then, Jaap's prisoner has had a hand in
this, and that the war-path is open to revenge as well as
public servicethat we are hunted less for our scalps than
to put a plaster on the Huron's back?
Sartain. T'ree canoe go by on laket'at Muss, you
call himknow him, well. He no want sleep till back get
well. See how he use nigger! Hang him on tree  only
kill pale-face and take away scalp.
Do you suppose that he made this difference in the
treatment of his two captives, on account of the colour?
That he was so cruel to Petrus because Jaap, another
nigger
,
had flogged him?
Sartainjust so. Back feel better after t'at. Good for
back to hang nigger. Jaap see, some time.
I will do my fellow the justice to say, that in the way of
courage, few men were his equals. As I have said before,
he only feared spooks, or Dutch ghosts; for the awe he had
of me was so blended with love, as not to deserve the name
of fear. In general, unless the weather happened to be cold,
his face was of a deep, glistening black; coffin-colour, as
the boys sometimes called it; but, I observed,
notwithstanding
his nerve and his keen desire to be revenged for the
cruel treatment bestowed on his companion and brother,
that his skin now assumed a greyish hue, such as is seen
only in hard frosts, as a rule, in the people of his race. It
was evident that the Trackless' manner of speaking had
produced an effect; and I have always thought the
impression
then made on Jaap was of infinite service to us, by
setting in motion, and keeping in lively activity, every
faculty of his mind and body. I had a specimen of this, as
we moved off, Jaap walking for some distance close at my
heels, in order to make me the repository of his griefs and
solicitude.
I hopes, Masser Corny, sah, commenced the negro,
you doesn't t'ink anyt'ing of what dis here Injin say?
I think, Jaap, it will be necessary for you to keep your
eyes open, and by no means to fall into the hands of your
friend Muss, as you call him, or he may serve you even
worse than he served poor Pete. I hope, too, this will be a
Vol. II.  14
warning to you, of the necessity of treating your prisoners
kindly, should you ever make another.
I don't t'ink, Masser Corny, you consider pretty much,
sah. What good it do a nigger to captivate an Injin, if he
let him go ag'in, and don't lick him little? Only little,
Masser Corny. Ebbery t'ing so handy too, sahrope all
ready, back bare, and feelin' up, like, after such a time in
takin' 'e varmint, sah!
Well, Jaap, what is done, is done, and there is no use
in regretting it, in words. Of one thing, however, you may
be certain; no mercy will be shown
you
, should this fellow,
Muss, be actually out here, on our heels, and should you be
so unfortunate as to fall into his hands.
The negro growled out his discontent, and I could see
that his mind was made up to give stout battle, ere
his
wool
should be disturbed by the knife of a savage. A moment
later, he stepped aside, and respectfully permitted Dirck to
take his proper place, next to me, in the line.
We may have proceeded two miles from the spot where
we had buried Sam, the hunter, when on rising a little
hillock
,
the Indian tossed his arm, the sign that a new
discovery
was made. This time, however, the gesture was rather
made in exultation than in horror. As he came to a dead
halt at the same instant, we all closed eagerly up, and got an
early view of the cause of this exhibition of feeling.
The ground fell away, in a sort of swell, for some
distance
in our front; and, the trees being all of the largest
size, and totally without underbrush, the place had
somewhat
of the appearance of a vast, forest edifice, to which the
canopy of leaves above formed the roof, and the stems of
oaks, lindens, beeches and maples, might be supposed to be
the columns that upheld it. Within this wide, gloomy, yet
not unpleasant hall, a sombre light prevailed, like that which
is cast through the casements of an edifice of the ancient
style of architecture, rendering everything mellow and grave.
A spring of sweet water gushed from a rock, and near it
were seated, in a circle, Mr. Traverse and his two
chain-bearers
,
seemingly taking their morning's meal; or, rather,
reclining after it, with the pail, platters and fragments before
them; like men reposing after appeasing their hunger, and
passing a few minutes in idle talk. Tom, the second hunter
and axe-man, lay asleep, a little apart.
Here has been even no alarm, thank Got, said Guert,
cheerfully, and we are in time to let them know their
danger. I will give the call; it will sound sweetly to their
ears!
No call, said Trackless, quickly; hollow no good,
now. Soon get there, and tell him, in low voice.
As this was clearly prudent, we pushed forward in a body,
taking no pains, however, to conceal our approach, but
making somewhat of a measured tread, with our footsteps.
A strange sensation came over me, as we advanced, and I
found that neither of the surveyors stirred! A suspicion of
the dread truth forced itself on my mind; but I can hardly
say that the shock was any the less, when, on getting near,
we saw by the pallid countenances, fixed, glassy eyes, and
fallen jaws, that all our friends were dead. The savage
ingenuity of Indians had propped the bodies in reclining
positions
,
and thrown them into attitudes that had a horrible
resemblance to the species of indulgence that I have just
described.
Holy Heaven! exclaimed Guert, dropping the butt of
his rifle on the ground; we are too late!
No one else spoke. On removing the caps, it was found
that each man had been scalped, and that all of those, whom
we had left a few days before, proud of their strength and
instinct with life, had departed in spirit, soon to be seen no
more. Jumper, the other Indian, alone remained to be
accounted
for. Rifle-balls had been at work here, each of the
four having been shot; Mr. Traverse, in no less than three
places.
I will confess, that a suspicion of the Oneida crossed my
mind, now, for the first time; and I did not scruple to
mention
it to my companions, as soon as either of us had power
to speak, or listen.
No true, said Trackless, positively. Jumper poor
Injinthat solove rumno rascal, to kill friend.
Musohoeenah
warrior to do so. Just like him. No; Jumper
foollove rumno bad Injin.
Where, then, was Jumper? He alone, of all whom we
had left behind us, remained to be found. We made a long
search for his body, but without any success. Susquesus
examined the trails, and the bodies, and gave it as his
opinion
that the surveyor and chain-bearers might have been
killed about three or four hours; and that the murderers,
for such, in our eyes, they who had done the foul deed were
to be accounted, had not been away from the place more
than twenty minutes, when we arrived. This might well
have happened, and we not hear the rifles; as the distance
from the hut was several miles; and, two hours before, we
must have been not far from the place where we had passed
the night. That the attack occurred after daylight, was
reasonably certain; and, as Pete was surely seized while
alive, some intelligence might have been obtained from him,
that directed the savages to the point where the outlying
party would probably be expecting him. Nevertheless, this
was pretty much conjecture, and we never knew which
victim
fell first, or whether the negro was taken at all, near
the spot where he was gibbeted. The infernal cruelty of
his conquerors may have kept him as a prisoner, for some
time before the final catastrophe, and caused them to carry
him about with them as a captive, in order to subject the
wretch to as much misery as possible, for, as Susquesus said,
Muss' `back very sore.'
We buried poor Traverse, and his chain-bearers, near the
spring, using one of the same natural hollows in the earth
as that in which we had interred the hunter. On a search,
it was ascertained that their arms and ammunition had been
carried off, and that the pockets of the dead men had been
rifled. The American Indian is seldom a thief, in the
ordinary
sense of the term; but, he treats the property of those
whom he slays as his own. In this particular, he does not
differ materially from the civilized soldier, I believe, plunder
being usually considered as a legitimate benefit of war. The
Hurons had laid their hands on the compass and chains, for
we could discover neither; but they had left the field-book
and notes of Traverse, as things that, to them, were useless.
In other respects, the visit of the savages to this fatal spot
left the appearance of having been hurried.
On this occasion, Guert made no attempts at morals, or
eloquence. The shock had disqualified us all for anything
of the sort, and we discharged our duties with the earnest
diligence, and grave thoughtfulness, of men who did not
know but the next moment might bring themselves into the
midst of a scene of deadly strife. We worked hard, and a
little hastily, and were soon ready to depart. It was
determined
,
on a hurried consultation, to follow the trail of the
Hurons, as the most certain method of surprising them, on
the one hand, and of preventing them from surprising us,
on the other. The Indian would have no difficulty in
pursuing
the very obvious trail that was left, and which bore
all the proofs of having been left by a dozen men.
The reader, who is unacquainted with the usages of the
American savage, is not to suppose that this party had
moved through the forest, in a disorderly group, regardless
of the nature of the vestiges of their passage left behind
them. The native warrior never does that; usually he
marches in a line of single files, which has obtained the
name of Indian file with us; and, whenever there are strong
reasons for concealing his numbers, it is his practice for
each succeeding man to follow, as nearly as possible, in the
footsteps of the warrior who precedes him; thereby
rendering
a computation difficult, if not impossible. In this
manner
our foes had evidently marched; but Susquesus, who
had been busy examining the marks around the spring, the
whole time we were occupied in burying the dead, gave it
as his opinion that our enemies could not number less than
a dozen warriors. This was not very pleasing intelligence,
since it would render success in a conflict next to hopeless.
So, at least, I viewed the matter, though Guert saw things
differently. This highly intrepid man could not find it in
his heart to abandon the idea of driving foes so ruthless
out of the country; and, I do believe, he would have faced
a hundred savages at once when we quitted the spring.
The Onondago had no difficulty in following the trail,
which led us, at first, for some distance in a line towards
Ravensnest, then made a sudden inclination in the direction
of the hut. It was probably owing to this circuit, and want
of settled purpose in the Hurons, that we did not encounter
them on our advance towards the bloody spring, as the
spot where Traverse was slain has been subsequently
called.
It was not long ere we found ourselves quite near our own
14 *
trail, though, perhaps fortunately for us, we did not actually
strike it. Had our movement been discovered, doubtless the
enemy would have got into our rear, a position in which
Indians are always most formidable. As it was, however,
we possessed that great advantage ourselves, and pursued
our way with so much the greater confidence, knowing full
well that danger was only to be apprehended in our front,
the quarter on which all our eyes were fixed.
Although our return-march was swift, it was silent as
that of a train of mourners. Mourners we were, indeed, for
it was not possible for human hearts to be so obdurate as to
feel insensible to the amount of misery that our late
companious
must have suffered, and to the suddenness of their
fates. No one spoke, and Susquesus had never found us so
close on his heels as we kept ourselves all that morning.
The foot of the file-leader was scarcely out of its place, ere
that of his successor covered the same spot!
The trail led us quite close to the hut, which we reached
as near as might be to noon. On approaching the cabin, we
used the utmost caution lest our enemies might then be in it,
in ambush. The trail did not extend quite to the building,
however, but diverged in a westerly direction, from a point
that may have been a hundred yards distant from our
habitation
,
though in full view of it. Here we found the signs
of a gathering of the party into a cluster, and we inferred
that a counsel had been held on the subject of once more
going to the hut, or of turning aside to pursue some other
object. Susquesus made a close examination at this spot,
and gave it as his opinion, again, that the hostiles must, at
least, number the dozen he had already mentioned. Leaving
us to watch the signs about our dwelling, from covers we
took for that purpose, he followed the trail for half a mile,
in order to make certain it did not approach the log-house
on its opposite side. So far from this proving to be the
case, however, he ascertained that it led off in a straight
line towards Ravensnest. This was, if anything, more
unpleasant
news to Guert and myself, than if the Onondago
had brought back a confirmation of his first suspicion that
the Hurons might be waiting for us, in our own temporary
house. Complaints were useless, however, and we
smothered
our apprehensions as well as we could.
Susquesus was not a warrior to confide entirely in the
signs of an open march. Experienced woodsmen frequently
left their trails visible expressly to deceive; and the
Onondago
,
who personally knew Muss, as Jaap called his
prisoner
,
was fully aware that he had to deal with a profoundly
artful foe. Not satisfied with even what he had seen, he
cautioned us about quitting the cover, except under his
guidance, and then commenced a mode of approach that
was purely Indian, and which, in its way, had much of the
merit of the approaches of more civilized besiegers, by
means of their entrenchments and zig-zags. Our advance
was regulated in this way. Each man was told to select
the nearest tree that led him towards the hut, and to pass
from the old to the new cover, in as rapid and sudden a
manner as his agility would allow. By observing this
precaution
,
and by using great activity, we had got within
twenty yards of the door of the cabin, in the course of ten
minutes. Guert could not submit to this slow, and, as he
called it, unmanly procedure any longer; but quitting his
cover, he now walked straight and steadily to the door of
the cabin, threw it open, and announced to us that the place
was empty. Susquesus made another close examination
around the building, and told us he felt quite certain that
the spot had not been visited since we had left it that
morning
.
That was grateful intelligence to us all, since it was
the only probable clue by which our enemies could have
learned our return to the Patent at all.
The question now arose as to future proceedings.
Nothing
was to be gained by remaining on the property, while
prudence, and the danger of our friends, united to call us
away. We felt it would be a most hazardous thing to
attempt
reaching Ravensnest; though we felt it was a hazard
we were bound to incur. While the matter was talked over,
those among us who had any appetite, profited by the halt,
to dine. An Indian on a war-path, is equally ready to eat,
or to fast; his powers of endurance, both ways, more
especially
when the food is game, amounting to something
wonderful
.
While Susquesus, and Jaap, in particular, were performing
their parts in a very serious manner, in this way, and the
rest of us were picking up a few morsels, more like men
whose moral feelings checked their physical propensities, I
caught a distant glimpse of a man's form, as it glided among
the trees, at some distance from us. Surprise and awe were
so strong in me, that I did not speak, but pointed with a
finger eagerly in the necessary direction, in order to let the
Onondago see the same object too. Susquesus was not slow
in detecting the stranger, however; for I think he must have
seen him, even before he was descried by myself. Instead of
manifesting any emotion, however, the Onondago did not
even cease to eat; but merely nodded his head, and muttered,
Goodnow hear newsJumper come.
Sure enough, it was Jumper; and his appearance in the
flesh, not only alive, but unharmed, produced a general
shout among us as he came in, on such a long, loping gait,
as usually marked a runner's movement. In a moment he
was among us, calm, collected, and without motion. He
gave no salutation, but seated himself quietly on a log,
waiting to be questioned, before he spoke; impatience being
a womanly weakness.
Jumper, my honest fellow, cried Guert, not without
emotion, for joy was struggling powerfully with his organs
of speech, you are heartily welcome! These devils
incarnate
,
the Hurons, have not injured
you
, at least!
Liquor had rendered Jumper's faculties somewhat obtuse,
in general, though he was now perfectly sober. He gave a
sort of dull look of recognition at the speaker, and muttered
his answer in a low, sluggish tone:
Plenty Huron, he said; clearin' full. Pale-face in
fort send Jumper with message.
We should have overwhelmed the fellow with questions,
had he not unfolded a corner of his calico shirt, and
exhibited
several letters, each of which was soon in the hand of
the individual to whom it was addressed. Guert, Dirck,
and myself, severally got his communication; while there
was a fourth, in the handwriting of Herman Mordaunt, that
bore the superscription of poor Traverse's name.
Subsequent
events have placed it in my power to give copies of all
the letters, thus received. My own was in the following
words:
My dearest father is so much occupied, as to desire
me
to write you this note. Mr. Bulstrode sent an express,
yesterday
,
who was bearer of the sad tidings from Tieonderoga.
He also announced his own approach; and we expect him,
in a horse-litter, this evening. Reports are flying about the
settlement, that savages have been seen in our own woods.
I endeavour to hope that this is only one of those idle
rumours
,
of which we have had so many, lately. My father,
however, is taking all necessary precautions, and he desires
me
to urge on
you
the necessity of collecting all your party,
should you be again at Mooseridge, and of joining us
without
delay
. We have heard of your safety, and gallant conduct,
through the man sent forward by Mr. Bulstrode; his master
having heard of you all, safe in a canoe on the lake, the
night after the battle, through a Mr. Lee; a gentleman of
great eccentricity of character, though, it is said, of much
talent, with whom papa happens to be acquainted. I trust
this note will find you at your hut, and that we shall see
you all, with the least possible delay.
Anneke.
This, certainly, was not a note to appease the longings
of a lover; though I had infinite gratification in seeing the
pretty characters that had been traced by Anne Mordaunt's
hand, and of kissing the page over which that hand must have
passed. But, there was a postscript, the part of a letter in
which a woman is said always to give the clearest insight
into her true thoughts. It was in these words, viz.:
I see that I have underscored the `me,' where I speak
of papa's desire that
I
should write to you, in preference to
another. We have gone through one dreadful scene, in
company, and, I confess, Corny, I should feel far happier,
if another is to occur, that
you
, and
yours
, should be with
us, here, behind the defences of this house, than exposed, as
you otherwise might be, in the forest. Come to us, then, I
repeat, with the least possible delay.
This postscript afforded me far more satisfaction than the
body of the note; and I was quite as ready to comply with
Anneke's request, as the dear girl, herself, could be to urge
it. Guert's letter was as follows:
Mr. Mordaunt has commanded Anneke and myself to
write to those of your party, with whom he fancies each has
the most influence, to urge you to come to Ravensnest, as
speedily as possible. We have received most melancholy
news; and a panic prevails among the poor people of this
settlement. We learn that Mr. Bulstrode, accompanied by
Mr. Worden, is within a few hours' journey of us, and the
families of the vicinity are coming to us, frightened and
weeping. I do not know that I feel much alarmed, myself;
my great dependence is on a merciful Providence; but, the
dread Being on whom I rely, works through human agents;
and, I know of none in whom I can place more confidence,
than on Guert Ten Eyck.
Mary Wallace.
By St. Nicholas! Corny, these are such summonses as
a man never hesitates about obeying, cried Guert, rising,
and beginning to replace his knapsack. By using great
diligence, we may reach the Nest, yet, before the family
goes to bed, and make not only them, but ourselves, so much
the more comfortable and secure.
Guert had a willing auditor, in me; nor was Dirck at all
backward about complying. The letters certainly much
quickened our impulses; though, in fact, there remained
nothing else to do; unless, indeed, we intended to lie out,
exposed to all the risks of a vindictive and savage warfare.
Dirck's letter was from Herman Mordaunt; and it told the
truth in plainer language than it had been related by either
of the ladies. Here it is.
Dear Dirck
,The savages are certainly approaching
us, my young kinsman; and it is for the good of us all to
unite our forces. Come in, for God's sake, with your
whole party, as speedily as possible. I have had scouts out,
and they have all come in with reports that the signs of
trails, in the forest, abound. I expect, at least a hundred
warriors will be upon us, by to-morrow, and am making
my preparations accordingly. In approaching the Nest, I
would advise you to enter the ravine north of the house, and
to keep within its cover until you get to its southern
termination
.
This will bring you within a hundred rods of the
gate, and greatly increase your chances of entering, should
we happen to be invested when you get here. God bless
you, dear Dirck, and guide you all safely to your friends.
Herman Mordaunt.
Ravensnest, July 11th, 1758.
Guert and I read this letter hastily, before we commenced
our march. Then, abandoning the hut, and all it contained,
to the mercy of any who might pass that way, we set off
for our point of destination, on a quick step, carrying little
besides our arms, ammunition, and the food that was
necessary
to assure our strength.
As before, Trackless led, keeping the Jumper a little on
his flank; the danger of encountering foes being now
considered
to be greatly increased. It was true, we were still
in the rear of the party that had committed the deeds at
Mooseridge; but the Onondago no longer followed its trail;
pursuing a different course, or one that led directly to his
object.
CHAPTER XII.
My father had a daughter lov'd a man,
As it might be perhaps, were I a woman,
I should your lordship.
Viola
.
As
the reader must, by this time, have a pretty accurate
idea of our manner of marching in the wilderness, I shall
not dwell on this part of our proceedings any longer. On
we went, and at a rapid rate, the guide having abandoned
the common route, which had got to be a pretty visible trail,
and taking another on which, as it appeared to me, he had
no other clue than an instinct. Guert had told Susquesus
of the ravine, and how desirable it was to reach it, getting
for an answer a quiet nod of the head, and a low
ejaculation
.
It was understood, however, that we were to approach
Herman Mordaunt's fortress, by that avenue.
It was past the turn of the day when we quitted
Mooseridge
,
and none of us hoped to reach Ravensnest before
dark. It fell out, as we expected, night drawing its veil
over the scene, about half an hour before the Trackless
plunged into the northern, or forest-end of the ravine. Thus
far, we had got no evidence whatever of the proximity of
foes. Our march had been silent, rapid, and watchful, but
it proved to be perfectly undisturbed. We knew, however,
that the critical portion of it was still before us; and just as
the sun set, we had made a halt, in order to look to our
arms. It may now be well to say a word or two on the
subject of the position of Herman Mordaunt's `garrison,' as
well as of the adjacent settlement. I call Ravensnest the
`garrison,' for that is the word which New York custom has
long applied to the fortress itself, as well as those who
defend
it. Some critics pretend there is authority to justify
the practice, and I see by the dictionaries that they are not
entirely in the wrong.
The Nest stood quite half a mile from the nearest point
of the forest, a belt of trees that fringed the margin, and
which filled the cavity of the ravine, excepted. Near it,
and in plain sight, was the heart of the settlement itself,
which extended, in an east and west direction, fully four
miles. This area, however, was cleared only in a
settlement
fashion; having patches of virgin forest scattered
pretty profusely over its surface. The mill-lot, as Jason's
purchase was termed, lay at the most distant extremity of
the view, but, as yet, the axe had not been applied to it. I
had remarked in my last visit to the place, that, standing
before Herman Mordaunt's door, something like a dozen
log cabins were to be seen at a time in different parts of the
settlement, and that this number might have been increased
to twenty, by varying the observer's position.
Of course, the whole of the open space was more or less
disfigured by stumps, dead and girdled trees, charred stubs,
log-heaps, brush, and all the other unseemly
accompaniments
of the first eight or ten years of the existence of a
new settlement. This period, in the history of a country,
may be likened to the hobbledehoy condition in ourselves,
when we have lost the graces of childhood, without having
attained the finished forms of men.
Herman Mordaunt's settlement would have been thought
a strong country, in one sense, for a field fight, had there
been men enough to contend with a hostile party of any
force. But, I had heard him say that he had but about
seventeen rifles and muskets that could be in the least relied
on, inasmuch as some of his people were Europeans, and
had no knowledge of fire-arms, while experience had shown
that others, on the occurrence of an alarm, invariably fled
to the woods, with their families, instead of rallying around
the settlement colours. Such delinquencies usually take
place, I believe, on all emergencies; love of life being even
a stronger instinct than love of property. Here and there
a sturdy fellow, however, would bar himself in, with a
determination
to go for the whole, under his own bark roof;
and, occasionally, defences were made that would do credit
to a hero.
It should be apparent to those who have any accurate
notion of savage warfare, that the ravine, being, as it was,
the only wooded spot near Herman Mordaunt's fortress,
would be the place of all others most likely to contain an
enemy who made his approaches against a garrison, by
means of natural facilities alone. We were aware of this;
and Guert, who took an active command among us, as we
drew near to danger, issued his commands for every man to be
on the alert, in order that there might be no confusion. We
were instructed as to the manner of proceeding the moment
an alarm was given; and Guert, who was a capital mimic,
had previously taught us several calls and rallying signals,
all of which were good imitations of the cries of different
tenants of the woods, principally birds. These signals had
their origin with the red-man, who often resorted to them,
and were said to be more successfully practised by our own
hunters and riflemen than even by those with whom they
originated.
On entering the ravine, the order of our march was
changed. While Susquesus and Jumper were still kept in
advance, Guert, Dirck, Jaap and myself moved abreast, and
quite close together. The density of the foliage, and the
deep obscurity that prevailed in the bottom of this dell-like
hollow, rendered this precaution necessary. It soon became
so dark, indeed, that our only guide was the brook that
Vol. II.  15
gurgled along the bottom of the ravine, and which we knew
issued into the open ground at its termination, to join a small
river that meandered through some natural meadows to the
westward of the Nest, but which, in the language of the
country, was called a `creek.' This abuse of good old
English words, I am sorry to say, is getting to be only too
common among us; yet, I have heard Americans boast that
we speak the language better than the mother country! That
we have no class among us that uses an unintelligible
dialect
,
like that of Lancashire or Yorkshire, is true enough;
and, that we have fewer persons who use decided vulgarisms,
in the way of false grammar, than is the case in England,
may be also accurate; but, it might be well for us to correct
a great many faults into which we have certainly fallen,
before
we declaim with so much confidence about the purity
of our English.
[12]
[12]
It is
northern
American, to call a small `lake' a `pond,' a small
`river' a `creek,' even though it should be an `outlet,' instead of an
`inlet,' &c. &c. It is a more difficult thing than is commonly
supposed
,
to make two great nations, each of which is disposed to
innovate, speak the same language with precise uniformity. The
Manhattanese, who have probably fewer of the peculiarities of the
inhabitants of a capital than the population of any other town in the
world of four hundred thousand souls, the consequences of a rapid
growth, and of a people who have come principally from the country,
are much addicted to introducing new significations for words, which
arise from their own provincial habits. In Manhattanese parlance,
for instance, a `square' is a `park,' or, even a `garden' is a `park.'
A promenade, on the water, is a `battery!' It is a pity that, in this
humour for change, they have not thought of altering the complex
and imitative name of their town.
Editor
.
To return to the ravine.
We had gone so far in the hollow, dark dell, as to have
reached a point where the faint light of the open ground
and the stars in the firmament became visible to us, when
we suddenly found ourselves alongside of the Trackless
and Jumper. These Indians had halted; for their quick,
jealous, eagle-like glances had detected the signs of enemies.
Nor was this discovery very difficult to make, though some
pains had actually been taken to conceal what was going
on in our front. A party of some forty savages, every man
of whom was in his war-paint, had lighted a fire beneath a
shelving rock, and were gathered around it at supper. The
fire had already done its duty, and was now merely
smouldering
,
throwing a faint, flickering light on the dark, fierce
features of the group that was clustered round. We might
have approached the spot in any other direction, without
seeing the danger in time to avoid it; but a kind Providence
had carried the two Indians directly to a point where the
dying embers immediately caught their attention, and where
they halted as has been said. I do not think we were more
than forty yards from this fearful band of savages, when
they first met my eye; and, hardened as I had certainly
somewhat become, by the service and scenes I had so lately
gone through, I will confess that my blood was a little chilled
at the sight.
Our conference was in whispers. There we stood, huddled
together beneath a huge oak, the shade of which rendered
the darkness that formed our only safeguard, so much the
more intense. So close were we, in fact, that even Jaap's
body was in absolute contact with my own. Susquesus
proposed making a
detour
, by crossing the brook, which,
fortunately, tumbled down some rocks at this point, making
a very favourable noise, and thus pass our enemies, who
would not probably end their meal until we had time to
reach the `garrison.' To this Guert applied his veto. He
was of opinion, and I have always thought it was the
decision
of a man born to be a soldier, that we were exactly in
the position we might desire to occupy, in order to be of
great service to the family, and to strike the enemy with a
panic. By attacking, we should certainly surprise the party
in our front, and might make such an impression as would
induce them to abandon the settlement. Both Dirck and
myself coincided in this opinion, which even received the
support of Jaap's voice.
Yes, sah!  yes, Masser Corny, now 'e time to
wengeance
poor Pete! he muttered, and that rather louder than
was thought quite prudent.
As soon as the Trackless found how things were going,
he and Jumper prepared for the conflict, as coolly as any
of us. Our arrangements were very simple, and were soon
made. We were to deliver a single fire from the spot where
we stood, shout, and charge with the knife and tomahawk.
No time was to be wasted, however; and, instead of
remaining
near the light, small as it was, we were to push for the
mouth of the ravine, and thence make the best of our way,
singly or in company, as chance should offer, to the gate
of Ravensnest. In a moment we were in open files, and
had our orders.
Remember Traverse! said Guert, sternly
remember
poor Sam, and all our murteret frients!
The reader knows that Guert was apt to be very Dutch,
when much excited. We
did
remember the dead; and I
have often thought, but never knew precisely, that each of
us sacrificed a victim to the manes of our lost companions,
on that stern occasion. Our rifles rang, or cracked would
be the better word, almost simultaneously; a yell arose from
the savages around the fire; our own shouts mingled with
that yell, and forward we went, endeavouring to make our
numbers appear as if we were a hundred.
One retains but very indistinct notions of a charge like
that, made as it was, in the dark, beyond its general
characteristics
.
We swept directly among the slain and
wounded, and I heard Jaap dealing one or two awful blows
on the bodies; but no one opposed us. A moment after we
had passed the smouldering fire, three or four shot were
discharged at us, but there was no sign of their telling on
any of our party. The distance from the fire to the mouth
of the ravine, might have been a hundred yards; and the
external light, or lesser darkness may be a better expression,
served us for a guide. Thither we pushed, fast as we could,
though by no means in compact order.
For this part of the affair, I can only speak for myself.
I saw men moving swiftly among the trees, and I supposed
them to be my companions; but we had become separated,
it being understood that each man was now to shift for
himself
.
As our rifles were discharged, and there was no time
to reload them, there was little use, indeed, in any halt.
Perceiving this, I did not issue from the ravine at the brook,
but clinging more to its side, left it at a little height above
the level of the adjacent plain. Here I paused to load, the
cover being good, and the position every way favourable.
While thus employed, I found time to look around me, and
to ascertain the situation of things in the settlement, so far
as the hour and the obscurity would permit.
The plain was glimmering with the remains of a dozen
large fires, the ruins of so many log-houses and barns.
Their light amounted to no more than to render the darkness
of the night distinctly visible, and to afford some small clues
to the extent of the ravages that had been already committed.
The house of Ravensnest, however, was untouched. There
it stood, looking dark and gloomy; for, having no external
windows, no other light was to be seen than a single candle,
that was probably placed in a loophole as a signal.
Profound
stillness reigned in and around the building, producing
a species of mystery that was, in itself, under such
circumstances
,
an element of force. There was not light enough
to distinguish objects at any distance, and, having reloaded
my rifle, I thought it wisest to make the best of my way to
the gate. At that moment, the stillness in my rear seemed
to possess something affirmatively fearful about it.
It was certainly a somewhat hazardous thing to break
cover, at such a moment, and under such circumstances;
but it was absolutely necessary to incur its risks. My first
leap carried me half-way down the declivity, and I was soon
on the level land. In my front were two men, one of whom
seemed to me to be in the grasp of the other. As they were
moving, though slowly, in the direction of the house, I
ventured
to ask `Who goes there?'
Oh, Corny, my lad, is that you? answered Guert.
Got be praised! you seem unhurt, and are just in time to
help me along with this Huron, on whom I blundered in the
dark, and have disarmed and captured. Give him a kick
or a push, if you please; for the fellow holds back like a
hog.
I had too much knowledge of Indian vindictiveness,
however
,
to adopt the means recommended; but seizing the
captive by one arm, while Guert held the other, we ran him
up to the
abbatis
that covered the gate of the garrison,
with very little difficulty. Here we found Herman Mordaunt
and a dozen of his people, all armed, ready to receive us.
They were in expectation of our appearance, both on account
of the hour, and on account of the clamour in the ravine,
which had been distinctly heard at the house. In less than
a minute everybody was in, safe and unharmed. The fact
was, that our attack had been so sudden as to sweep
everything
before it, and the enemy had not time to recover from
15 *
his panic, before we were all snugly housed. Once within
the gate of Ravensnest we ran no risks, beyond those which
were common to all such log fortresses in the warfare of the
wilderness.
It would not be easy for a pen as unskilful as mine, to
portray the change, from the gloom of the ravine, the short
but bloody assault, the shouts, the rush, and the retreat, of
the outer world, to the scene of domestic security we found
within the Nest, embellished, as was the last, by woman's
loveliness and graces, and, in many respects, by woman's
elegance. Anneke and her friend received us in a bright,
cheerful, comfortable apartment, that was rendered so much
the more attractive by their tears and their smiles, neither of
which were spared. I could see that both had been
dreadfully
agitated; but joy restored their colour, and brought
back the smiles to their sweet faces. The situation of the
place was such, perhaps, as to render cheerfulness neither
very lasting nor very lively; but the tenderest female can
find her heart suddenly so lightened from its burthen of
apprehensions, as to be able to seem momentarily happy,
even when environed by the horrors of war. Such, in a
measure, was the character of the reception we now received,
together with a thousand thanks for having so promptly
answered their letters in person. The dear creatures had
the ingenuity not to seem to ascribe that prompt obedience
to their own requests, which we had manifested, to any care
for ourselves, but solely to a wish to oblige and protect them.
The reader will understand that all explanations still remained
to be made, on both sides. These soon came, however;
facts pressing themselves on the attention, at such times,
with a weight that is irresistible. The ice was broken by
Herman Mordaunt's entering the room, and speaking to us,
like one who felt that a great omission had been made.
We had closed the gate, and set the look-out at the
loops again, he said, before I ascertained that all your
party is not here. I see nothing of Traverse and his chainbearers, nor of Sam or Tom, your hunters! Surely, they
are not left behind in the forest?
Neither of us three spoke. Our looks must have told the
sad story, for Herman Mordaunt seemed to understand us
on the instant.
No! he exclaimed  Can it be possible? Not
all
,
surely!
All
, Mr. Mordaunt, even to my poor slave, Petrus,
answered Guert, solemnly. They were set upon, while
dispersed, I suppose, and have been murdered, while we were
still absent, on our expedition.
The dear girls clasped their hands, and I thought Anneke's
pallid lips moved, as if in prayer. Her father shook his
head, and for some time he paced the room in silence. Then
rousing himself, like one conscious of the necessity of
calmness and exertion, he resumed the discourse.
Thank God, Mr. Bulstrode reached us safely last
evening
,
just after we despatched the runner; and
he
is beyond
the reach of these demons for the present!
After this we were enabled to converse more connectedly,
exchanging such statements as enabled each party to
understand
the precise condition of the other. We were then
carried to Bulstrode's room, for he had expressed a desire to
see us, as soon as we could be spared. Our
fellow-campaigner
received us in good spirits, for one in his situation,
speaking of the events in front of Ticonderoga sensibly,
and without any attempt to conceal the mortification that he
felt, in common with the whole British empire. His hurt
was by no means a bad one; likely to cripple him for a few
weeks, but the leg was in no danger.
I have had the resolution and address, Corny, to work
my way into good quarters, this unexpected siege excepted,
he observed to me, when the others had withdrawn, leaving
us alone. This rivalry of ours is a generous one, and
may now have fair play. If we quit this Nest of Herman
Mordaunt's without ascertaining the true state of Anneke's
feelings, we shall deserve to be condemned to celibacy for
the remainder of our days. There never were two such
opportunities for wooing to advantage!
I confess our situation does not strike me as being quite
as favourable, Mr. Bulstrode, I answered. Anneke must
have too many apprehensions on her own account, and on
account of others, to be as sensible to the tender sentiments
of love, as might be the case in the peace and security of
Lilacsbush.
Ah! It is very evident you know nothing of the female
sex, Corny, by that remark. I will grant you, that
unwooed
previously, and without any foundation laid, if I may
express myself so irreverently, your theory might turn out
to be true; but not so under actual circumstances. Here is
a young lady in her nineteenth year, who knows she is not
only sought, but has long been sought, ay warmly, ardently
sought, by two reasonably unobjectionable young men, placed
in the very situation to have all her sensibilities excited, by
one or the other, and, depend on it, the matter will be
determined
within this blessed week. If I should prove to be the
fortunate man, I hope to be able to manifest a generous
sympathy
;
and,
vice vers
, I shall expect the same. Though
this sad, sad business before Ty has been a good
preparative
for humiliation.
I could not avoid smiling at Bulstrode's singular views
of our suit; but, as Anneke was ever with me an
engrossing
theme, spite of our situation, which certainly was not
particularly appropriate to love, I did not feel equal to
quitting
it abruptly. The matter was consequently pursued.
As I asked Bulstrode to explain himself, I got from him the
following account of his theory.
Why, I reason in this wise, Corny. Anneke loves
one
of us two, beyond all question. That she
loves
, I will
swear; her blushes, her beaming eyes, even her beauty is
replete with the loveliness of the sentiment. Now, it is not
possible that she should love any other person than one of
us two, for the simple reason that she has no other suitor.
I shall be frank with you, and confess that I think I am the
fevoured fellow, while, I dare say, you are just as sanguine
and think it is yourself.
I give you my honour, Major Bulstrode, so presuming,
so improper a thought has never
Yes, yesI understand all that. You are not worthy
of Anne Mordaunt's love, and therefore have never
presumed
to imagine that she could bestow it on such a poor,
miserable, worthless, good-for-nothing a fellow as yourself.
I have a great deal of the same very proper feeling; but, at
the same time, each of us is quite confident of his own
success
,
or he would have given up the pursuit long since.
I do assure you, Bulstrode, anything but confidence
mingles with
my
feelings on this subject.
You
may have
reasons for your own security, but I can boast of none.
I have no other than self-love, of which every man has
a just portion for his own comfort and peace of mind. I
say that hope is indispensable to love, and hope is allied to
confidence. My reasoning on these points is very simple.
And, now for the peculiar advantages we enjoy for bringing
matters to a crisis. In the first place, I am hurt, you will
understand; suffering under an honourable wound, received
in open battle, fighting for king and country. Then, I
have been brought fresh from the field, on my litter, into
the presence of my mistress, bearing on my person the
evidence
of my risk, and, I hope, of my good conduct. There
is not one woman in a thousand, if she hesitated between
us, that would not decide in my favour, on these grounds
alone. You have no notion, Corny, how the hearts of these
sweet, gentle, devoted, generous little American girls melt to
sympathy, and the sufferings of a poor wretch that they
know adores them! Make a nurse of a female, and she is
yours, nine times out of ten. This has been a master-stroke
of mine, but I hope you will pardon it. Stratagems are
excusable in love, as in war.
I have no difficulty in understanding your policy,
Bulstrode
;
though I confess to some in understanding your
frankness. Such as it is, however, I trust you feel certain
it will not be abused. Now, as to my situation, what
peculiar
countervailing advantages do I enjoy?
Those of a defender. Oh,
that
is a battering-ram of
itself! This confounded assault on the settlement, which
they tell me is rather serious, and may keep alive
apprehensions
for some days yet, is a most unlucky thing for me,
while it is of great advantage to you. A wounded man
cannot excite one-half the interest he otherwise might, when
there is a chance that others may be slain, every minute.
Then, the character of a defender is a great deal; and
being a generous rival, as I have always told you, Corny,
my advice is to make the most of it. I conceal nothing,
and intend to do all I can with my wound.
It was scarcely possible not to laugh at this strangely
frank, yet, I fully believe, strangely sincere communication;
for Bulstrode was a humorist, with all his conventionalism
and London notions, and was more addicted to saying
precisely
what he thought, than is common with men of his
class. After sitting and chatting with him half an hour
longer, on the subject of the late military operations, of
which he spoke with both feeling and good sense, I took my
leave for the night.
God bless you, Corny, he said, squeezing my hand,
as I left him; improve the opportunity in your own way,
for I assure you I shall do it in mine. It is present valour
against past valour. If it were not my own case that is
concerned, there is not a man living to whom I should more
freely wish success.
And I believe Bulstrode did not exceed the truth in his
declarations. That I should succeed with Anneke, he did
not think, as was apparent to me by his general manner,
and the consciousness he must have possessed of his own
advantages in the way of rank and fortune, as well as in
having Herman Mordaunt's good wishes. Oddly enough, in
quitting my rival, and under circumstances so very peculiar, I
was accidentally thrown into the presence of my mistress, and
that, too, alone! Anneke was the sole occupant of the little
room in which the girls habitually staid, when I returned to
it; Guert having managed to induce Mary Wallace to walk
with him in the court, the only place the ladies now
possessed
for exercise; while Herman Mordaunt, Mr. Worden,
and Dirck, were together in the public-room, making some
arrangement with the confused body of the settlers, who had
crowded into the Nest, for the night-watch. I shall not stop
to express the delight I felt at finding Anneke there; nor was
it in any degree diminished, as I met the soft expression of
her sweet eyes, and saw the blushes that suffused her cheek.
The conversation I had just held, doubtless, had its effect;
for I determined, at once, that so favourable an occasion for
pressing my suit should not be lost. I was goaded on, if the
truth must be told, by apprehension of Bulstrode's wound.
What I said precisely, in the commencement of that
interview
,
is more than I could record, did I think it would
redound to my advantage, as I fear it would not; but I made
myself understood, which is more, I fancy, than happens to
all lovers in such scenes. At first I was confesed and a
little incoherent, I suspect; but feeling so far got the better
of these defects, as to enable me to utter what I wished to
express. Towards the end, if I spoke in the least as warmly
and distinctly as I felt, there must have been some slight
touch of eloquence about my manner and language. This
being the first occasion, too, on which I had ever had an
opportunity of urging my suit very directly, there was so
much to be said, so many things to be explained, and so
many seemingly slighted occasions to account for, that
Anneke
had little else to do, for the first ten minutes, but to listen.
I have always ascribed the self-possession which my
companion
was enabled to command during the remainder of
this interview, to the time that was thus accorded her to rally
her thoughts.
Dear, precious Anneke! How admirably did she behave
that memorable night! It was certainly an extraordinary
situation in which to speak of love; yet, I much question
if the feelings be not more likely to be true and natural at
such times, than when circumstances admit of more of the
expedients of every-day life. I could see that my sweet
listener was touched, from the moment I commenced, and
that her countenance betrayed a tender interest in what I
said. Presuming on this, or encouraged by her blushes and
her downcast eyes, I ventured to take a hand, and perceived I
was not repulsed. Then it was that I found words, that
actually brought tears to my companion's eyes, and Anneke
was enabled to answer me.
This is so unusual  so extraordinary a time to speak
of such things, Corny, she said, that I hardly know what
ought to be my reply. Of one thing, however, I feel
certain
;
persons surrounded as we are by dangers that may,
at any instant, involve our destruction, have an unusual
demand
on them for sincerity. Affection, I hope, I am never
much addicted to, and prudery I know
you
would condemn.
I have a feeling uppermost, at this instant, that I wish to
express, yet scarce know how
Do not suppress it, beloved Anneke; be as generous as
I am certain you are sincere.
Corny, it is this. I know we are in danger  very
great danger of being overcome; captured, perhaps slain,
by the ruthless beings who are prowling around our
dwelling
,
and that no one in this house can count on a single day
of existence even with the ordinary vain security of man.
Now, should anything befall
you
, after this, and I survive
you, I should survive for the remainder of my days to mourn
your loss, and to feel the keenest regrets that I had hesitated
to own how much interest I have long felt in you, and how
happy I have been with the consciousness of the preference
that you so frankly and honestly avowed in my favour,
months ago.
As the tears, as well as blushes of Anneke, accompanied
these admissions, it was not possible for me to doubt what I
heard. From that moment, a world of confidence, and a
flow of pure, sweet, strong, natural feeling, bound us more
and more closely together. Guert was in a happy mood to
detain Mary Wallace, and business greatly befriended me,
as respected the others. More than an hour had I Anne
Mordaunt all to myself; and when the heart is open, how
much can be uttered and understood, on such a subject as
love, in an hour of unreserved confidence, and of strong
feeling! Anneke admitted to me, before we separated, that
she had often thought of the chivalrous boy, who had
volunteered
to do battle in her behalf, when she was little more
than a child herself, and thought of him as a
generous-minded
girl would be apt to think of a lad, under the
circumstances
.
This very early preference had been much
quickened and increased by the affair of the lion, and our
subsequent intercourse. Bulstrode, that formidable,
encouraged
rival, encouraged by her father if not by herself, had
never interested her in the least, beyond the feeling natural
to the affinity of blood; and I might have spared myself
many hours of anxious concern, on his account, could I
only have seen what was now so unreservedly told to me.
Poor Bulstrode! a feeling of commiseration came over me,
as I listened to my companion's assurances that he had
never in the least touched her heart, while, at the same time,
blushing very red, she confessed my own power over it.
An expression to this effect even escaped her aloud
Have no concern on Mr. Bulstrode's account, Corny,
Anneke answered, smiling archly, like one who had well
weighed the pros and cons of the whole subject, in her own
mind; he may be a little mortified, but his fancy will soon
be forgotten in rejoicing that he had not yielded to a passing
inclination, and connected himself with a young,
inexperienced
American girl, who is hardly suited to move in the
circles in which his wife must live  I do believe Mr.
Bulstrode
prefers me, just now, to any other female he may
happen to know; but his attachment, if it deserve the name,
has not the heart in it, dear Corny, that I know is to be
found in your's. We women are said to be quick in
discovering
when we are really loved, and I confess that my
own little experience inclines me to believe that the remark
does us no more than justice.
I then spoke of Guert, and expressed a hope that his
sincere
,
obvious, manly devotion, might finally touch her heart,
and that my new friend, towards whom, however, I began
already to feel as towards an old friend, might finally meet
with a return for a passion that I was persuaded was as
deep and as sincere as my own; a comparison that I felt
was as strong as any I could make in Guert's behalf.
On this subject, you are not to expect me to say much,
Corny, answered Anneke, smiling. Every woman is the
mistress of her own secrets on such a subject; and, did I
know fully Mary Wallace's mind or wishes in reference to
Mr. Ten Eyck, as I do not profess to know either, I should
not feel at liberty to betray her, even to you. I have no
longer any secret of my own, as respects Corny Littlepage,
but must not be expected to be as weak in betraying my
whole sex, as I have been in betraying myself!
I was obliged to be satisfied with this sweet admission,
and with the knowledge that I had been long loved. When
Anneke left me, which, at the expiration of more than an
hour, she insisted on doing, under the consciousness of all
that had passed between us, I had a good deal of difficulty
in believing that I was not dreaming. This
ecclaircissement
was so sudden, so totally unexpected I fancy to us both,
that well might it so seem to either; yet, I fancy we did not
part without a deep conviction that both were happier than
when we met. I solemnly declare, notwithstanding, that I felt
sorrow, almost regret, on behalf of Bulstrode. The poor
fellow had been so evidently confident of success, only an
hour or two before, that I could not have acquainted him
with my own success, had he been up, and able to prefer
Vol. II.  16
his own suit; in his actual situation, such a procedure would
have appeared brutal.
As for Guert Ten Eyck, he rejoined me sadder and more
despairing than ever.
It struck me, Corny, that if Mary Wallace had the
smallest inclination in my behalf, she would manifest it at a
moment when we may all be said to be hanging between life
and deat'. I have often heard it said that the woman who
would trifle with a young fellow at a ball, or on a
sleigh-ride
,
and use him like a dog, while every one was laughing
and making merry, would come round like one of the
weather-cocks
on our Dutch barns, at a shift of the wind, the
instant that distress or unhappiness alighted on her suitor.
In other worts, that the very girl who would be capricious
and uncertain, in happiness and prosperity, would suddenly
become tender and truthful, as soon as sorrow touched the
man who wished to have her. On the strength of this, then,
I thought I would urge Mary, to the best of my poor
abilities
,
and you know they are no great matter, Corny, to give
me only a glimmering of hope; but without success. Not a
syllable more could I get out of her than that the time was
unseasonable to talk of such things; and I do think I should
be ready to go and meet these Huron devils, hand to hand,
were it not for the fact that the very girl who thus
remonstrated
,
staid with me quite two hours, listening to what I
had to say, though I spoke of nothing else. There was a
crumb of comfort in that, lad, or I do not understand human
nature.
There was, truly. Still, I could not but compare Anne
Mordaunt's generous confessions, under the influence of the
same facts, and fancy that the prospects of the
simpleminded
,
warm-hearted, manly young Albanian, were far less
flattering than my own.
CHAPTER XIII.
Between two worlds life hovers like a star,
'Twixt night and morn, upon the horizon's verge:
How little do we know that which we are!
How less what we may be! The eternal surge
Of time and tide rolls on, and bears afar
Our bubbles: as the old burst, new emerge,
Lashed from the foam of ages; while the graves
Of empires heave but like some passing wave.
Byron
.
It
was now announced by Herman Mordaunt in person,
that the watch was set for the night, and that each man
might seek his rest. The crowded state of the Nest was
such, as to render it no easy matter to find a place in which
to sleep, straw being our only beds. At length we found our
pallets, such as they were; and, spite of all that had passed
that evening, truth compels me to admit that I was soon in
a profound sleep. There was no exception to this rule
among the Mooseridge party, I believe, fatigue proving to
to be more powerful, than either successful love, unsuccessful
love, or personal apprehension.
It was about three o'clock, when I felt a significant
pressure
of the arm, such as one gives when he especially
wishes to attract attention. It was Jason Newcome,
employed
in awakening the men of the house, without giving
such an alarm as might reach the ears without. In a few
minutes everybody was up and armed.
As the morning, just before the appearance of light, when
sleep is heaviest, is the hour when savages usually attack, no
one was surprised at these preparations, which were
understood
to be ordered by Herman Mordaunt, who was afoot,
and on the look-out himself, at a place favourable to
observation
.
In the mean time, we men, three or four-and-twenty
in all, assembled in the court, in waiting for a summons to
the gate, or the loop. Jason had executed his trust so
dexterously
,
that neither female nor child knew anything of
our movement; all sleeping, or seeming to sleep in the
security
of a peaceful home. I took an occasion to
compliment
the ex-pedagogue and new miller, on the skill he had
shown; and we fell into a low discourse, in consequence.
I have been thinking that this warfare may put a new
face on these settlements, Corny, continued Jason, after
we had conversed some little time, more especially as to
the titles.
I cannot see how they are to be affected, Mr. Newcome,
unless the French should happen to conquer the colony, a
thing not very likely to happen.
That's just it; exactly what I mean, as to principle.
Have not these Hurons conquered this particular settlement?
I say they have. They are in possession of the whull of it,
this house excepted; and it appears to me that if we ever
get re-possession, it will be by another conquest. Now,
what I want to know is thisdoes not conquest give the
conquerors a right to the conquered territory? I have no
books here, yet; but I'm dreadful forgetful, or I
have
read
that such is the law.
I may say that this was the first direct demonstration that
Jason ever made on the property of Herman Mordaunt. Since
that time he has made many more, some of which I, or he who
may be called on to continue this narrative, will probably
relate; but I wish to record, here, this as the first in a long
series of attempts which Jason Newcome has practised, in
order to transfer the fee-simple of the mill-lot at
Ravensnest
,
from the ownership of those in whom it is vested by
law, to that of his own humble, but meritorious person.
I had little time to answer this very singular sort of
reasoning
;
for, just then, Herman Mordaunt appeared among us,
and gave us serious duty to perform. The explanations with
which his orders were proceded, were these. As had been
anticipated, the Indians had adopted the only means that
could prove effective against such a fortress as the Nest,
without the aid of artillery. They were making their
preparations
to set the building on fire, and had been busy all
night in collecting a large amount of pine-knots, roots, &c.,
which they had succeeded in piling against the outer logs,
at the point where one wing touched the cliff, and where the
formation of the ground enabled them to approach the
building
without incurring much risk. Their mode of proceeding
is worthy of being related. One of the boldest and most
skilful of their number had crept to the spot, and posted
himself so close to the logs as to be safe from observation,
as well as reasonably safe from shot. His associates had
then extended to him one end of a long pole, they standing
below, some on a shelf of the cliff, and the rest on the
ground; all being safe from harm so long as they kept close
to their respective covers. Thus disposed, these children of
the forest passed hours in patient toil, in forwarding by
means of a basket, the knots, and other combustibles, up to
the warrior, who kept his position close under the building,
and who piled them in the way most favourable to his object.
Susquesus had the merit of discovering the projected
attempt
,
the arrangements for which had completely escaped
the vigilance of the sentinels. It would seem that the
Onondago
,
aware of the artifices of the red-man, and acquainted
in particular with the personal character of Jaap's friend,
Muss, did not believe the night would go by without some
serious attempt on the house. The side of the cliff was
much the weakest point of the fortress, having no other
protection than the natural obstacles of the rocks, which
were not inaccessible, though somewhat difficult of ascent,
and the low picketing, already mentioned. Under such
circumstances, the Indian felt certain the assault would be
made on that side. Placing himself on watch, therefore, he
discovered the first attempts of the Hurons, but did not let
them be known to Herman Mordaunt, until they were
nearly completed; his reason for the delay being the
impatience
of the pale-faces, which would not have suffered the
enemy to accomplish his object, so far as preparations were
concerned; the thing of all others he himself thought to be
the most desirable. By allowing the Hurons to waste their
time and strength in making arrangements for an assault that
was foreseen, and which might be met and defeated, a great
advantage was obtained; whereas, by driving them
prematurely
from an artifice they were known to be engaged in,
they would have recourse to another, and the difficulty of
discovery would be added to our other disadvantages. So
Susquesus reasoned, as was said at the time; and it is
certain
that so he acted.
But, the time had come to meet these covert preparations.
Herman Mordaunt now held a consultation, on the subject
16 *
of our proceedings. The question submitted was, whether
we ought to let the Hurons go any further; whether we
should shoot the adventurous savage who was known still
to be posted under the logs of the house, and scatter his pile
of knots, by a sortie; or, whether it were wiser to let the
enemy proceed to the extremity of actually lighting his fire,
before we unmasked. Something was to be said in favour
of each plan. By shooting the savage who had made a
lodgment under our walls, and scattering his pile, we should
unquestionably defeat the present attempt; but, in all
probability
,
another would be made the succeeding night;
whereas, by waiting to the last moment, such an effectual
repulse might be given to our foes, as would at once
terminate
their expedition.
On consultation, and weighing all the points as they
offered, it was decided to adopt the latter policy. But one
spot commanded a view of the pile at all, and that was a
loop, that had been cut only the day before, and which
looked directly down on the place, from a projection that
existed in the second story, and which ran around the whole
building. These projections were common enough, in the
architecture of the provinces at that day, being often adopted
in exposed positions, purposely to afford the means of
protecting
the inferior and external portions of the dwellings.
The Nest possessed this advantage, though the loops
necessary
to complete the arrangement, had only quite recently
been cut. At this loop, then, I stationed myself, for a short
time, watching what was going on below. The night was
dark, but there was no difficulty in distinguishing the pile
of knots, which to me seemed several feet high, besides
being of some length, or in noting the movements of the
Indian who had built it. At the moment I took my stand
at the loop, this man was actually engaged in setting fire
to his combustibles.
For several minutes Guert and I watched our enemy
while he was thus employed, for the Huron was obliged to
proceed with the utmost caution, lest a light prematurely
shed around should betray him. He cautiously lighted his
knots quite within the pile, having left a place for that
purpose
;
and his combustibles were well in flames before the
latter began to throw their rays to any distance. We had a
quantity of water provided in the room from which we
beheld
all these movements, and might at any time have
extinguished
the fire, by pouring a stream through our loop,
provided we did not wait too long. But Guert objected to
`spoiling the sport,' as he called it, insisting that the logs
of the house would be slow to ignite, and that we might at
any moment scatter the knots, by a rapid sortie. His wish
was to let the enemy proceed in his designs, as far as would
be at all safe, in order to render his defeat more
overwhelming
.
Owing to our position, directly over his head, we had no
chance to see the face of the incendiary while he was thus
engaged. At length he cast a glance upward, as if to note
the effect of the flames, which were beginning to throw their
forked tongues above the pile, when we both recognised
Jaap's prisoner Muss. The sight proved too much for
Guert's philosophy, and thrusting the muzzle of his rifle
through the loop, he blazed away at him, without much
regard
to aim. This report was a sort of signal for action,
the whole house, and all the cuter world appearing to be in
a clamour in an instant. I had no means of seeing Muss,
but some of our look-outs, who had him in view most of the
time, told me, after all was over, that the fellow seemed
much astonished at the suddenness of this assault; that he
gazed up at the loop an instant, uttered a loud exclamation,
then yelled the war-whoop at the top of his voice, and went
bounding off into the darkness, like a buck put up
unexpectedly
from his lair. The fields all around the Nest
seemed to be alive with whooping demons. Herman
Mordaunt
had done little towards embellishing the place; and
stumps were standing in hundreds all about it, many having
been left within twenty yards of the buildings. It now
seemed as if every one of these stumps had an Indian
warrior
lodged behind it, while bands of them appeared to be
leaping about in the gloom, under the rocks. At one time,
I fancied we must be surrounded by hundreds of these
ruthless
foes, though I now suppose that their numbers were
magnified by their activity and their infernal yells. They
manifested no intention to attack, nevertheless, but kept
screaming around us in all directions, occasionally
discharging
a rifle, but, as a whole, waiting the moment when
the flames should have done their work.
Considering the fearful circumstances in which he was
placed, Herman Mordaunt was wonderfully collected. For
myself, I felt as if I had fifty lives to lose, Anneke being
uppermost in my thoughts. The females, however, behaved
uncommonly well; making no noise, and using all the
self-command
they could assume, in order not to distract the
exertions of their husbands and friends. Some of the wives
of the sturdy settlers, indeed, actually exhibited a species
of stern courage that would have done credit to soldiers;
appearing in the court, armed, and otherwise rendering
themselves useful. It often happened that women of this
class, by practising on deer, and wolves, and bears, got to
be reasonably expert with fire-arms, and did good service
in attacks on their dwellings. I remarked, in all the
commoner
class of females, that night, a sort of fierce hostility
to their savage foes, in whom they doubtless saw only the
murderers of children, and wretches who made no
distinction
of sex or age, in pursuing their heartless warfare.
Many of them appeared like the dams of the inferior
animals
when their young were in danger.
An interval of ten or fifteen minutes must have occurred
between the moment when Guert discharged his rifle and
that in which the battle really began. All this time the fire
was gathering head, our tardy attempts to extinguish it
proving a complete failure. But little apprehension was felt
on this account, however, the flames proving an advantage,
by casting their light far into the fields, and even below the
rocks, while they did not reach the court at all; thus placing
a portion of the enemy, should they venture to attack, under
a bright light, while it left us in darkness. The only point,
however, at which we could fear a serious assault, was on
the side of the rocks, where the court had no other
protection
than the low, but close and tolerably strong picket.
Fortunately, the formation of the ground on that side
prevented
one who stood on the meadows below from firing into
the court from any point within the ordinary range of the
rifle. It was this circumstance that had determined the site
of the garrison.
Such was the state of things when Anneke's own girl
came to ask me to go to her mistress, if it were possible for
me to quit my station, were it only for a minute. Having
no particular duty to perform, there was no impropriety in
complying with a request which, in itself, was every way so
grateful to my feelings. Guert was near me at the time,
and heard what the young negress said; this induced him to
inquire if there was no message for himself; but, even at
that serious moment, Mary Wallace did not relent. She
had been kinder than common in manner, the previous
night, as the Albanian had admitted; but, at the same time,
she had appeared to distrust her own resolution so much, as
even to give less direct encouragement than had actually
escaped her on previous occasions.
I found Anneke expecting me in that little parlour where
I had so recently listened to her sweet confessions of
tenderness
the evening before. She was alone, the instinct of her
sex teaching her the expediency of having no witness of the
feelings and language that might escape two hearts that
were united as were ours, under circumstances so trying.
The dear girl was pale as death when I entered; she had
doubtless been thinking of the approaching conflict, and of
what might be its frightful consequences; but, my presence
instantly caused her face to be suffused with blushes, it
being
impossible for her sensitive mind not to revert to what
had so lately occurred. This truth to the instinctive
principle
of her nature could hardly be extinguished in woman,
even at the stake itself. Notwithstanding the liveliness and
varying character of her feelings, Anneke was the first to
speak.
I have sent for you, Corny, she said, laying a hand on
her heart, as if to quiet its throbbings, to say one word in
the way of cautionI hope it is not wrong.
You
can
do nothing wrong, beloved Anneke, I
answered
;
or, nothing that would seem so in my eyes. Be
not thus agitated. Your fears have increased the danger,
which we consider as trifling. The risks Guert, Dirck, and
myself have already run, are tenfold those which now beset
us.
The dear girl submitted to have an arm of mine passed
around her waist, when her head dropped on my breast,
and she burst into tears. Enabled by this relief to command
her feelings a little, it was not long ere Anneke raised herself
from the endearing embrace I felt impelled to give her,
though still permitting me to hold both her hands; and she
looked up into my face, with the full confidence of affection,
renewing the discourse.
I could not suffer you to engage in this terrible scene,
Corny, she said, without one word, one look, one sign of
the interest I feel in you. My dear, dear father has heard
all; and, though disappointed, he does not disapprove. You
know how warmly he has wished Mr. Bulstrode for a son,
and can excuse that preference; but he desired me, not ten
minutes since, as he left me, after giving me a kiss and his
blessing, to send for you, and to say that he shall hereafter
look upon you as my and his choice. Heaven alone knows
whether we are to be permitted to meet again, dear Corny;
but, should that never be granted us, I feel it will relieve
your mind to know that we shall meet as the members of
one family.
We are the only children of our parents, Anneke, and
our union will gladden their hearts almost as much as it can
gladden our own.
I have thought of this, already. I shall have a mother,
now; a blessing I hardly ever knew!
And one that will dearly, dearly love you, as I know
by her own opinions, again and again expressed in my
presence
.
Thank you, Cornyand thanks to that respected parent,
too. Now, go, Corny; I am fearful this selfish gratification
only adds to the danger of the housego; I will pray for
your safety.
One word, dearest;poor Guert!You cannot know
how disappointed he is, that I alone should be summoned
here, at such a moment.
Anneke seemed thoughtful, and it struck me she was a
little distressed.
What can I do to alter this? she said, after a short
pause. A woman's judgment and her feelings may not
impel her the same way; then Mary Wallace is a girl who
appreciates propriety so highly!
I understand you, Anneke. But, Guert is of so noble
a disposition, and acknowledges all his defects so meekly,
and with so much candour! Man cannot love woman
better
than he loves Mary Wallace. Her extreme prudence is
a virtue, in his eyes, even while he suffers by it.
I cannot change Mary Wallace's nature, Corny, said
Anneke, smiling sadly, and, as I fancied, in a way that said
`were it I, the virtues of Guert should soon outweigh his
defects;' but Mary will be Mary, and we must submit.
Perhaps to-morrow may bring her wavering mind to
something
like decision; for these late events have proved greatly
Mr. Ten Eyck's friends. But Mary is an orphan, and
prudence
has been taught her as her great protection. Now,
go, Corny, lest you be missed.
The dear girl parted from me hurriedly, but not without
strong manifestation of feeling. I folded her to my heart;
that being no moment for affectations or conventional
distance
;
and I know
I
was, while I trusted Anneke might be,
none the less happy for remembering we had exchanged these
proofs of mutual attachment.
Just as I reached the court, I heard a yell without, which
my experience before Ty had taught me was the whoop the
Hurons give when they attack. A rattling fire succeeded,
and we were instantly engaged in a hot conflict. Our people
fought under one advantage, which more than
counterbalanced
the disadvantage of their inferiority in numbers.
While two sides of the buildings, including that of the
meadows, or the one on which an assault could alone be
successful, were in bright light, the court still remained
sufficiently dark to answer all the purposes of defence. We
could see each other, but could not be distinguished at any
distance. Our persons, when seen from without, must
have been confounded, too, with the waving shadows of the
pickets.
As I approached the pickets, through the openings of
which our people were already keeping up a dropping fire
on the dark-looking demons who were leaping about on the
meadows below, I learned from Herman Mordaunt, himself,
who received me by an affectionate squeeze of the hand,
that a large body of the enemy was collected directly under
the rocks, and that Guert had assumed the duty of
dislodging
them. He had taken with him, on this service, Dirck,
Jaap, and three or four more of the best men, including both
of our Indians. The manner in which he proposed to effect
this object was bold, and like the character of the leader of
the party. As so much depended on it, and on its success,
I will explain a few of its more essential details.
The front of the house ranged north and south, facing
westward. The two wings, consequently, extended east
and west. The fire had been built at the verge of the cliff,
and at the north-east angle of the building. This placed the
north and east sides of the square in light, while it left the
west and south in deep darkness. The gate opening to the
west, it was not a very hopeless thing to believe it
practicable
to lead a small party round the south-west angle of
the house, to the verge of the cliff, where the formation of
the ground would allow of a volley's being given upon those
savages who were believed to be making a lodgment directly
beneath our pickets, with a view of seizing a favourable
moment to scale them. On this errand, then, Herman
Mordaunt
now gave me to understand my friends had gone.
Who guards the gate, the while? I asked, almost
instinctively
.
Mr. Worden, and your old acquaintance and my new
tenant, Newcome. They are both armed, for a parson will
not only fight the battles of the spirit, but he will fight
those of the field, when concerned. Mr. Worden has shown
himself a man in all this business.
Without replying, I left Herman Mordaunt, and
proceeded
to the gate myself, since there was little to be done in the
court.
There
we were strong enough; stronger, perhaps,
than was necessary; but I greatly distrusted Guert's scheme,
the guard at the gate, and most of all the fire.
I was soon at Mr. Worden's side. There the reverend
gentleman was, sure enough, with Jason Newcome at his
elbow. Their duty was to keep the gate in that precise
condition
in which it could be barred, or unbarred, at the
shortest
notice, as friends or foes might seek admission. The
parties appeared to be fully aware of the importance of the
trust they filled, and I asked permission to pass out. My
first object was the fire, for it struck me Herman Mordaunt
felt too much confidence in his means of extinguishing it,
and that our security had been neglected in that quarter. I
was no sooner outside the buildings, therefore, than I turned
to steal along the wall to the northwest corner, where alone
I could get a view of the dangerous pile.
The brightness of the glare that was gleaming over the
fields and stumps, that came within the compass of the light
from the fire, added to my security by the contrast, though
it did not tell well for that particular source of danger. The
dark stumps, many of which were charred by the fires of
the clearing, and were absolutely black, seemed to be
dancing
about in the fields, under the waving light, and twice I
paused to meet imaginary savages ere I had gained the corner
of the house. Each alarm, however, was idle, and I
succeeded
in obtaining the desired view. Not only were the
knots burning fiercely, but a large sheet of flame was
clinging
to the logs of the house, menacing us with a speedy
conflagration. The danger would have been greater, but a
thunder-shower had passed over the settlement only an hour
before we were alarmed, and coming from the north, all
that side of the house had been well drenched with rain.
This occurred after `Muss' had commenced his pile, or he
might have chosen another side of the building. The deep
obscurity of that gust, however, was probably one of the
means of his success. He must have been at work during
the whole continuance of the storm.
I was not absent from the gate two minutes. That brief
space was sufficient for my first purpose. I now desired
Jason to enter the court, and to tell Herman Mordaunt not
to delay a moment in applying the means for extinguishing
the flames. There was greater danger from them than there
possibly could be from any other attack upon the pickets,
made in the darkness of the morning. Jason was cool by
temperament, and he was a good agent to be employed on
such a duty. Promising to be quick, he left us, and I
turned
my face towards Guert and his party. As yet, nothing
had been heard of the last. This very silence was a source
of alarm, though it was difficult to imagine the adventurer
had met with an enemy, since such a collision must have
been somewhat noisy. A few scattering shot, all of which
came from the west side of the buildings, and the flickering
light of the fire, were the only interruptions to the otherwise
death-like calm of the hour.
The same success attended me in reaching the south-west
Vol. II.  17
as in reaching the north-west angle of the house. To me,
it seemed as if the savages had entirely abandoned the fields
in my vicinity. When I took my stand at this corner of the
building, I found all its southern side in obscurity, though
sufficient light was gleaming over the meadows to render the
ragged edges of the cliff visible in that direction. I looked
along the log walls to this streak of light, but could see no
signs of my friends. I was certain they were not under the
house, and began to apprehend some serious indiscretion on
the part of the bold Albanian. While engaged in
endeavouring
to get a clue to Guert's movements, by devouring every
dark object I could perceive with my eyes, I felt an elbow
touched lightly, and saw a savage in his half-naked, fighting
attire, at my side. I could see enough to ascertain this, but
could not distinguish faces. I was feeling for my
hunting-knife
,
when the Trackless's voice stayed my hand.
He wrongsaid the Onondago, with emphasis. Head
too younghand goodheart goodhead very bad. Too
much firedark heremuch better.
This characteristic criticism on poor Guert's conduct,
served to tell the whole story. Guert had put himself in
a position in which the Onondago had refused to remain; in
other words, he had gone to the verge of the cliff, where he
was exposed to the light of the fire, and where he was
necessarily
in danger of being seen. Still, no signs of him
were visible, and I was on the point of moving along the
south side of the building, to the margin of the rocks, when
the Trackless again touched my arm, and said There!
There our party was, sure enough! It had managed to
reach the verge of the rocks at a salient point, which placed
them in an admirable position for raking the enemy, who
were supposed to be climbing to the pickets, with a view to
a sudden spring, but at a dangerous distance from the
buildings
.
The darkness had been the means of their reaching
that point, which was about a hundred yards from the spot
where I had expected to find them, and admirably placed
for the intended object. The whole procedure was so much
like Guert's character, that I could not but admire its
boldness
,
while I condemned its imprudence. There was,
however
,
no time to join the party, or to warn its leader of the
risks he ran. We, who stood so far in the rear, could see
and fully appreciate all the danger, while he probably did
not. There the whole party of them stood, plainly though
darkly drawn in high relief, against the light beyond, each
poising his rifle and making his dispositions for the volley.
Guert was nearest to the verge of the rocks, actually
bending
over them; Dirck was close at his side; Jaap just
behind
Dirck; Jumper close at Jaap's elbow; and four of the
settlers, bold and hardy men, behind the Oneida.
I could scarcely breathe, for painful expectation, when I
saw Guert and his companions thus rising from the earth,
bringing their entire figures in front of the back-ground of
light. I could have called out to warn them of the danger
they ran; but it would have done no good, nor was there
time for remonstrances. Guert must have felt he occupied a
dangerous position, and what he did was done very promptly.
Ten seconds after I saw the dark forms, all their rifles were
discharged, as it might be at a single crack. One instant
passed, in death-like stillness, through all the fields, and in
the court; then came a volley from among the stumps at a
little distance from our side of the building, and the
adventurers
on the rocks, or those that could, rushed towards the
gate. Two of the settlers, however, and the Oneida, I saw
fall, myself. The last actually leaped upward, into the air,
and went down the cliff. But Guert, Dirck, Jaap, and the
other two settlers, had moved away. It was at that moment
that my ears were filled with such yells as I had not
supposed
the human throat could raise, and all the fields on our
side of the house seemed alive with savages. To render the
scene more appalling, that was the precise instant when the
water, previously provided by Herman Mordaunt, fell upon
the flames, and the light vanished, almost as one
extinguishes
a candle. But for this providential coincidence,
there was scarce a chance for the escape of one of the
adventurers
.
As it was, rifle followed rifle, from among the
stumps, though it was no longer with any certain aim.
The battle had now become a
mle
. The savages went
leaping and whooping forward in the darkness, and heavy
blows were given and taken. Guert's clear, manly voice
was heard, rising above the clamour, encouraging his
companions
to press through the throng of their assailants, in
tones full of confidence. Both the Trackless and myself
discharged our rifles at the foremost of the Hurons, and
each certainly brought down his man; but it was not easy
to see what we could do next. To stand aloof and see my
friends borne down by numbers was impossible, however,
and Susquesus and myself fell upon the enemy's rear. This
charge of ours had the appearance of a sortie, and it
produced
a decided effect on the result, opening a passage by
which Dirck and the two settlers issued from the throng,
and joined us. This was no sooner done, than we all had
to stand at bay, retreating little by little, as we could. The
result would still have been doubtful, even after we had
succeeded
in reaching the south-western angle of the building,
had it not been for a forward movement on the part of
Herman
Mordaunt, at the head of half-a-dozen of his settlers.
This reinforcement came into the affair with loaded rifles,
and a single discharge, given as soon as we were in a line
with our friends, caused our assailants to vanish, as suddenly
as they had appeared. On reflecting on the circumstances
of that awful night, in after-life, I have thought that the
force in the rear of the Hurons began to melt away, even
before Herman Mordaunt's support was received, leaving
their front weak and unsustained. At any rate, the enemy
fled to their covers, as has just been related, and we entered
the gate in a body, closing and barring it, as soon as possible.
I can scarcely describe the change that had come over
the appearance of things in that eventful night. The fire
was extinguished, even to the embers, and deep darkness
had succeeded to the glimmering, waving red light of the
flames. The yells, and whoops, and screams, and shouts,
for our men had frequently thrown back the defiance of their
foes in cheers, were done; a stillness as profound as that of
the grave reigning over the whole place. The wounded
seemed ashamed even to groan; but our hurt, of whom
there were four, went into the house to be cared for, stern
and silent. No enemy was any longer to be apprehended
beneath the pickets, for the streak of morning was just
appearing
above the forest, in the east, and Indians rarely
attack under the light of day. In a word,
that
night, at
least, was passed, and we were yet protected by Providence.
Herman Mordaunt now bethought him of ascertaining his
precise situation, the extent of his own loss, and, as far as
possible, of that which we had inflicted on the enemy. Guert
was called for, to aid in this inquiry, but no Guert was to
be found! Jaap, too, was absent. A muster was had, and
then it was found that Guert Ten Eyck, Jaap Satanstoe,
Gilbert Davis, and Moses Mudge were all wanting. The
Jumper, too, did not appear; but I accounted for him, and
for the two settlers named, having actually seen them fall.
Day returned to us slowly, while agitated by the effect of
these discoveries; but it brought no relief. We soon
ventured
to re-open the gates, knowing no Indian would remain
very near the building, while it was light; and, having
examined
all the dangerous covers, we passed outside the court
with confidence, in quest of the bodies of our friends. Not
an Indian was seen, Jumper excepted. The Oneida lay at
the foot of the rocks, dead, and scalped; as did Davis and
Mudge on the summit. Everything else human had
disappeared
.
Dirck was confident that six or seven of the
Hurons fell by the volley from the cliff, but the bodies had
been carried off. As to Guert and Jaap, no traces of them
remained, dead or alive.
CHAPTER XIV.
She looked on many a face with vacant eye,
On many a token without knowing what;
She saw them watch her without asking why,
And reck'd not who around her pillow sat;
Not speechless, though she spoke not; not a sigh
Relieved her thoughts: dull silence and quick chat
Were tried in vain by by those who served; she gave
No sign, save breath, of having left the grave.
Byron
.
It
was a most painful moment to me, when Herman
Mordaunt
,
an hour after all these facts were established, came
to summon me to the presence of Anneke and Mary
Wallace
.
One gleam of joy, one ray of the sunshine of the
17 *
heart, shone on Anneke's sweet countenance as she saw me
unharmed enter the room, but it quickly disappeared in the
strong sympathy she felt for the sufferings of her friend.
As for Mary Wallace, death itself could hardly have left
her more colourless, or with features more firmly impressed
with the expression of mental suffering. Anneke was the
first to speak.
God be praised that this dreadful night is passed, and
you and my dearest father are spared! the precious girl
said, with fervour, pressing the hand that had taken one of
hers, in both her own. For this much, at least, we can
be grateful; would I could add for the safety of us all!
Tell me the worst at once, Mr. Littlepage, added Mary
Wallace; I can bear anything better than uncertainty. Mr.
Mordaunt says that you know the facts better than any one
else, and that you must relate them. Speak, then, though
it break my heart to hear it!is he killed?
I hope, through Heaven's mercy, not. Indeed, I think
not; though I fear he must be a prisoner.
Thank you for that, dear, dear Mr. Littlepage! Oh!
Thank you for that, from the bottom of my heart. But
may they not torture him? Do not these Hurons torture
their prisoners? Conceal nothing from me, Corny; you
cannot imagine how much self-command I have, and how
well I can behave. Oh! conceal nothing.
Poor girl! At the very moment she was boasting of her
fortitude and ability to endure, her whole frame was
trembling
from head to foot, her face was of the hue of death,
and the smile with which she spoke was frightfully haggard.
That pent-up passion, which had so long struggled with her
prudence, could no longer be suppressed. That she really
loved Guert, and that her love would prove stronger than
her discretion, I had not doubted, now, for some months;
but, never having before witnessed the strength of any
feeling
that had been so long and so painfully suppressed, I
confess
that this exhibition of a suffering so intense, in a being
so delicate, so excellent, and so lovely, almost unmanned
me. I took Mary Wallace's hand and led her to a chair,
scarce knowing what to say to relieve her mind. All this
time, her eye never turned from mine, as if she hoped to
learn the truth by the aid of the sense of sight alone. How
anxious, jealous, distrustful, and yet beseeching was that
gaze!
Will he be tortured? She rather whispered huskily,
than asked aloud.
I trust, by God's mercy, not. They have taken my
slave, Jaap, also; and it is far more probable that
he
would
be the victim, in such a case, than Mr. Ten Eyck
Why do you call him Mr. Ten Eyck? You have
always
called him Guert, of lateyou are his friendyou
think well of himyou cannot be less his friend, now that
he is miserable, than when he was happy, and the pride of
all human eyes, in his strength and manly beauty!
Dear Miss Wallace, compose yourself, I do entreat of
youno one will cling to Guert longer than I.
Yes; I have always thought this  always
felt
this.
Guert cannot be low, or mean in his sentiments, while an
educated gentleman, like Corny Littlepage, is his friend.
I have written to my aunt, and we must not be too hasty in
our judgments. The spirit and follies of youth will soon
be over, and then we shall see a shining character in Guert
Ten Eyck. Is not this true, Anneke?
Anneke knelt at the side of her friend, folded her in her
arms, drew the quivering head down upon her own
sympathizing
bosom, and held it there a moment, in the very
attitude
of protecting, solacing love. After a brief pause,
Mary
Wallace burst into tears, and I have ever thought that
that relief, under God's mercy, saved her reason. In a few
minutes, the sufferer became more calm, when she retired
into herself, as was her wont, leaving Anneke and me to
discuss the subject.
After turning all the chances and probabilities in our
minds, I promised my companions not to lose a moment, but
to use immediate means of ascertaining all that could be
ascertained, in Guert's behalf, and of doing everything that
could be done, to save him.
You will not deceive me, Corny, whispered Mary
Wallace
,
pressing my hand at leave-taking, in both her own.
I know I can depend on
you
, for he
boasts
of being your
friend.
Anneke's painful smile added force to this request, and I
tore myself away unwilling to quit such a sufferer, yet
unable
to remain. Herman Mordaunt was seen conversing
with Susquesus, in the court, and I joined him at once,
determined
to lose no time.
I was speaking to the Trackless on this very subject,
answered Herman Mordaunt, as soon as I had explained my
purpose, and am now waiting for his answer. Do you
think it, then, safe to send a messenger out to the Hurons,
in order to inquire after our friends, and to treat with
them!
No send?  Why not? returned the Indian. Red
man glad to see messenger. Go when he want; come
back when he want. How can make bargain, if scalp
messenger
?
I had heard that the most savage tribes respected a
messenger
;
and, indeed, the necessity of so doing was, of itself,
a sort of security that such must be the case. It was true,
that the bearer of a flag might be in more danger, on such
an errand, than would be the case in a camp of civilized
men; but these Canada-Indians had been long serving with
the French, and their chiefs, beyond a question, had
obtained
some of the notions of pale-face warfare. Without
much reflection, therefore, and under an impulse in behalf
of my friend, and my slave  for Jaap's fate was of lively
interest with me  I volunteered to bear a flag myself.
Herman Mordaunt shook his head, and seemed reluctant to
comply.
Anneke would hardly pardon me for consenting to that,
he answered. You must remember, now, Corny, that a
very tender and sensitive heart is bound up in you, and
you must no longer act like a thoughtless, single man. It
would be far better to send this Onondago, if he will agree
to go. He understands the red men, and will be able to
interpret the omens with more certainty, than any of us.
What say you, Susquesus; will you be a messenger to the
Hurons?
Sartain;why no go, if he want? Good to be
messenger
,
sometime. Where wampumwhat tell him?
Thus encouraged, we deliberated together, and soon had
Susquesus in readiness to depart. As for the Indian, he laid
aside all his arms, washed the war-paint from his face, put
a calico shirt over his shoulders, and assumed the guise of
peace. We gave him a small, white flag to carry, feeling
certain that the Huron chiefs must understand its meaning;
and thinking it might be better, in bearing a message from
pale-faces, that he who carried it should have a pale-face
symbol of his errand. Susquesus found some wampum, too;
having as much faith in that, probably, as in anything else.
He then set forth, being charged to offer liberal ransom to
the Hurons, for the living, uninjured bodies of Guert Ten
Eyck and Jaap Satanstoe.
We entertained no doubt that the enemy would be found
in the ravine, for that was the point, in every respect, most
favourable to the operations of the siege; being near the
house, having a perfect cover, possessing water, wood, and
other conveniences. From that point the Nest could be
watched, and any favourable chance improved. Thither,
then, Susquesus was told to proceed; though it was not
thought advisable to fetter one so shrewd, with too many
instructions. Several of us accompanied the Onondago to the
gate, and saw him moving across the fields, towards the
wood, in his usual loping trot. A bird could scarcely have
flown more directly to its object.
The half-hour that succeeded the disappearance of
Susquesus
,
in the mouth of the ravine, was one of intensely
painful suspense. We all remained without the gate,
waiting
the result, including Dirck, Mr. Worden, Jason, and
half-a-dozen of the settlers. At length the Onondago
reappeared
;
and, to our great joy, a group followed him, in
which were both the prisoners. The last were bound, but
able to walk. This party might have contained a dozen of
the enemy, all of whom were armed. It moved slowly out
of the ravine, and ascended to the fields that were on a level
with the house, halting when about four hundred yards from
us. Seeing this movement, we counted out exactly the
same number of men, and went forward, halting at a
distance
of two hundred yards from the Indians. Here we
waited for our messenger, who continued on, after the
Hurons had come to a stand. Thus far everything looked
propitious.
Do you bring us good news? Herman Mordaunt eagerly
asked. Are our friends unhurt?
Got scalpno hurttake prisonerjump on 'em, ten,
two, sixcotch 'em, then. Open eyes; you see.
And the Huronsdo they seem inclined to accept the
ransom? Rum, rifle, blanket and powder; you offered all,
I hope, Susquesus?
Sartain. No forget; that bad. Say take all that; some
more, too.
And they have come to treat with us? What are we to
do, now, Susquesus?
Put down riflego near and talk. You gopriest go
young chief go  that t'ree. Then t'ree warrior lay down
rifle, come talk, too. Prisoner wait. All good.
This was sufficiently intelligible, and believing that
anything
like hesitation might make the condition of Guert
desperate, we prepared to comply. I could see that the
Rev. Mr. Worden had no great relish for the business, but
was ashamed to hang back when he saw Herman Mordaunt
cheerfully advancing to the interview. We three were met
by as many Hurons, among whom was Jaap's friend `Muss,'
who was evidently the leading person of the party. Guert
and Jaap were held, bound, about a hundred yards in the
rear, but near enough to be spoken to, by raising the voice.
Guert was in his shirt and breeches, with his head
uncovered
,
his fine curly hair blowing about in the wind, and I
thought I saw some signs of blood on his linen. This might
be his own, or it might have come from an enemy. I called
to him, therefore, inquiring how he did, and whether he were
hurt.
Nothing to speak of, Corny, I thank you, was the
cheerful answer; these red gentlemen have had me tied to
a tree, and have been seeing how near they could hurl their
tomahawks without hitting. This is one of their customary
amusements, and I have got a scratch or two in the sport.
I hope the ladies are in good spirits, and do not let the
business
of last night distress them.
There is blessed news for you, Guert  Susquesus, ask
these chiefs if I may go near my friend to give him one
word of consolation  on my honour, no attempt to release
him will be made by me, until I return here.
I spoke earnestly, and the Onondago interpreted what I
had said into the language of the Hurons. I had made this
somewhat hardy request, under an impulse that I found
ungovernable
,
and was surprised, as well as pleased, to find it
granted. These savages confided in my word, and trusted
to my honour with a stately delicacy that might have done
credit to the manners of civilized kings, giving themselves
no apparent concern about my movements, although they
occurred in their own rear. It was too late to retract, and,
leaving Herman Mordaunt endeavouring to drive a bargain
with Muss and his two companions, I proceeded,
unconcerned
myself, boldly towards the armed men who held
Guert and Jaap prisoners. I thought my approach
did
cause a slight movement among these savages, and there
was a question and answer passed between them and their
leaders. The latter said but a word or two, but these were
uttered authoritatively, and with a commanding toss of a
hand. Brief as they were, they answered the purpose, and
I was neither molested nor spoken to, during the short
interview
I had with my friend.
God bless you, Corny, for this! Guert cried with
feeling
,
as I warmly shook his hand. It requires a warm
heart, and a bold one too, to lead a man into this `lion's
den.' Stay but a moment, lest some evil come of it, I beg
of you. This squeeze of the hand is worth an estate to a
man in my situation; but remember Anneke. Ah! Corny,
my dear friend, I could be happy even here, did I know that
Mary Wallace grieved for me!
Then be happy, Guert. My sole object in venturing
here, was to tell you to hope everything in that quarter.
There will be no longer any coyness, any hesitation, any
misgivings, when you shall be once restored to us.
Mr. Littlepage, you would not trifle with the feelings of
a miserable captive, hanging between torture and death, as
is my present case! I can hardly credit my senses; yet,
you would not mock me!
Believe all I saynay, all you
wish
, Guert. It is
seldom
that woman loves as
she
loves, and this I swear to you.
I go now, only to aid Herman Mordaunt in bringing you
where your own ears shall hear such proofs of what I say,
as have been uttered in mine.
Guert made no answer, but I could see he was profoundly
affected. I squeezed his hand, and we parted, in the full
hope, on my side at least, that the separation would be short.
I have reason to think Guert shed tears; for, on looking
back, I perceived his face turned away from those who were
nearest to him. I had but a single glance at Jaap. My
fellow stood a little in the rear, as became his colour; but
he watched my countenance with the vigilance of a cat. I
thought it best not to speak to him, though I gave him a
secret sign of encouragement.
These chiefs are not very amicably disposed, Corny,
said Herman Mordaunt, the instant I rejoined him. They
have given me to understand that Jaap will be liberated on
no terms whatever. They must have his scalp, as
Susquesus
tells me, on account of some severity he himself has
shown to one of these chiefs. To use their own language,
they want it for a plaster to this warrior's back. His fate,
it would seem, is sealed, and he has only been brought out
yonder, to raise hopes in him that are to be disappointed.
The wretches do not scruple to avow this, in their own
sententious
manner. As for Guert, they say he slew two of
their warriors, and that their wives will miss their husbands,
and will not be easily quieted unless they see his scalp, too.
They offer to release him, however, on either of two sets of
terms. They will give up Guert for two of what they call
chiefs, or for four common men. If we do not like those
conditions, they will exchange him, on condition we give
two common men for him, and abandon the Nest to them,
by marching out, with all my people, before the sun is up
above our heads.
Conditions that you cannot accept, under any
circumstances
,
I fear, sir?
Certainly not. The delivery of any two is out of the
questionwould be so, even to save my own life. As for
the Nest and its contents, I would very willingly abandon
all, a few papers excepted, had I the smallest faith in the
chiefs' being able to restrain their followers; but the
dreadful
massacre of William-Henry is still too recent, to confide
in anything of the sort. My answer is given already, and
we are about to part. Possibly, when they see us
determined
,
they may lower their demands a little.
A grave parting wave of the hand was given by Muss,
who had conducted himself with great dignity in the
interview
,
and the three Hurons walked away in a body.
Best go, said Susquesus, significantly. Maybe want
rifle. Hurons in 'arnest.
On this hint, we returned to our friends, and resumed our
arms. What succeeded, I learned in part by the relations
of others, while a part was witnessed by my own eyes. It
seems that Jaap, from the first, understood the desperate
nature of his own position. The remembrance of his
misdeeds
in relation to Muss, whose prisoner he had more
especially become, most probably increased his
apprehensions
,
and his thoughts were constantly bent on obtaining
his liberty, by means entirely independent of negotiation.
From the instant he was brought out of the ravine, he kept
all his eyes about him, watching for the smallest chance of
effecting his purpose. It happened that one of the savages
so placed himself before the negro, who was kept behind all
near him, as to enable Jaap to draw the Huron's knife from
its sheath without being detected. He did this while I was
actually with the party, and all eyes were on me. Guert
and himself were bound, by having their arms fastened
above the elbows, behind the back; and when Guert turned
aside to shed tears, as mentioned, Jaap succeeded in cutting
his fastenings. This could be done, only while the savages
were following my retreating form with their eyes. At the
same time Jaap gave the knife to Guert, who did him a
similar service. As the Indians did not take the alarm, the
prisoners paused a moment, holding their arms as if still
bound, to look around them. The Indian nearest Guert had
two rifles, his own and that of Muss, both leaning
negligently
against his shoulder, with their breeches on the
ground. To these weapons Guert pointed; and, when the
three chiefs were on the point of rejoining their friends, who
were attentive to their movements in order to ascertain the
result, Guert seized this savage by his arm, which he twisted
until the Indian yelled with pain, then caught one rifle, while
Jaap laid hold of the other. Each fired and brought down
his man; then they made an onset with the butts of their
pieces on the rest of the party. This bold assault, though so
desperate in appearance, was the wisest thing they could
do; as immediate flight would have left their enemies an
opportunity
Vol. II.  18
of sending the swift runners of their pieces in
pursuit.
The first intimation we had of any movement of this sort
was in the reports of the rifles. Then, I not only saw, but
I heard the tremendous blow Jaap gave to the head of
Muss; a blow that demolished both the victim and the
instrument
of his destruction. Though the breech of the
rifle was broken, the heavy barrel still remained, and the
negro flourished it with a force that swept all before him.
It is scarcely necessary to say Guert was not idle in such a
fray. He fought for Mary Wallace, as well as for himself,
and he overturned two more of the Indians, as it might be,
in the twinkling of an eye. Here Dirck did good service
to our friends. His rifle was in his hands, and, levelling it
with coolness, he shot down a powerful savage who was on
the point of seizing Guert from behind. This was the
commencement
of a general war, volleys now coming from both
parties; from ourselves, and from the enemy, who were in
the cover of the woods. Intimidated by the fury of the
personal assault under which they were suffering, the
remaining
Indians near Guert and the negro leaped away
towards
their friends, yelling; leaving their late prisoners
free, but more exposed to fire than they could have been
when encircled even by enemies.
Everything passed with fearful rapidity. Guert seized
the rifle of a fallen Indian, and Jaap obtained another,
when they fell back towards us, like two lions at bay, with
rifle-bullets whizzing around them at every step. Of course,
we fired, and we also advanced to meet them; an imprudent
step, since the main body of the Hurons were covered,
rendering
the contest unequal. But, there was no resisting the
sympathetic impulses of such a moment, or the exultation
we all felt at the exploits of Guert and Jaap, enacted, as
they were, before our eyes. As we drew together, the
former
shouted and cried
Hurrah! Corny, my noble fellowlet us charge the
wootthere 'll not be a reat-skin left in it, in five minutes.
Forwart, my friendsforwart, all!
It certainly was an exciting moment. We all shouted
in our turns, and all cried `forward,' in common. Even
Mr. Worden joined in the shout, and pressed forward.
Jason
,
too, fought bravely; and we went at the wood like so
many bull-dogs. I fancy the pedagogue thought the
fee-simple
of his mills depended on the result. On we went, in
open order, reserving our fire for the last moment, but
receiving
dropping shots, that did us no harm, until we dashed
into the thicket.
The Hurons were discomfited, and they fled. Though a
panic is not usual among those wild warriors, they seldom
rally on the field. If once driven, against their will, a close
pursuit will usually disperse them for a time; and such was
the case now. By the time I got fairly into the ravine, I
could see or hear of no enemy. My friends were on my
right and left, shouting and pressing on; but there was no
foe visible. Guert and Jaap were in advance, for we could
not overtake them; and they had fired, for they got the last
glimpses of the enemy. But one more shot did come from
the Hurons in that inroad. It was fired from some one of
the retreating party, who must have been lingering in its
rear. The report sounded far up the ravine, and it came
like a farewell and final gun. Distant as it was, however,
it proved the most fatal shot to us that was fired in all that
affair. I caught a glimpse of Guert, through the trees, and
saw him fall. In an instant, I was at his side.
What a change is that from the triumph of victory to the
sudden approach of death! I saw by the expression of
Guert's countenance, as I raised him in my arms, that the
blow was fatal. The ball, indeed, had passed directly through
his body, missing the bones, but injuring the vitals. There
is no mistaking the expression of a death-wound on the
human countenance, when the effect is direct and not
remote
.
Nature appears to admonish the victim of his fate.
So it was with Guert.
This shot has done for me, Corny, he said, and it
seems to be the very last they intended to fire. I almost
hope there can be no truth in what you told me of Mary
Wallace!
That was neither the time nor the place to speak on such
a subject, and I made no answer. From the instant the fall
of Guert became known, the pursuit ceased, and our whole
party collected around the wounded man. The Indian alone
seemed to retain any consciousness of the importance of
knowing what the enemy was doing, for his philosophy was
not easily disturbed by the sudden appearance of death
among us. Still he liked Guert, as did every one who could
get beyond the weaknesses of his outer character, and fairly
at the noble traits of his manly nature. Susquesus looked
at the sufferer a moment, gravely and not without concern;
then he turned to Herman Mordaunt, and said
This badsave scalp, that good, though. Carry him
in house. Susquesus follow trail and see what Injin mean.
As this was well, he was told to watch the enemy, while
we bore our friend towards the Nest. Dirck consented to
precede us, and let the melancholy truth be known, while I
continued with Guert, who held my hand the whole
distance
.
We were a most melancholy procession, for victors.
Not a serious hurt had any of our party received, in this
last affair, the wound of Guert Ten Eyck excepted; yet, I
question if more real sorrow would have been felt over two
or three other deaths. We had become accustomed to our
situation; it is wonderful how soon the soldier does;
rendering
death familiar, and disarming him of half his terrors;
but calamities can, and do occur, to bring back an army to
a sense of its true nature and its dependence on Providence.
Such had been the effect of the loss of Lord Howe, on the
troops before Ticonderoga, and such was the effect of the
fall of Guert Ten Eyck, on the small band that was
collected
to defend the possessions and firesides of Ravensnest.
We entered the gate of the house, and found most of its
tenants already in the court, collected like a congregation
in a church that awaits the entrance of the dead. Herman
Mordaunt had sent an order to have his own room prepared
for the sufferer, and thither we carried Guert. He was
placed on the bed; then the crowd silently withdrew. I
observed that Guert's eyes turned anxiously and inquiringly
around, and I told him, in a low voice, I would go for the
ladies myself. A smile, and a pressure of the hand, showed
how well I had interpreted his thoughts.
Somewhat to my surprise, I found Mary Wallace, pale it
is true, but comparatively calm and mistress of herself.
That instinct of propriety which seems to form a part of the
nature of a well-educated woman, had taught her the
necessity
of self-command, that no outbreak of her feelings
should affect the sufferer. As for Anneke, she was like
herself
,
gentle, mourning, and full of sympathy for her friend.
As soon as apprised of the object of my visit, the two
girls expressed their readiness to go to Guert. As they
knew the way, I did not attend them, purposely proceeding
in another direction, in order not to be a witness of the
interview
.
Anneke has since told me, however, that Mary's
self-command did not altogether desert her, while Guert's
cheerful gratitude probably so far deceived her as to create
a short-lived hope that the wound was not mortal. For
myself
,
I passed an hour in attending to the state of things in
and around the house, in order to make certain that no
negligence
occurred still to endanger our security. At the end
of that time, I returned to Guert, meeting Herman
Mordaunt
near the door of his room.
The little hope we had is vanished, said the last, in a
sorrowful tone. Poor Ten Eyck has, beyond a question,
received his death-wound, and has but a few hours to live.
Were my people safe, I would rather that everything at
Ravensnest
,
house and estate, were destroyed, than had this
happen!
Prepared by this announcement, I was not as much
surprised
as I might otherwise have been, at the great change
that had occurred in my friend, since the time I quitted his
room. It was evident he anticipated the result.
Nevertheless
he was calm; nay, apparently happy. Nor was he so
much enfeebled as to prevent his speaking quite distinctly,
and with sufficient ease. When the machine of life is
stopped
by the sudden disruption of a vital ligament, the
approaches
of death, though more rapid than with disease, are
seldom so apparent. The first evidences of a fatal
termination
are discovered rather through the nature of the
violence
,
than by means of apparent effects.
I have said that Guert seemed even happy, though death
was so near. Anneke told me, subsequently, that Mary
Wallace had owned her love, in answer to an earnest appeal
on his part, and, from that moment, he had expressed
himself
as one who was about to die contented. Poor Guert!
It was little he thought of the dread future, or of the church
on earth, except as the last was entitled to, and did receive
on all occasions, his outward respect. It seemed that Mary
18 *
Wallace, habitually so reserved and silent among her friends,
had been accustomed to converse freely with Guert, and
that she had made a serious effort, during her residence in
Albany, to enlighten his mind, or rather to arouse his
feelings
on this all-important subject, and that Guert, sensible
of the pleasure of receiving instruction from such a source,
always listened with attention. When I entered the room,
some allusion had just been made to this theme.
But for you, Mary, I should be little better than a
heathen
,
said Guert, holding the hand of his beloved, and
scarce averting his eyes from their idol a single instant.
If God has mercy on me, it will be on your account.
Oh! nononoGuert, say not, think not
thus!
exclaimed Mary Wallace, shocked at this excess of his
attachment
even for herself at such a moment. We all
receive
our pardons through the death and mediation of his
Blessed Son. Nothing else can save you, or any of us,
my dear, dear Guert; and I implore you not to think
otherwise
.
Guert looked a little bewildered; still he looked pleased.
The first expression was probably produced by his not
exactly
comprehending the nature of that mysterious
expiation
,
which baffles the unaided powers of man, and which,
indeed, is to be felt, rather than understood. The look of
pleasure had its origin in the `dear, dear Guert,' and, more
than that, in the consciousness of possessing the affections
of the woman he had so long loved, almost against hope.
Guert Ten Eyck was a man of bold and reckless
character
,
in all that pertained to risks, frolic, and youthful
adventure
;
but the meekest Christian could scarcely possess a
more lowly opinion of his own frailties and sins, than this
dashing young fellow possessed of his own claims to be
valued by such a being as Mary Wallace. I often
wondered
how he ever presumed to love her, but suppose the
apparent
vanity must be ascribed to the resistless power of a
passion
that is known to be the strongest of our nature. It was
also a sort of moral anomaly that two so opposed to each
other in character; the one verging on extreme recklessness,
the other pushing prudence almost to prudery; the one so
gay as to seem to live for frolic, the other quiet and reserved,
should conceive this strong predilection for each other; but
so it was. I have heard persons say, however, that these
varieties in temperament awaken interest, and that they who
have commenced with such dissimilarities, but have
assimilated
by communion, attachment, and habits, after all, make
the happiest couples.
Mary Wallace lost all her reserve, in the gush of
tenderness
and sympathy, that now swept all before it.
Throughout
the whole of that morning, she hung about Guert, as the
mother watches the ailing infant. If his thirst was to be
assuaged, her hand held the cup; if his pillow was to be
replaced, her care suggested the alteration; if his brow was
to be wiped, she performed that office for him, suffering no
other to come between her and the object of her solicitude.
There were moments when the manner in which Mary
Wallace hung over Guert, was infinitely touching. Anneke
and I knew that her very soul yearned to lead his thoughts
to dwell on the subject of the great change that was so near.
Nevertheless, the tenderness of the woman was so much
stronger than even the anxiety of the Christian, that we
perceived
she feared the influence on his wound. At length,
happily for an anxiety that was beginning to be too painful
for endurance, Guert spoke on the subject, himself.
Whether
his mind adverted naturally to such a topic, or he
perceived
the solicitude of his gentle nurse, I could not say.
I cannot stay with you long, Mary, he said, and I
should like to have Mr. Worden's prayers, united to yours,
offered up in my behalf. Corny will seek the Dominie, for
an old friend?
I vanished from the room, and was absent ten minutes.
At the end of that time, Mr. Worden was ready in his
surplice
,
and we went to the sick room. Certainly, our old
pastor had not the way of manifesting the influence of
religion
,
that is usual to the colonies, especially to those of the
more northern and eastern portion of the country; yet,
there was a heartiness in his manner of praying, at times,
that almost persuaded me he was a good man. I will own,
however, that Mr. Worden was one of those clergymen
who could pray much more sincerely for certain persons,
than for others. He was partial to poor Guert; and I really
thought this was manifest in his accents, on this melancholy
occasion.
The dying man was relieved by this attention to the rites
of the church. Guert was not a metaphysician; and, at no
period of his life, I believe, did he ever enter very closely
into the consideration of those fearful questions which were
connected with his existence, origin, destination, and position,
in the long scale of animated beings. He had those general
notions on these subjects, that all civilized men imbibe by
education and communion with their fellows, but nothing
more. He understood it was a duty to pray; and I make
no doubt he fancied there were times and seasons in which
this duty was more imperative than at others; and times
and seasons when it might be dispensed with.
How tenderly and how anxiously did Mary Wallace
watch over her patient, during the whole of that sad day!
She seemed to know neither weariness nor fatigue.
Towards
evening, it was just as the sun was tinging the
summits
of the trees with its parting light, she came towards
Anneke and myself, with a face that was slightly
illuminated
with something like a glow of pleasure, and whispered
to us, that Guert was better. Within ten minutes of that
moment, I approached the bed, and saw a slight movement
of the patient's hand, as if he desired me to come nearer.
Corny, said Guert, in a low, languid voice  it is
nearly all over. I wish I could see Mary Wallace, once
more, before I die!
Mary was not,
could
not be distant. She fell upon her
knees, and clasped the yielding form of her lover to her
heart. Nothing was said on either side; or, if aught were
said, it was whispered, and was of a nature too sacred to be
communicated to others. In that attitude did this young
woman, long so coy and so difficult to decide, remain for
near an hour, and in that quiet, cherishing, womanly
embrace
,
did Guert Ten Eyck breathe his last.
I left the sufferer as much alone with the woman of his
heart, as comported with prudence and a proper attention on
my part; but it was my melancholy duty to close his eyes.
Thus prematurely terminated the earthly career of as manly a
spirit as ever dwelt in human form. That it had imperfections,
my pen has not concealed; but the long years that have
since passed away, have not served to obliterate the regard
so noble a temperament could not fail to awaken.
CHAPTER XV.
How slow the day slides on! When we desire
Time's haste, he seems to lose a match with lobsters:
And when we wish him stay, he imps his wings
With feathers plumed with thought.
Albamazar
.
It
is unnecessary to dwell on the grief that we all felt for
our loss. That night was necessarily one of watchfulness,
but few were inclined to sleep. The return of light found
us unmolested, however; and an hour or two later,
Susquesus
came in, and reported that the enemy had retreated
towards Ticonderoga. There was nothing more to fear
from that quarter, and the settlers soon began to return to
their dwellings, or to such as remained. In the course of a
week the axe again rang in the forest, and rude habitations
began to reappear, in the places of those that had been
destroyed
.
As Bulstrode could not well be removed, Herman
Mordaunt determined to pass the remainder of the season at
Ravensnest, with the double view of accommodating his
guest, and of encouraging his settlers. The danger was
known to be over for that summer at least, and, ere the
approach
of another, it was hoped that the humiliated feelings
of Great Britain would so far be aroused, as to drive the
enemy from the province; as indeed was effectually done.
On consultation, it was decided that the body of Guert
ought to be sent, for interment among his friends, to Albany.
Dirck and myself accompanied it, as the principal attendants,
all that remained of our party going with us. Herman
Mordaunt
thought it necessary to remain at Ravensnest, and
Anneke would not quit her father. The Rev. Mr. Worden's
missionary zeal had, by this trial, effectually evaporated, and
he profited by so favourable an occasion to withdraw into
the safer and more peopled districts. I well remember as
we marched after the horse-litter that carried the remains
of poor Guert, the divine's making the following sensible
remarks:
You see how it is, on this frontier, Corny, he said;
it is premature to think of introducing Christianity.
Christianity
is essentially a civilized religion, and can only be of
use among civilized beings. It is true, my young friend,
that many of the early apostles were not learned, after the
fashion of this world, but they were all thoroughly civilized.
Palestine was a civilized country, and the Hebrews were a
great people; and I consider the precedent set by our
blessed
Lord is a command to be followed in all time, and that
his appearance in Judea is tantamount to his saying to his
apostles, `go and preach me and my gospel to all
civilized
people.'
I ventured to remark that there was something like a
direct command to preach it to
all
nations, to be found in
the bible.
Ay, that is true enough, answered Mr. Worden, but
it clearly means all
civilized
nations. Then, this was before
the discovery of America, and it is fair enough to presume
that the command referred solely to
known
nations. The
texts of scripture are not to be strained, but are to be
construed
naturally, Corny, and this seems to me to be the
natural
reading of that passage. No, I have been rash and
imprudent in pushing duty to exaggeration, and shall
confine
my labours to their proper sphere, during the remainder
of my days. Civilization is just as much a means of
providence
as religion itself; and it is clearly intended that one
should be built on the other. A clergyman goes quite far
enough from the centre of refinement, when he quits home
to come into these colonies to preach the gospel; letting
alone these scalping devils the Indians, who, I greatly fear,
were never born to be saved. It may do well enough to
have societies to keep them in view, but a meeting in
London
is quite near enough ever to approach them.
Such, ever after, appeared to be the sentiments of the Rev.
Mr. Worden, and I took no pains to change them. I ought,
however, to have alluded to the parting with Anneke, before
I gave the foregoing extract from the parson's homily.
Circumstances prevented my having much private
communication
with my betrothed before quitting the Nest; for
Anneke's sympathy with Mary Wallace was too profound
to permit her to think much, just then, of aught but the
latter's sorrows. As for Mary herself, the strength and
depth of her attachment and grief were never fully
appreciated
,
until time came to vindicate them. Her seeming
calm was soon restored, for it was only under a tempest of
feeling that Mary Wallace lost her self-command; and the
affliction that was inevitable and irremediable, one of her
regulated temperament and high principles, struggled to
endure with Christian submission. It was only in after-life
that I came to know how intense and absorbing had, in
truth, been her passion for the gay, high-spirited,
ill-educated
,
and impulsive young Albanian.
Anneke wept for a few minutes in my arms, a quarter of
an hour before our melancholy procession quitted the Nest.
The dear girl had no undue reserve with me; though I found
her a little reluctant to converse on the subject of our own
loves, so soon after the fearful scenes we had just gone
through. Still, she left me in no doubt on the all-important
point of my carrying away with me her whole and entirely
undivided heart. Bulstrode she never had, never
could
love.
This she assured me, over and over again. He amused her,
and she felt for him some of the affection and interest of
kindred, but not the least of any other interest. Poor
Bulstrode
!
now I was certain of success, I had very
magnanimous
sentiments in his behalf, and could give him credit for
various good qualities that had been previously obscured in
my eyes. Herman Mordaunt had requested nothing might
be said to the major of my engagement; though an early
opportunity was to be taken by himself, to let the suitor
understand that Anneke declined the honour of his hand.
It was thought the information would best come from him.
I shall be frank with you, Littlepage, and confess I have
been very anxious for the union of my daughter and Mr.
Bulstrode, added Herman Mordaunt, in the interview we
had before I left the Nest; and I trust to your own good
sense to account for it. I knew Bulstrode before I had any
knowledge of yourself; and there was already a connection
between us, that was just of a nature to render one that was
closer, desirable. I shall not deny that I fancied Anneke
fitted to adorn the station and circles to which Bulstrode
would have carried her; and, perhaps, it is a natural parental
weakness to wish to see one's child promoted. We talk of
humility and contentment, Corny, though there is much of
the
nolo episcopari
about it, after all. But you see that the
preference of the child is so much stronger than that of the
parent, that it must prevail. I dare say, after all, you would
much rather be Anneke's choice, than be mine?
I can have no difficulty in admitting that, sir, I
answered
;
and I feel very sensible of the liberal manner in
which you yield your own preferences to our wishes.
Certainly
,
in the way of rank and fortune, I have little to offer,
Mr. Mordaunt, as an offset to Mr. Bulstrode's claims; but,
in love for your daughter, and in an ardent desire to make
her happy, I shall not yield to him, or any other man,
though he were a king.
In the way of fortune, Littlepage, I have very few
regrets
.
As you are to live in this country, the joint means
of the two families, which, some day, must centre in you
and Anneke, will prove all-sufficient; and, as for posterity,
Ravensnest and Mooseridge will supply ample provisions.
As the colony grows, your descendants will increase, and
your means will increase with both. No, no; I may have
been a little disappointed; that much I will own; but I have
not been, at any time, displeased. God bless you, then, my
dear boy; write us from Albany, and come to us at
Lilacsbush
in September. Your reception will be that of a son.
It is needless to dwell on the melancholy procession we
formed through the woods. Dirck and myself kept near the
body, on foot, until we reached the highway, when vehicles
were provided for the common transportation. On reaching
Albany, we delivered the remains of Guert to his relatives,
and there was a suitable funeral given. The bricked closet
behind the chimney, was opened, as usual, and the six dozen
of Madeira, that had been placed in it twenty-four years
before, or the day the poor fellow was christened, was found
to be very excellent. I remember it was said generally,
that better wine was drunk at the funeral of Guert Ten
Eyck, than had been tasted at the obsequies of any
individual
who was not a Van Rensselaer, a Schuyler, or a Ten
Broeck, within the memory of man. I now speak of funerals
in Albany; for I do suppose the remark would scarcely apply
to many other funerals, lower down the river. As a rule,
however, very good wine was given at all our funerals.
The Rev. Mr. Worden officiated, and was universally
regarded
with interest, as a pious minister of the gospel, who
had barely escaped the fate of the person he was now
committing
`dust to dust,' while devotedly and ardently
employed
in endeavouring to rescue the souls of the very savages
who sought his life, from the fate of the heathen.
I remember there was a very well worded paragraph to
this effect in the New York Gazette, and I had heard it
said, but do not remember to have ever seen it myself, that
in one of the reports of the Society for the Promulgation
of the Gospel in Foreign Parts, the circumstances were
alluded
to in a very touching and edifying manner.
Poor Guert! I passed a few minutes at his grave before
we went south. It was all that was left of his fine person,
his high spirit, his lion-hearted courage, his buoyant spirits,
and his unextinguishable love of frolic. A finer physical
man I never beheld, or one who better satisfied the eye, in
all respects. That the noble tenement was not more
intellectually
occupied, was purely the consequence of a want
of education. Notwithstanding, all the books in the world
could not have converted Guert Ten Eyck into a Jason
Newcome, or Jason Newcome into a Guert Ten Eyck.
Each owed many of his peculiarities, doubtless, to the
province
in which he was bred and born, and to the training
consequent on these accidents; but nature had also drawn
broad distinctions between them. All the wildness of
Guert's impulses could not altogether destroy his feelings,
tone, and tact as a gentleman; while all the soaring,
extravagant
pretensions of Jason never could have ended in
elevating
him to that character. Alas! Poor Guert! I
sincerely
mourned his loss for years, nor has his memory yet
ceased to have a deep interest with me.
Dirck Follock and I would have been a good deal caressed
at Albany, on our return, both on account of what had
happened
,
and on account of our Dutch connections, had we
been in the mood to profit by the disposition of the people.
But, we were not. The sad events with which we had been
connected were still too recent to indulge in gaieties or
company
;
and, as soon, as possible after the funeral, we seized
the opportunity of embarking on board a sloop bound to New
York. Our voyage was generally considered a prosperous
one, lasting, indeed, only six days. We took the ground
three times, it is true; but nothing was thought of that, such
Vol. II.  19
accidents being of frequent occurrence. Among the events
of this sort, one occurred in the Overslaugh, and I passed
a few hours there very pleasantly, as it was so near the
scene of our adventure on the river. Anneke always
occupied
much of my thoughts, but pleasing pictures of her
gentle decision, her implicit reliance on myself, her
resignation
,
her spirit, and her intelligence were now blended,
without
any alloy, in my recollections. The dear girl had
confessed to me, that she loved me even on that fearful
night, for her tenderness in my behalf dated much farther
back. This was a great addition to the satisfaction with
which I went over every incident and speech, in
recollection
,
endeavouring to recall the most minute tone or
expression
,
to see if I could
now
connect it with any sign of that
passion, which I was authorized in believing did even then
exist. Thus aided, equally by Anneke's gentle, blushing
admissions, and my own wishes, I had no difficulty in
recalling
pictures that were infinitely agreeable to myself,
though possibly not minutely accurate.
In the Tappaan Sea, Dirck left us; proceeding into
Rockland, to join his family. I continued on in the sloop,
reaching port next day. My uncle and aunt Legge were
delighted to see me, and I soon found I should be a lion,
had I leisure to remain in town, in order to enjoy the
notoriety
my connection with the northern expedition had
created
.
I found a deep mortification pervading the capital, in
consequence of our defeat, mingled with a high
determination
to redeem our tarnished honour.
Satanstoe, with all its endearing ties, however, called me
away; and I left town, on horseback, leaving my effects to
follow by the first good opportunity, the morning of the day
succeeding that on which I had arrived. I shall not attempt
to conceal one weakness. As usual, I stopped at
Kingsbridge
to dine and bait; and while the notable landlady
was preparing my dinner, I ascended the heights to catch
a distant view of Lilacsbush. There lay the pretty
cottage-like
dwelling, placed beneath its hill, amid a wilderness of
shrubbery; but its lovely young mistress was far away,
and I found the pleasure with which I gazed at it blended
with regrets.
You have been north, I hear, Mr. Littlepage, my
landlady
observed, while I was discussing her lamb, and peas,
and asparagus; pray, sir, did you hear or see anything
of our honoured neighbours, Herman Mordaunt and his
charming daughter?
Much of both, Mrs. Light; and that under trying
circumstances. Mooseridge, my father's property in that
part of the province, is quite near to Ravensnest, Herman
Mordaunt's estate, and I have passed some time at it. Have
no tidings of the family reached you, lately?
None, unless it be the report that Miss Anneke will
never return to us.
Anneke not return! In the name of wonder, how do
you hear this?
Not as
Miss
Anneke, but as Lady Anneke, or
something
of that sort. Isn't there a General Bulstrom, or some
great officer or other, who seeks her hand, and on whom
she smiles, sir?
I presume I understand you, now. Well, what do you
learn of him?
Only that they are to be married next monthsome
say they
are
married already, and that the old gentleman
gives Lilacsbush, out and out, and four thousand pounds
currency, down, in order to purchase so high an honour for
his child. I tell the neighbours it is too much, Miss Anneke
being worth any lord in England, on her own, sole,
account
.
This intelligence did not disturb me, of course, for it was
tavern-tidings and neighbours' news. Neighbours! How
much is that sacred word prostituted! You shall find
people
opening their ears with avidity to the gossip of a
neighbourhood
,
when nineteen times in twenty it is less entitled
to credit than the intelligence which is obtained from a
distance
,
provided the latter come from persons of the same
class in life as the individuals in question, and are known to
them. What means had this woman of knowing the secrets
of Herman Mordaunt's family, that were one-half as good
as those possessed by friends in Albany, for instance? This
neighbourhood testimony, as it is called, does a vast deal
of mischief in the province, and most especially in those
parts of it where our own people are brought in contact
with their fellow-subjects, from the more eastern colonies.
In my eyes, Jason Newcome's opinions of Herman
Mordaunt
,
and his acts, would be nearly worthless, shrewd as
I admit the man to be; for the two have not a distinctive
opinion, custom, and I had almost said principle, in
common
.
Just appreciation of motives and acts can only
proceed
from those who feel and think alike; and this is
morally
impossible where there exist broad distinctions in
social classes. It is just for this reason that we attach so
little importance to the ordinary reports, and even to the
sworn evidence, of servants.
Our reception at Satanstoe was just what might have been
expected. My dear mother hugged me to her heart, again
and again, and seemed never to be satisfied with feasting her
eyes on me. My father was affected at seeing me, too; and
I thought there was a very decided moisture in his eyes.
As for old Capt. Hugh Roger, three-score-and-ten had
exhausted
his fluids, pretty much; but he shook me heartily
by the hand, and listened to my account of the movements
before Ty with all a soldier's interest, and with somewhat
of the fire of one who had served himself in more fortunate
times. I had to fight my battles o'er and o'er again, as a
matter of course, and to recount the tale of Ravensnest in
all its details. We were at supper, when I concluded my
most laboured narrative, and when I began to hope my
duties, in this respect, were finally terminated. But my dear
mother had heavier matters still, on her mind; and it was
necessary that I should give her a private conference, in her
own little room.
Corny, my beloved child, commenced this anxious and
most tender parent, you have said nothing
particular
to
me of the Mordaunts. It is now time to speak of that
family.
Have I not told you, mother, how we met at Albany,
and of what occurred on the river. I had not spoken of
that adventure in my letters, because I was uncertain of the
true state of Anneke's feelings, and did not wish to raise
expectations that might never be realized.And of our
going to Ravensnest in company, and of all that happened
at Ravensnest after our return from Ty.
What is all this to me, child! I wish to hear you speak
of Annekeis it true that she is going to be married?
`It is true. I can affirm that much from her own mouth.
My dear mother's countenance fell, and I could hardly
pursue my wicked
equivoque
any further.
And she has even had the effrontery to own this to
you
,
Corny?
She has, indeed; though truth compels me to add, that
she blushed a great deal while admitting it, and seemed only
half-disposed to be so frank: that is, at first; for, in the
end, she rather smiled than blushed.
Well, this amazes me! It is only a proof that vanity,
and worldly rank, and worldly riches, stand higher in the
estimation of Anneke Mordaunt, than excellence and modest
merit.
What riches and worldly rank have I, mother, to tempt
any woman to forget the qualities you have mentioned?
I was not thinking of you, my son, in that sense, at all.
Of course, I mean Mr. Bulstrode.
What has Mr. Bulstrode to do with my marriage with
Anne Mordaunt; or any one else but her own sweet self,
who has consented to become my wife; her father, who
accepts me for a son, my father, who is about to imitate his
example, by taking Anneke to his heart as a daughter, and
you, my dearest, dearest mother, who are the only person
likely to raise obstacles, as you are now doing.
This was a boyish mode of producing a most delightful
surprise, I am very ready to acknowledge; and, when I
saw my mother burst into tears, I felt both regret and shame
at having practised it. But youth is the season of folly,
and happy is the man who can say he has never trifled more
seriously with the feelings of a parent. I was soon
pardoned
what
offence would not that devoted mother have
pardoned her only child!when I was made to relate all
that was proper to be told, of what had passed between
Anneke
and myself. It is scarcely necessary to say, I was
assured of the cheerful acquiescence in my wishes, of all
my own family, from Capt. Hugh Roger, down to the dear
person who was speaking. They had set their minds on
my becoming the husband of this very young lady; and I
could not possibly have made any communication that would
be more agreeable, as I was given to understand from each
and all, that very night.
19 *
My return to Satanstoe occurred in the last half of the
month of July. The Mordaunts were not to be at
Lilacsbush
until the middle of September, and I had near two
months to wait for that happy moment. This time was
passed as well as it could be. I endeavoured to interest
myself in the old Neck, and to plan schemes of future
happiness
there, that were to be realized in Anneke's society.
It was and is a noble farm; rich, beautifully placed, having
water on more than three of its sides, in capital order, and
well stocked with such apples, peaches, apricots, plums, and
other fruits, as the world can scarcely equal. It is true that
the provinces a little further south, such as New Jersey,
Pennsylvania, Maryland, and Virginia, think they can beat
us in peaches; but I have never tasted any fruit that I thought
would compare with that of Satanstoe. I love every tree,
wall, knoll, swell, meadow, and hummock about the old
place. One thing distresses me. I love old names, such as
my father knew the same places by; and I like to
mispronounce
a word, when custom and association render the
practice familiar. I would not call my friend, Dirck
Follock
,
anything else but Follock, unless it might be in a
formal way, or when asking him to drink a glass of wine
with me, for a great deal. So it is with Satanstoe; the
name is homely, I am willing to allow; but it is strong, and
conveys an idea. It relates also to the usages and notions
of the country; and names ought always to be preserved,
except in those few instances in which there are good
reasons
for altering them. I regret to say, that ever since the
appearance of Jason Newcome among us, there has been a
disposition among the ignorant and vulgar, to call the Neck,
Dibbleton; under the pretence I have already mentioned,
that it once belonged to the family of Dibblees; or, as some
think, as a pious diminutive of Devil's-Town. I indignantly
repel this supposition; though, I do believe, that Dibbleton
is only a sneaking mode of pronouncing Devilton; as, I
admit, I have heard the old people laughingly term the Neck.
This belongs to the Gaul darn ye school, and it is not to
my taste. I say the ignorant and vulgar, for this is just the
class to be squeamish on such subjects. I have been told
though I cannot say that I have heard it myselfbut I am
told, there have been people from the eastward among us of
late years, who affect to call Hell-Gate, Hurl-Gate, or
Whirl-Gate, or by some other such sentimental,
whirl-a-gig
name; and these are the gentry who would wish to alter
Satanstoe into Dibbleton! Since the eastern troops
have begun to come among us, indeed, they have commenced
a desperate inroad on many of our old, venerated Dutch
names; names that the English, direct from home, have
generally respected. Indeed, changechange in all things,
seems to be the besetting passion of these people. We, of
New York, are content to do as our ancestors have done
before us; and this they ridicule, making it matter of
accusation
against us, that we follow the notions of our fathers.
I shall never complain that they are deserting so many of
their
customs; for, I regard the changes as improvements;
but I beg that they may leave us ours.
That there is such a thing as improvement I am willing
enough to admit, as well as that it not only compels, but
excuses changes; but, I am yet to learn it is matter of just
reproach that a man follows in the footsteps of those who
have gone before him. The apothegms of David, and the
wisdom of Solomon, are just as much apothegms and
wisdom
,
in our own time, as they were the day they were
written, and for precisely the same reason  their truth.
Where there is so much stability in morals, there must be
permanent principles, and something surely is worthy to be
saved from the wreck of the past. I doubt if all this craving
for change has not more of selfishness in it than either of
expediency or of philosophy; and I could wish, at least,
that Satanstoe should never be frittered away into so
sneaking
a substitute as Dibbleton.
That was a joyful day, when a servant in Herman
Mordaunt's
livery rode in upon our lawn, and handed me a
letter from his master, informing me of the safe arrival of
the family, and inviting me to ride over next day in time to
take a late breakfast at Lilacsbush. Anneke had written
to me twice previously to this; two beautifully expressed,
feminine, yet spirited, affectionate letters, in which the
tenderness
and sensibility of her nature were barely restrained
by the delicacy of her sex and situation. On the receipt of
this welcome invitation, I was guilty of the only piece of
romantic extravagance that I can remember having
committed
in the course of my life. Herman Mordaunt's black
was well treated, and dismissed with a letter of acceptance.
One hour after he left Satanstoe  I
do
love that venerable
name, and hope all the Yankees in Christendom will not be
able to alter it to Dibbleton  but, one hour after the negro
was off, I followed him myself, intending to sleep at the
well-known inn at Kingsbridge, and not present myself at
the Bush, until the proper hour next morning.
I had got to the house of the talkative landlady two hours
before sunset, put up my horse, secured my lodgings, and
was eating a bite myself, when the good housewife entered
the room.
Your servant, Mr. Littlepage, commenced this
loquacious
person; how are the venerable Captain Hugh Roger,
and the Major, your honoured father? Well, I see by your
smile. Well, it is a comfortable thing to have our friends
enjoy good healthmy own poor man enjoyed most wretched
health all last winter, and is likely to enjoy very much the
same, that which is coming. I should think you had come
to the wedding at Lilacsbush, Mr. Corny, had you not stopped
at my door, instead of going on direct to that of Herman
Mordaunt.
I started, but supposed that the news of what was to
happen had leaked out, and that this good woman, whose
ears were always open, had got hold of a neighbourhood
truth
, for once in her life.
I am on no such errand, Mrs. Light, but hope to be
married, one of these days, to some one or other.
I was not thinking of your marriage, sir, but that of
Miss Anneke, over at the 'Bush, to this Lord Bulstrom. It's
a great connection for the Mordaunts, after all, though
Herman
Mordaunt is of good blood, himself, they tell me. The
knight's man often comes here, to taste new cider, which he
admits is as good as English cider, and I believe it is the
only thing which he has found in the colonies that he thinks
is one-half as good; but Thomas tells me all is settled, and
that the wedding must take place right soon. It has only
been put off on account of Miss Wallace, who is in deep
mourning for her own husband, having lost him within the
honey-moon, which is the reason she still bears her own
name. They tell me a widow who loses her husband in
the honey-moon is obliged to bear her maiden name;
otherwise
Miss Mary would be Mrs. Van Goort, or something
like that.
As it was very clear the neighbourhood knew little about
the true state of things in Herman Mordaunt's family, I took
my hat and proceeded to execute the intention with which
I had left home. I was sorry to hear that Bulstrode was at
Lilacsbush, but had no apprehension of his ever marrying
Anneke. I took the way to the heights, and soon reached
the field where I had once met the ladies, on horseback.
There, seated under a tree, I saw Bulstrode alone, and
apparently
in deep contemplation. It was no part of my plan
to be seen, or to have my presence known, and I was
retiring
,
when I heard my name, discovered that I was
recognised
,
and joined him.
The first glance at Bulstrode showed me that he knew
the truth. He coloured, bit his lips, forced a smile, and
came forward to meet me, limping just enough to add
interest
to his gait, and offered his hand with a frank
manliness
that gave him great merit in my eyes. It was no trifle
to lose Anne Mordaunt, and I am afraid I could not have
manifested half so much magnanimity. But, Bulstrode was
a man of the world, and he knew how to command the
exhibition
of his feelings, if not to command the feelings
themselves
.
I told you, once, Corny, he said, offering his hand,
that we must remain friends,
coute qui coute
you have
been successful, and I have failed. Herman Mordaunt told
me the melancholy fact before we left Albany; and I can
tell you,
his
regrets were not so very flattering to you.
Nevertheless, he admits you are a capital fellow, and that
if it were not for Alexander, he could wish to be Diogenes.
So you have only to provide yourself with a lantern and a
tub, marry Anneke, and set up housekeeping. As for the
honest man, I propose saving you some trouble, by offering
myself in that character, even before you light your wick.
Come, take a seat on this bench, and let us chat.
There was something a little forced in all this, it is true,
but it was manly. I took the seat, and Bulstrode went on.
It was the river that made your fortune, Corny, and
undid me.
I smiled, but said nothing; though I knew better.
There is a fate in love, as in war. Well, I am as well
off as Abercrombie; we both expected to be victorious, while
each is conquered. I am more fortunate, indeed; for he can
never expect to get another army, while I may get another
wife. I wish you would be frank with me, and confess to
what you particularly ascribe your own success.
It is natural, Mr. Bulstrode, that a young woman should
prefer to live in her own country, to living in a strange
land, and among strangers.
Ay, Corny, that is both patriotic and modest; but it is
not the real reason. No, sir; it was Scrub, and the
theatricals
,
by which I have been undone. With most
provincials
,
Mr. Littlepage, it is a sufficient apology for anything,
that the metropolis approves. So it is with you colonists, in
general; let England say yes, and you dare not say, no.
There is one thing, that persons who live so far from home,
seldom learn; and it is this: There are two sorts of great
worlds; the great vulgar world, which includes all but the
very best in taste, principles, and manners, whether it be in
a capital or a country; and the great
respectable
world,
which, infinitely less numerous, contains the judicious, the
instructed, the intelligent, and, on some questions, the good.
Now, the first form fashion; whereas the last produce
something
far better and more enduring than fashion. Fashion
often stands rebuked, in the presence of the last class, small
as it ever is, numerically. Very high rank, very finished
tastes, very strong judgments, and very correct principles,
all unite, more or less, to make up this class. One, or more
of these qualities may be wanting, perhaps, but the union
of the whole forms the perfection of the character. We
have daily examples of this at home, as well as elsewhere;
though, in our artificial state of society it requires more
decided
qualities to resist the influence of fashion, when there
is not positive, social rank to sustain it, perhaps, than it
would in one more natural. That which first struck me,
in Anneke, as is the case with most young men, was her
delicacy of appearance, and her beauty. This I will not
deny. In this respect, your American women have quite
taken me by surprise. In England, we are so accustomed
to associate a certain delicacy of person and air, with high
rank, that, I will confess, I landed in New York with no
expectation of meeting a single female, in the whole country,
that was not comparatively coarse, and what we are
accustomed
to consider common, in physique; yet, I must now
say that, apart from mere conventional finish, I find quite as
large a proportion of aristocratical-looking females among
you, as if you had a full share of dutchesses. The last
thing I should think of calling an American woman, would
be coarse. She may want manner, in one sense; she may
want finish, in a dozen things; she may, and often does,
want utterance, as utterance is understood among the
accomplished
;
but she is seldom, indeed, coarse or vulgar,
according to our European understanding of the terms.
And of what is all this
propos
, Bulstrode?
Oh! of your success, and my defeat, of course, Corny,
answered the major, smiling. What I mean, is this
that Anneke is one of your second class, or is better than
what fashion can make her; and Scrub has been the means
of my undoing. She does not care for fashion, in a play,
or a novel, or a dress even, but looks for the proprieties.
Yes, Scrub has proved my undoing!
I did not exactly believe the last; but, finding Bulstrode
so well disposed to give his rejection this turn, it was not
my part to contradict him. We talked together half an
hour longer, in the most amicable manner, when we parted;
Bulstrode promising not to betray the secret of my presence.
I lingered in sight of the house until evening, when I
ventured nearer, hoping to get a glimpse of Anneke as she
passed some window, or appeared, by the soft light of the
moon, under the piazza that skirted the south front of the
building. Lilacsbush deserved its name, being a perfect
wilderness of shrubbery; and, favoured by the last, I had
got quite near the house, when I heard light footsteps on the
gravel of an adjacent walk. At the next instant, soft, low
voices met my ears, and I was a sort of compelled auditor
of what followed.
No, Anne, my fate is sealed for this world, said Mary
Wallace, and I shall live Guert's widow as faithfully and
devotedly, as if the marriage-vow had been pronounced.
This much is due to his memory, on account of the
heartless
doubts I permitted to influence me, and which drove
him into those terrible scenes that destroyed him. When a
woman really loves, Anneke, it is vain to struggle against
anything but positive unworthiness, I fear. Poor Guert was
not unworthy in any sense; he was erring and impulsive,
but not unworthy. Nononot unworthy! I ought to
have given him my hand, and he would have been spared
to us. As it is, I can only live his widow in secret, and in
love. You have done well, dearest Anneke, in being so
frank with Corny Littlepage, and in avowing that
preference
which you have felt almost from the first day of your
acquaintance.
Although this was music to my ears, honour would not
suffer me to hear more, and I moved swiftly away, stirring
the bushes in a way to apprize the speaker of the proximity
of a stranger. It was necessary to appear, and I
endeavoured
so to do, without creating any alarm.
It must be Mr. Bulstrode, said the gentle voice of
Anneke
,
who is probably looking for ussee, there he comes,
and we will meet
The dear speaker became tongue-tied; for, by this time,
I was near enough to be recognised. At the next instant,
I held her in my arms. Mary Wallace disappeared, how
or when, I cannot say. I place a veil over the happy hour
that succeeded, leaving the old to draw on their experience
for its pictures, and the young to live in hope. At the end
of that time, by Anneke's persuasion, I entered the house,
and had to brave Herman Mordaunt's disposition to rally
me. I was not only mercifully, but hospitably treated,
however
,
Anneke's father merely laughing at my little
adventure
,
saying, that he looked upon it favourably, and as a
sign that I was a youth of spirit.
Early in October we were married, the Rev. Mr. Worden
performing the ceremony. Our home was to be Lilacsbush,
which Herman Mordaunt conveyed to me the same day,
leaving it, as it was furnished, entirely in my hands. He
also gave me my wife's mother's fortune, a respectable
independence
,
and the death of Capt. Hugh Roger, soon after,
added considerably to my means. We made but one
family
,
between town, Lilacsbush, and Satanstoe, Anneke and
my mother, in particular, conceiving a strong affection for
each other.
As for Bulstrode, he went home before the marriage, but
keeps up a correspondence with us to this hour. He is still
single, and is a declared old bachelor. His letters, however,
are too light-hearted to leave us any concern on the subject;
though these are matters that may fall to the share of my
son Mordaunt, should he ever have the grace to continue
this family narrative.
THE END.